 Wang Laboratories Inc. is expected to name a former General Electric Co. executive to become its new president and chief operating officer.  A spokesman for Wang said the company's board is scheduled to meet today and an announcement is planned.  He wouldn't provide further details.  But individuals familiar with the board's search committee said that Richard W. Miller, who formerly headed the consumer-electronics operations at General Electric and RCA Corp., will be named president.  That post has been vacant since early this month when An Wang, the company's chairman and chief executive, forced out his son Frederick.  One board member confirmed Mr. Miller is on the "short list," but declined to confirm if he would be named.  Reached at his Greenwich, Conn., home, Mr. Miller said "I can't comment on anything," when asked whether he was taking the Wang job.  Naming a new president would be a second important step for the Lowell, Mass., computer maker, which Monday said it had finally negotiated a $575 million borrowing agreement with its banks.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Wang Labs Class B common stock closed at $6, up 25 cents.  Whoever takes the Wang job faces a host of challenges.  The new president must slash costs from a bloated headquarters, sell assets to reduce nearly $1 billion in debt and develop a strategy to reassure customers and revive moribund sales.  Moreover, three top officers have quit since Wang announced a record $424.3 million loss for the year ended June 30.  Analysts have said that naming a new president would be a vital step to revive the company.  Founder An Wang is 69 years old and is working half time while he recovers from surgery for cancer of the esophagus.  If named to the president's post, Mr. Miller would be the heir apparent for the top job.  For Mr. Miller, getting a shot at running a company with $3 billion in annual sales would be a satisfying turn of events after watching two previous operations sold out from under him.  During his short tenure at GE, Mr. Miller consolidated GE's and RCA's consumer-electronics business, intending to make the combined operations profitable and thus one of GE's major businesses.  By most accounts, he was well on his way to doing exactly that, when GE's chairman, John F. Welch Jr., suddenly agreed to swap the business for Thomson S.A.'s medical-equipment business plus cash in July 1987.  While Mr. Welch's move was met with dismay and disillusionment by many GE consumer-electronics executives, including Mr. Miller, Mr. Miller agreed to stay with the GE/RCA/Thomson operations until the French electronics concern felt comfortable with the consolidation.  In a 1988 interview, Mr. Miller said he tired of the intense world-wide travel demands of the Thomson job, turned down the opportunity to stay with Thomson for a reportedly large amount of money and quit in April 1988 to join an investment firm.  Besides looking at investments for American Industrial Partners, the investment firm, Mr. Miller has done some consulting for GE in the past year and a half.  He has maintained a friendly relationship with Mr. Welch.  But Mr. Miller hasn't lost his desire to run a company during his time away from corporate life.  That ambition was first frustrated in 1985 when GE agreed to buy RCA.  At the time, Mr. Miller was running RCA's consumer-electronics business and was in line to run all of RCA. Later at GE, Mr. Miller hoped for a chance at a bigger GE job, but Mr. Welch again quashed that desire when he disposed of Mr. Miller's consumer-electronics business.  Thomas Willmott, an analyst who follows Wang for Aberdeen Group Inc. in Boston, noted that the Wang's family control might provide reassurance for Mr. Miller.  "A guy who could come in and turn around this basket case" might be relieved that family control would prevent any hostile takeover or greenmail attempt, he said.  The Wang family controls the company through its ownership of 80% of Wang's Class C stock, which elects a majority of the board.  Individuals familiar with the search effort, which was conducted by a three person board committee aided by executive recruiter Thomas Neff of Spencer Stuart Inc. in New York, said the search went surprisingly quickly.  "Good chemistry" has already developed between An Wang and Mr. Miller, one individual said.  These individuals said the committee first considered offering the job to John Cunningham, a former Wang president who left the company in 1986 when told the top job would be reserved for a family member.  Mr. Cunningham turned around Computer Consoles Inc., a much smaller computer maker, eventually selling it to a British computer maker and realizing a personal gain of $17 million.  Mr. Cunningham, who enjoys spending time with his family and playing golf, made it clear he would demand substantial compensation and considerable freedom to do things his way if he took the job, friends said.  Moreover, he was leery of returning to a company controlled by the Wang family.  Mr. Cunningham told friends that the conditions he required for taking the job made him unacceptable to the search committee.  Mr. Cunningham couldn't be reached to comment yesterday.  Abitibi-Price Inc. said in Toronto that it is seeking offers for its Troy, Mich.-based building products division.  The unit to be sold, Abitibi-Price Corp., had 1988 operating profit of 11.4 million Canadian dollars (US$9.7 million) on sales of C$198.3 million.  Abitibi-Price Inc., a major newsprint producer, said it decided to sell the business to focus on its core activities.  It wouldn't say how much it was seeking from the sale.  When Lyphomed Inc. called in Floyd Benjamin last summer, the troubled drug manufacturer was looking for a miracle cure.  Food and Drug Administration inspectors were nipping at Lyphomed's heels over rampant quality control problems.  The regulators forced the company to slash production at its largest plant, in Melrose Park, Ill., and close a second plant in Orlando, Fla.  Lyphomed's only other production facility, in Grand Island, N.Y., was braced for another FDA inspection.  Lyphomed, its cash flow nearly stanched, was reeling.  When Japan's Fujisawa Pharmaceutical Co. proposed a $31-a-share buy-out of Lyphomed Monday, the proposal capped a stunning turnaround for the once-beleaguered drug manufacturer.  It also burnished Mr. Benjamin's reputation as a troubleshooter who specializes in improving quality control procedures and untracking drug companies snarled in regulatory problems.  "The turning point with our FDA problem was Floyd coming in to join Lyphomed," says John N. Kapoor, the company's chairman.  Mr. Kapoor says the federal regulators had confidence in Mr. Benjamin's ability to solve Lyphomed's problems.  "He really delivered.  I feel they were very comfortable with him and with his plan of action."  The 46-year-old Mr. Benjamin managed similar regulatory successes for his two former employers, Abbott Laboratories and American Hospital Supply Corp. When he arrived at Abbott in 1968 fresh from North Carolina Central University, Mr. Benjamin, a microbiologist by training, was thrown into a crisis over contamination of some of the company's body fluid products that had turned up in some hospitals.  Under pressure from the FDA and Centers for Disease Control, Abbott had been forced to shut the plant making the product.  Mr. Benjamin's team found the problem, solved it and got the FDA to reopen the plant within six months.  "I learned more than contributed," says Mr. Benjamin, who was the team's FDA contact.  "I learned how to translate internal issues into terms the FDA could feel comfortable with."  Mr. Benjamin's rapport with the FDA also came in handy during his employment with American Hospital Supply.  The company hired Mr. Benjamin in 1975 and sent him to Milledgeville, Ga., where its Kendall McGaw Laboratories unit was having quality control problems with the FDA.  Six months later, the plant was back in operation after Mr. Benjamin revamped manufacturing procedures and record-keeping.  "He's a very professional guy," says Raymond V. Mlecko, the FDA's Chicago district director.  Mr. Mlecko, who headed the Lyphomed investigation, says Mr. Benjamin seems to have a knack for avoiding confrontations that can sidetrack regulatory encounters.  "He doesn't accept everything, but he can argue his point in a nonconfrontational manner," Mr. Mlecko says.  "Confrontation can ruin the chemistry of a situation."  Lyphomed summoned Mr. Benjamin last summer at the height of the company's regulatory nightmare.  Mr. Benjamin, whose title is senior vice president for scientific affairs, replaced the existing regulatory and quality assurance officials with his own executive team, including several former colleagues from Abbott and American Hospital Supply.  "There had been a lack of confidence by the FDA that Lyphomed could resolve its problems.  We convinced them we could," he says.  Mr. Benjamin's team engineered a key breakthrough last fall when FDA inspectors allowed Lyphomed to sell most of the intravenous solution impounded at its Orlando plant.  "We convinced them the manufacturing conditions at the plant didn't make the product unsafe," Mr. Benjamin says.  The decision helped unblock the company's cash flow and reverse Lyphomed's loss spiral.  Currently, Lyphomed is riding high.  In national over-the-counter trading, Lyphomed closed at $30.25 a share, unchanged.  That is nearly back up to the company's all-time high of $31.25 in September 1987.  Lyphomed's regulatory woes had plunged the stock price to a low of $8.125 in April of last year.  What's more, production is at full speed again and Mr. Benjamin also helped get the FDA moving on Lyphomed's application to open a new plant in Puerto Rico.  The application, approved this week, had been stalled by the regulatory troubles here.  Though he shies away from the hired gun image, Mr. Benjamin hints he is ready for a new challenge.  "Everybody has a life cycle in work situations," he says.  "As you find you can get things done more quickly, that cycle gets shorter.  Then you're ready for something new."  Interest rates rose and bond prices tumbled as investors shunned the government's new two-year notes at yesterday's auction.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bonds fell 3/4 point, or $7.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield rose to 8.25%, the highest yield on a 30-year bond since June 22.  Corporate, municipal and mortgage-backed bonds were flat to 1/2 point lower.  Adding to the bond market's weak tone was fresh evidence that the manufacturing sector isn't weak enough to cause a recession or encourage the Federal Reserve to push interest rates lower.  The Commerce Department reported that new orders for durable goods fell 1.9% in July.  However, non-defense durable goods, a barometer of business investment, rose 5% in July after a 5.1% increase in June.  "There is no evidence of recession-like developments in these statistics," said Norman Robertson, chief economist at Mellon Bank Corp.  As a result, he said, "it's very difficult to believe that the Fed is going to ease at this time.  Under these conditions, the Fed will probably adopt a familiar wait-and-see attitude."  At the auction, the new two-year notes had an average yield of 8.37%, up sharply from the average yield of 7.75% at the previous two-year note auction on July 26.  After the auction results were announced, the yield moved slightly higher in when-issued trading and ended at about 8.42%.  Analysts said dealers bought the bulk of the issue, which was poorly bid.  Traders noted, for example, that the bid-to-cover ratio at the auction was 2.53 to 1, well below the average 3 to 1 bid-to-cover ratio at the previous 12 two-year note auctions.  The ratio, which reflects the number of bids the Treasury receives for each bid it accepts, is used to gauge investor demand.  Japanese investors, as well as domestic institutional investors, showed scant interest in the two-year note sale.  "We had no orders from our Asian clients," said William Brachfeld, an executive vice president at Daiwa Securities America Inc.  But the Japanese "are not normally big buyers of two-year notes," Mr. Brachfeld added.  Observers said yields are likely to inch higher ahead of today's sale to drum up retail buying interest.  "If you are trying to cram a bunch of securities down investors' throats, you've got to lower the price to find buyers," said Joel Marver, chief fixed-income analyst at Technical Data Global Markets Group.  "You can never overemphasize the impact that a large amount of supply will have on the market.  With four auctions this week, the market is inundated."  Not only must the market absorb a total of $40.9 billion of new Treasury notes and bills being auctioned this week, but the market still is struggling to digest the $56.7 billion of new Treasury bills, notes and bonds that were auctioned during the second week of August.  Today, the Treasury will sell $7.75 billion of five-year notes.  In when-issued trading, the five-year notes were quoted at a yield of 8.32%.  Some investors are shying away from the auctions because of uncertainty about the economic outlook.  Spike Thorn, a managing director and fixed-income portfolio manager at Scudder, Stevens & Clark, said the mutual fund company stayed away from the auction, in part, because yields still aren't high enough considering the current confusion in the market.  "The notes still don't look attractive," when compared with alternative investments.  "We are watching and waiting" to see where the market is heading, he said.  Other investors question the wisdom of buying two-year notes that pay lower rates than shorter-term securities.  The yield on the two-year notes was slightly below the 8.45% bond-equivalent yield on three-month Treasury bills yesterday.  That may explain why bids from individual investors were sharply lower at yesterday's auction.  The Treasury said noncompetitive bids, which come mainly from individual investors, totaled $1.03 billion.  At the previous two-year note auction July 26, such bids totaled $1.5 billion.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bond prices moved lower in light trading.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at 98 17/32, compared with 99 9/32 Monday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 97 28/32 to yield 8.3%, compared with 98 20/32 to yield 8.19%.  Short-term rates were higher.  The latest three-month Treasury bills had a discount rate of 8.06% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.32%, while six-month Treasury bills had a discount rate of 8.01% and bond-equivalent yield of 8.45%.  Here are auction details:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ 2-Year Notes  @ Applications $24,015,650,000  @ Accepted bids $9,501,235,000  @ Accepted at low price 46%  @ Accepted noncompetitively $1,033,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) 99.783 (8.37%)  @ High price (Rate) 99.819 (8.35%)  @ Low price (Rate) 99.765 (8.38%)  @ Interest rate 8 1/4%  @ The notes are dated Aug. 31 and mature Aug. 31, 1991.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were unchanged to 3/8 point softer in late dealings, in sympathy with Treasurys and as investors remained on the sidelines.  "It's the same situation we had yesterday and the day before and the day before: too many bonds and no one who wants to buy them," said one trader.  The handful of new issues that hit the Street were given a mixed reception.  A $360 million Arizona Department of Transportation revenue bond sale topped the negotiated slate.  An official with lead underwriter Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. said there was good demand for the short serial bonds but that room remains in the balance of the loan.  A competitively bid issue of $65 million of Hampton Roads Sanitation District, Va., sewer revenue bonds appeared to be off to a solid start.  Lead underwriter Dillon, Read & Co. reported a balance of $11.4 million late yesterday.  The Washington Public Power Supply System and its underwriters announced the issuer is delaying the pricing of its proposed $450 million of projects 1 and 3 refunding bonds until after Labor Day.  The delay stems from a Chemical Bank assertion that holders of projects 4 and 5 bonds have a claim to proceeds from the financing.  Chemical Bank is trustee for projects 4 and 5 bondholders.  WPPSS bond counsel and general counsel have repeatedly stated they believe Chemical Bank's assertion has no merit.  Bids for projects 4 and 5 bonds rose more than a point to about 12 1/4 for single-digit coupon bonds and to 12 1/2 for double-digit coupon bonds.  Mortgage-Backed Securities Depressed by continued sales by thrift institutions, mortgage securities fell 13/32 to 20/32 in moderate dealings.  Traders said the thrift mortgage sales also hurt the Treasury market because the Wall Street firms buying the securities sold Treasurys as a hedge against further declines in bond prices.  The thrift sales, which totaled an estimated $500 million, were scattered among many institutions, traders said.  Discount mortgage issues fared worse than premium securities, which is a typical pattern in a bearish market.  Discount issues, with long average lives and considerable call protection, aren't viewed attractively by investors in falling markets.  Government National Mortgage Association 8% securities for September delivery ended at 91 27/32, down 20/32, and 9% securities were at 96 13/32, down 17/32.  The 9% securities were yielding 9.65% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note held at 1.37 percentage points.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended about 1/2 point lower after quiet trading.  Despite depressed prices and scant interest among investors in the secondary market, two new issues priced this week saw solid demand.  Yesterday's $300 million offering by Texas Utilities Co. and Monday's $100 million issue by Sonat Inc. sold out minutes after pricing.  The Sonat securities were freed to trade early yesterday.  Dealers attribute the good reception for both offerings to fair pricing and the light calendar this week.  Texas Utilities first mortgage bond offering included $200 million of 10-year bonds priced to yield 9.52%.  The second part consisted of $100 million of 30-year bonds priced to yield 10.16%.  Foreign Bonds  In West Germany, government bonds were dragged down by slumping U.S. Treasurys.  Bond traders said Tuesday's release of West German July money supply figures also contributed to the weaker market.  They say the increase in West Germany's broad-based M3 money supply growth to an annualized pace of 4.9% in July from 4.3% in June indicated that inflation may be on the rise, which could fuel interest rate increases.  West Germany's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 fell 0.30 to 99.70 to yield 6.788%, while the 6 3/4% issue due 1994 was 0.20 point lower to close at 99.60 to yield 6.841%.  Japanese government bonds also ended lower.  Traders said investors are reluctant to take new positions as the end of the fiscal year nears.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended at a price of 97.31 to yield 5.40%.  But in Britain, government bonds ended little changed in quiet trading as the pound continued to firm.  The pound has risen on a belief that British interest rates aren't likely to drop immediately, even though the economy is losing strength.  Britain's 11 3/4% bonds due 2003/2007 fell 1/8 point to 116 1/8 to yield 9.58%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 were unchanged at 100 5/32 to yield 11.56%.  It is the bottom of the ninth inning, and the Mexican Baseball League action is as hot as a jalapeno pepper.  Los Tuneros de San Luis Potosi are leading Los Sultanes de Monterrey, 6-5.  In the stands is Mike Brito, the Mexico scout for the Los Angeles Dodgers.  Decked out in a tan tropical suit, a snap-brim hat and a silk tie, Mr. Brito is here to look at a rangy Tunero pitcher named Miguel Villa, whose fastball has been timed by radar at 90 miles per hour.  On the mound, Mr. Villa gets the sign from the catcher, rocks back into his windup -- and stops.  Behind home plate, a fight has broken out -- between the teams' mascots.  The canine-costumed mascot representing the Sultanes, or Sultans, is tangling with his counterpart from the Tuneros, a man wearing a bulbous yellow headpiece and a green bodysuit.  The Tuneros are named for the peasant harvesters of the tuna, the Spanish word for prickly pear.  As the umpire separates the macho mascots, whistles rain down from fans who have picked their favorite.  It almost seems anticlimactic when Mr. Villa retires the last three Sultanes batters to wrap up a Tunero victory.  But Mr. Brito has been keeping his eye on the ball.  "This kid throws too straight," exclaims the scout, a Cuban, in his Caribbean sing-song.  "If your ball doesn't move in the big leagues, they'll hit it even if it's going 120 miles an hour."  As the major leagues' best-known scout of "el beisbol", Mr. Brito intrepidly searches for diamond talent in the rough.  Puffing a big-league Cuban cigar and lugging the suitcase holding his radar gun, the beefy Mr. Brito has prospected in ballparks from the arid Sierra Madre to the steamy jungles of Tabasco.  "You never know when you're going to stumble on a future Hall-of-Famer throwing a rock at a bird," says Mr. Brito, expressing his version of every scout's fantasy.  Reality has been more prosaic, but not by much: In a rutted ballpark in the central Mexican farm town of Silao, he did stumble across Fernando Valenzuela, an unheralded 17-year-old at the time, who soon became an all-star with the Dodgers and a national hero in Mexico.  More typically, Mr. Brito stumbles into trouble.  While he was scouting in the hinterlands of Baja California, some "federales" were so befuddled by Mr. Brito's radar gun that they hauled him before the local magistrate. (Fortunately, the judge was a Dodger fan.)  Not all of the obstacles Mr. Brito encounters are man-made.  While the scout was on an expedition to Mexico City in April his wake-up call was followed by an earthquake that registered seven on the Richter scale.  Mr. Brito, who was in the bathtub, thought for a moment that a hurricane had taken a wrong turn around the Yucatan Peninsula.  "What a wave]" he says.  But it was even more of a jolt to him that night at the ballpark when a pitcher on loan from the Dodgers was knocked out of the game in the third inning.  Instead of booing the pitcher, the fans hurled abuse at the scout.  "Bring us another 'gringo,' Brito," shouted a fan.  Despite the hardships, Mr. Brito has blazed a trail that other U.S. teams have followed.  Inspired largely by the Dodgers' knack for importing gifted Mexican Leaguers, more than a dozen U.S. big-league clubs have developed affiliations with Mexican teams in the past few years.  "After Mike started scouting here, the majors found out that there are some real players in Mexico," says the Sultanes' owner, Jose Maiz Garcia, who has sold eight players to his affiliate, the Milwaukee Brewers.  To counter the competition his success has spawned, Mr. Brito tries to catch his rivals napping.  The Dodger scout covets a young catcher named Efren Ramirez, who spends most of his time sitting on the bench for Los Leones de Yucatan, an affiliate of the Kansas City Royals.  "The Leones don't know who their good players are," Mr. Brito says.  As the Dodger scout watches the Leones take batting practice one day, he heaps praise on the starting catcher, Juan Carlos Alvarez, within earshot of the Leones manager.  "What a shot," he exclaims the first time the catcher puts a ball in fair ground.  "A very quick bat."  Mr. Brito hopes that by building up Mr. Alvarez, he can someday persuade the Leones to trade Mr. Ramirez to the Dodgers' affiliate, Los Tigres de Mexico.  Though the 54-year-old Mr. Brito now watches games from box seats behind home plate, he also knows what it is to compete on the field.  Mr. Brito played several years in the Mexican League, where simply getting to the ballpark is often an endurance test for players.  "A 36-hour-drive to Juarez and I come off the bus and get two hits," he recalls proudly.  Mexican fans still call him "El Caballo," or The Horse, recalling his days as an unusually fleet catcher.  After he retired as a player, Mr. Brito found work as a scout for the Dodgers in the early 1970s.  Caustic American players looked at the way the increasingly ample Mr. Brito was stuffed into his natty clothes and gave him a new nickname: "Burrito."  But Mr. Brito proved he belonged in the big leagues with his now legendary discovery of Mr. Valenzuela in 1978, at a game the scout was attending to watch a promising shortstop.  While none of Mr. Brito's other finds have achieved the stardom of Mr. Valenzuela, the scout is a celebrity in Mexico, esteemed for his power to open doors to the big leagues and big dollars.  He has made cameo appearances in three Mexican movies and may be the only scout in any sport who is avidly sought out for autographs.  Players also look up to Mr. Brito.  On a rainy evening before a game between the Leones and the Tigres, players of both clubs are fraternizing in the Tigres dugout.  "Isn't this league just the most backwards damn place you've ever seen?" says a dejected Wes Clements, an American recently cut by the Cincinnati Reds.  Mr. Brito tries raising spirits by telling the story of a well-traveled major-leaguer who was relegated to the Mexican League but made a dramatic comeback.  "You never know when you're going to get the call," the scout intones.  "It was 1977 and the Dodgers tell me they need a hitter.  I give them one name: 'Vic Davalillo.'  "'Can that old man still play?' they say.  And I say, 'Yeah, sure, he can hit in his sleep.' So it's the top of the ninth in the playoffs against Philadelphia.  Two outs and we're down by two runs.  Davalillo goes up to pinch-hit.  What does he do?  He bunts] With two outs] Nobody believes it.  But Davalillo's safe at first.  The next three batters get hits.  We win and grab the momentum.  The Dodgers take the pennant, all because of Davalillo's drag bunt."  By the time the soliloquy is finished, the only sound in the dugout is that of a bilingual ballplayer softly translating the conclusion in Spanish.  Someone rasps his spikes on the dugout's concrete floor.  A few players fiddle with the webbing of their mitts.  Quietly, the group breaks up to take batting practice.  It may have nothing to do with Vic Davalillo, but when the first Tigres hitter steps up to the plate, he forsakes the ferocious home-run cut typical of batting practice and lays down a perfect drag bunt.  International Mobile Machines Corp., bolstered by a $10 million infusion from Hughes Aircraft Co., expects to become profitable in 1991, William J. Hilsman, president and chief executive officer, said.  Since its inception in 1981, IMM has posted mounting losses.  Last year, it reported a net loss of $21.4 million on revenue of $4.3 million.  "We were hoping to become profitable this year," Mr. Hilsman explained.  "But orders didn't come through as expected."  Profit next year will be hampered by huge research and development costs on a new digital cellular-telephone system.  The Cellular Telecommunications Industry Association last year called for manufacturers to produce such a system, to increase capacity.  IMM and other telecommunication equipment makers are racing to fill this need, and systems are expected on the market next year.  IMM makes Ultraphone systems that connect rural homes to the phone network by using digital radio signals.  It has had difficulty getting big contracts.  But with Hughes, a unit of General Motors Corp., as a supporter, Mr. Hilsman believes customers will increase.  "The partnership is critical to us," he said.  IMM, which yesterday got Ultraphone orders from Contel Corp., Citizens Utilities Co. and Pacific Telecom Inc., also hopes to win Hughes itself as a customer.  To help attain profitability, IMM has restructured operations as profit and loss centers and has hired a new chief operating officer, Richard W. Pryor, who previously was executive vice president of the Electric Data Systems Communications unit of General Motors.  Hughes invested $10 million in IMM last month and received 400,000 shares of a new series of IMM convertible preferred stock.  IMM said that investment will give it the cash and expertise needed to perfect and manufacture a digital cellular-telephone system and to compete in that market with American Telephone & Telegraph Co., Motorola Inc. and Northern Telecom Ltd.  "We can't compete against the giants -- Motorola and AT&T.  But Hughes can," Mr. Hilsman said.  "We design the technology and Hughes will manufacture it."  IMM said Hughes has agreed to help with product development and marketing, too, allowing it to cut costs by closing field offices in Atlanta, Denver and Washington.  United Airlines parent UAL Corp. is likely to wait until it sees bank financing for Marvin Davis's $6.19 billion offer before its board decides whether to put the nation's second largest airline up for sale, according to people familiar with the situation.  "He's got to put cash down, to present financing.  That will be the backdrop" for the UAL board's next step, a person familiar with the offer said.  Mr. Davis isn't expected to unveil financing for his $275-a-share offer before the latter part of this week, giving other potential bidders, including United's pilots and the team of British Airways and Morgan Stanley & Co., time to work on proposals of their own.  Some UAL directors are hoping the board can delay any action until Congress returns to work in September, according to a person familiar with the bid.  Those directors expect some members of Congress to object to yet another carrier succumbing to a leveraged buy-out.  Congress has been in recess since the Davis bid became known Aug. 7.  But hearings are scheduled to begin next month on the dangers of saddling airlines with additional debt and the issue of foreign-ownership stakes in U.S. carriers.  UAL declined to comment.  Although Texas investor Robert M. Bass has also expressed interest in bidding for United, market observers say that at the current UAL stock-price level, they believe he would be more interested selling any stock he owns than in making a bid.  After a two-day lull in new developments, UAL's stock price retreated yesterday for the first time since the interest of Mr. Bass and British Air became known Friday.  UAL fell $1.75 a share, to $272, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Takeover-stock traders said that, considering all the risks involved, that level implies a lofty sale price of close to $300 a share.  In his bid for UAL, Mr. Davis appears to be following a script similar to the one he used in his recent pursuit of NWA Inc., Northwest Airlines' parent.  The Los Angeles investor pushed NWA's board to put the company up for sale after launching a proxy fight and making a formal tender offer.  In that case, Mr. Davis's tender offer document said he had agreed to pay $26 million in fees to a syndicate of banks led by Citicorp, which had promised to line up $2.4 billion.  Another $26.5 million in fees was due if the money ultimately was borrowed.  However, Mr. Davis actually paid the banks only $5 million.  One person familiar with the current situation said that in the UAL case, the company's board is going to insist on seeing "more than the two 25-cent stamps" it has cost Mr. Davis to mail his bids before taking the serious step of putting UAL up for sale.  With Mr. Davis at bay for the moment, UAL pilots are continuing to work on a proposal that would give the airline's employees a majority-ownership stake.  However, the union and the company still haven't agreed on a dollar amount or the exact nature of the employee concessions that would be needed to fund the equity stake, a person familiar with the negotiations said.  A transaction involving employees would still leave room for British Air or some other party, as well as UAL management, to participate.  If labor and management reach an agreement, it then would be up to UAL's board and its advisers -- CS First Boston Group and the law firm of Davis Polk & Wardwell -- to decide whether an auction is necessary.  With British Air in the picture, speculation has arisen that Mr. Davis might open talks with some other foreign carrier, such as Lufthansa, the West German airline, in hopes of persuading British Air to remain neutral instead of choosing sides.  The threat would be that British Air risks losing its marketing relationship with United if Mr. Davis wins.  In the NWA contest, the equity investment of KLM Royal Dutch Airlines helped tip the scales in favor of Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi's buy-out proposal for the company.  Mr. Davis had held talks with KLM before the Amsterdam airline teamed up with Mr. Checchi.  Despite recent softness in traffic, airlines are restructuring fares in a way that will make flying more expensive for many business and leisure travelers.  Industry sources said the moves include increasing the price on one of the industry's most popular excursion fares plus an effort to eliminate a whole class of widely used discount fares for business travelers.  Starting today, carriers are raising fares $20 to $40 on round-trip tickets that require seven days' advance purchase and a Saturday night stayover.  Airlines are also eliminating many of their popular "walk-up" fares -- discount fares that are available for business travelers on the day of departure.  The industry made a similar effort to eliminate discount walk-up fares last fall -- but with only partial success.  Another component of the fare restructuring is a new 14-day advance purchase fare that is 50% refundable if canceled.  This is in addition to a 14-day advance-purchase fare that isn't refundable.  The additional 14-day ticket costs $20 to $40 more than the nonrefundable version.  For example, between Boston and Chicago, the regular 14-day advance-purchase price is $198.  The new 14-day partially refundable ticket is $238.  The least costly seven-day ticket is jumping to $278 from $238.  The moves come despite recent weakness in traffic.  Domestic airline traffic fell 1.6% in the first six months of the year, according to the Air Transport Association, an industry trade group.  While summer traffic has been up slightly, analysts said demand was inflated by a promotion that allowed children to fly free.  But carriers apparently believe that the fare increases will bring in more revenue than will be lost because of people who choose not to fly because of the higher fares.  Moreover, the latest fare moves are aimed at people who are the least likely to cut back on flying -- business travelers and people who make last-minute vacation plans.  For more price-conscious fliers, the industry did announce a round of special new promotional fares.  Last week, airlines announced an array of domestic discounts for travel between Sept. 9 and Dec. 15.  Those tickets must be purchased by Sept. 1.  The cuts are aimed at stimulating vacation travel after the end of the peak summer period.  The latest moves were initiated earlier this month when Continental Airlines filed them in its computer reservation system.  Alerted by the proposed fares, other airlines have taken similar steps.  Carriers including United Airlines, American Airlines, Delta, Braniff, USAir, Midway, Trans World Airlines and Northwest have matched the excursion fare increases.  Most are also matching the changes in the business fares.  These are the industry's latest attempts to boost its least costly fares nationwide.  Increases initiated this spring were eventually withdrawn, in part because major carriers feared that consumer demand would shrink as prices rose.  Fares are higher this year, however, because major carriers have succeeded in raising fares in limited markets.  For anyone who wants to help "perestroika" along, the First Hungary Fund may be just the thing.  But investors must have $500,000 to spare for at least five years.  An East bloc fund is a trendy idea.  Western investors are warming to the region as Poland gets a non-Communist premier and Hungary expands its free-market experiments.  Now George Soros, a high-profile, Hungarian-born, New York money manager and promoter of reforms in East bloc countries, is helping launch the first mutual fund for communist stocks.  The First Hungary Fund is circulating promotional material through Bear Stearns and International Finance Corp., a unit of the World Bank.  It seeks a total of $50 million from affluent investors.  Hungary may be the next country to create "miracles of productivity," following Austria, Spain and Taiwan, the prospectus hints.  But the First Hungary Fund will be a highly unusual country fund.  There might be unknown political risks from strikes or even invasion.  And no one knows what the returns might be, because communist funds don't have any track record.  Essentially, each investor is being asked to lend Hungarian companies $500,000 for five years.  Then, holders can get their money back in dollars, plus any gains, from Hungary's central bank.  But during the five years, holders will be stuck.  Unlike other country funds, First Hungary Fund shares aren't intended to be traded and won't be listed on any exchange.  Until they try to get out, investors won't really know how they are doing.  The fund will mostly buy private companies' shares, so it will be tough to calculate the net asset value.  The Hungarian fund will aim for long-term capital gains.  But Mr. Soros says, "I wouldn't encourage anyone to go in with expectations" that they will make a killing.  "The big bucks only come if Hungary becomes a free-market economy, like Austria or Finland," says Andrew Sarlos, a Toronto money manager.  If things turn out badly, he says, investors will get their money back and maybe earn 4% to 5% annually.  This is much worse than U.S. Treasury bills, of course.  Mr. Soros and Mr. Sarlos dreamed up the First Hungary Fund and will sit on the advisory board.  Other key advisers will be Hungary's central bank, with a 50% stake in the advisory company, and International Finance Corp. Traditionally, such entities haven't been concerned with helping investors make a buck.  Mr. Soros, 58 years old, runs the $1.8 billion Quantum Fund.  Until he lost a bundle in the 1987 stock market crash, he had one of the world's best investment records.  He made a fortune in the past by betting on undervalued markets such as Finland, and he often makes so-called vulture investments in troubled companies.  "Why not practice vulture investing on a nationwide scale in Hungary, where everything is more or less in bankruptcy?" jokes Jan Vanous, who tracks East bloc industry at PlanEcon in Washington.  Mr. Vanous says he wouldn't put his own money in the First Hungary Fund.  He says the fund needs to spend a lot of time and money just to screen investments, perhaps paying Western accounting firms to overhaul companies' financial statements.  Hungary has massive foreign debt.  It is short of foreign currency and has much antiquated industry, including Raba, which makes diesel engines, and Ikarusz, which make buses, mostly for the Soviets.  Analysts say it is difficult to assess even successful Hungarian companies' performance, because they use anachronistic accounting methods.  But Mr. Soros says he thinks money can be made from Hungary's tax-exempt joint ventures with foreign partners, and from businesses such as hotels and tourism, cosmetics and pharmaceuticals.  He says money also might be made by turning around heavy-industrial companies, though this requires special expertise, which is costly.  But Western investors like Hungary right now.  Recently, Citicorp's Budapest affiliate launched Hungary's first management buy-out fund.  Chicago's Pritzker family bought a Hungarian concern.  And Alliance Capital Management in New York has filed documents for an Austria Fund that might buy Hungarian stocks.  Mr. Soros says he thinks "venture investing" is the right term for what the Hungary fund will do.  He warns that while he might guide the fund to some investments, he won't spend any time managing the fund.  Some people think this is a negative for holders.  Besides Mr. Soros and Mr. Sarlos, capitalist luminaries on the fund's board include Robert Pritzker and the Canadian real estate magnate Albert Reichmann, who is said to like Budapest real estate.  But only Mr. Soros and Mr. Sarlos, with stakes in the fund's advisory company, have agreed to offer the fund any Hungarian investments they find.  The fund manager will be the Canadian investor Robert Smith, who will screen investments for the board.  He "has no relevant experience in Hungary," the prospectus states.  Some people worry that Soviet tanks might someday roll into Budapest again, as in 1956.  The recent massacre of Chinese students in Beijing's Tiananmen Square "was a reminder that perestroika can be reversed," PlanEcon's Mr. Vanous says.  "Hungary has a serious country risk," Mr. Soros admits.  But in Hungary, he adds, perestroika is more advanced and less likely to falter than in China.  Another big problem: It can be tough to get money out of Hungary.  The forint currency isn't convertible into U.S. dollars and has steadily depreciated.  But the First Hungary Fund has arranged what some analysts call a "sweetheart deal" with the country's central bank, which is offering holders some put options.  Investors can get their money back in full after five years, and can sell shares at net asset value after the sixth year.  Under a special put option, holders can ask for their money back if the fund is threatened by big changes in Hungarian policies, war or insurrection.  But the prospectus warns that it might be tough to enforce the special put option.  And if Hungary is short of dollars in five years' time, skeptics say, it might be impossible for the central bank to honor any of the put options.  The Chicago Board Options Exchange said it disciplined five individuals who were charged with violating exchange rules.  David H. Roenisch Jr., identified as a former CBOE market maker, was permanently barred from association with any exchange member for failing to repay his clearing firm after liquidating his market-maker account.  The exchange said Mr. Roenisch owed First Options of Chicago Inc. about $189,000.  James D. Rieker, identified as a former broker in Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.'s office in Rockford, Ill., was permanently barred from associating with CBOE members.  Mr. Rieker allegedly did not repay the exchange for $15,000 in losses from trading on his personal account.  Messrs.  Roenisch and Rieker did not respond to the CBOE charges, according to the exchange.  Akiva Bar, a former broker with PaineWebber Inc.'s Monterey, Calif., office, agreed to a censure and a five-year suspension from associating with exchange members and a $10,000 fine.  Mr. Bar allegedly committed "numerous" irregularities with "numerous" public customer accounts.  Mr. Bar was also said to have represented himself as a broker prior to obtaining his license.  Paul H. Fried, a broker with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.'s Boston office, agreed to a censure and suspension from associating with any exchange members for two years for allegedly committing a number of irregularities relating to public customers' accounts.  Alan M. Galac, identified as a former broker with Thomson McKinnon Securities Inc.'s Buffalo, N.Y., office, agreed to be censured and to accept a three-month suspension from associating with exchange members.  He allegedly made options trades for a public customer's account without authorization of the customer or Thomson McKinnon and also was said to have made "unsuitable and excessive" trades for the same customer's account.  The CBOE wouldn't disclose the size of the trades in the last three cases.  Messrs.  Bar, Fried and Galac agreed to the actions without admitting or denying wrongdoing, according to the exchange.  None of the disciplined brokers could be reached for comment.  Officials at their former branch offices refused comment.  Neither CBOE nor First Options spokesmen could be reached for further comment about Mr. Roenisch.  The dollar sank, hampered by weak fundamentals, a general move to marks and sterling, and a U.S. durable-goods report that fell short of market expectations.  Durable-goods orders fell 1.9% in July, following a revised 1.4% drop in June.  Economists surveyed by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report predicted orders would be unchanged in July, and the poor showing opened the door for dollar-dumping in New York after the U.S. currency had been flagging in Asia and Europe.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9395 marks, down from 1.9577 marks late Monday, and at 142.20 yen, down from 143.10 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5890, up from $1.5725.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the dollar opened for trading at 142.30 yen, down from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 142.78 yen.  Terri Reid, an investment officer with Harris Trust & Savings Bank, Chicago, said talk of a "fairly large" order for marks in that city may have pushed the dollar below critical technical support at 1.9500 marks.  "Once we broke below 1.9510 marks, the market hit sort of a black hole.  There were simply no dollar bids until we moved down to about 1.9460 marks."  At that point, traders said, a rash of stop-loss sell orders expedited the dollar's decline to around 1.9400 marks.  Traders said the action was more a reflection of strength in sterling and the mark than dollar weakness.  Sterling is benefiting from optimism ahead of today's British current account report, which is expected to show improvements in July for the trade and current accounts.  Pound strengthening started Friday, and shows no signs of abating -- at least against the dollar -- until the current account report appears.  Sterling's strong advance has some dealers worried that disappointing current-account results could lead to widespread profit-taking and major losses for holders of the British currency.  But Cynthia Johnson, vice president and manager of corporate foreign exchange at Lloyds Bank in New York, doesn't entirely agree.  While a partial pullback may occur, she says firm technicals and an improving outlook on British interest rates will provide the safety net in the event of lackluster trade numbers.  "Sterling's smooth rise above $1.5800 and 3.06 marks -- both were tough resistance -- was evidence of the pound's technical strength," she said.  Meanwhile, the feisty mark posted impressive gains against all currencies save the pound amid persistent rumors in Europe and later in New York that the West German Bundesbank was planning to raise interest rates when the bank's Central Council resumes its regular meetings tommorrow after a summer recess.  Generally, however, traders and analysts say they don't expect the Council -- the German equivalent of the U.S.'s Federal Open Market Committee -- to make any major decisions this month.  Said one trader at a West German bank in New York: "These rumors would have made sense if the dollar were reaching new highs against the mark.  But as we stand now, there's no basis for a {Bundesbank} rate hike."  The West German central bank last raised interest rates June 29, boosting the discount and Lombard rates by one-half percentage point to 5% and 7% respectively.  Some rumor-supporters pointed to the Bundesbank's announcement that West Germany's M3 money supply growth accelerated to an annualized rate of 4.9% in July, up from 4.3% in June, though just below the central bank's 5% growth target for 1989.  M3 consists of cash in circulation, sight deposits, time deposits under four years, and most savings accounts.  But the increase in M3 growth was widely expected by West German economists surveyed by Dow Jones, who said the repeal of a 10% witholding tax on interest income on July 1, which was announced in April, temporarily slowed money growth in June.  Additionally, July's rate is down from May's 5.3% growth, and a robust 6.1% expansion rate in April.  As for the FOMC, which convened to consider credit policy at the U.S. Federal Reserve, traders don't expect a monumental change in monetary approach while the U.S. economy continues to hum along at a gentle pace and inflation remains under control.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $367.90 an ounce, down 50 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 1.3 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was quoted at $366.65 an ounce.  Heritage Entertainment Inc. expects to report a loss of "a few cents" a share for the fiscal first quarter ended June 30, but a break-even year, Arthur S. Steloff, president and chairman, said.  Mr. Steloff said he looks for fiscal 1990 revenue to jump to between $25 million to $35 million from $6 million a year earlier, reflecting increased film production and distribution and profitable movie screen operations.  Heritage, a movie and television production company, recently became one of the first independent film makers to delve into movie exhibition by buying 73 movie screens through its purchase of closely-held Landmark Theatre Corp. and Seven Gables Theatre Corp.  Mr. Steloff, in an interview, said Heritage expects to acquire more screens by 1990, bringing the total to about 150.  Most of the new screens will be operated by current management to save on overhead, he said.  He said Heritage is looking to acquire screens in St. Louis, New Orleans, Chicago, Milwaukee, Boston, Atlanta or Miami.  "This will be a larger and larger part of our business," he said.  For the year-earlier first quarter, the company posted net income of $71,000 on revenue of $2.8 million.  For the full year, it had a net loss of $5.3 million, which included a $2 million reserve for the potential settlement of a shareholder lawsuit.  Mr. Steloff said the company is also shifting back into the production of low-budget features, a business it had left two years ago.  A recent test low-budget film brought Heritage a $800,000 profit.  Now, the company is producing four low-budget films at $1 million each for foreign and video distribution.  It is also making two other films for $4 million each, and two studio pictures for between $20 million to $25 million each.  Heritage plans to downplay production of television movies, an area Mr. Steloff says has become more competitive.  "It's getting to be a more risky business" and less profitable as networks emphasize in-house productions, he said.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Heritage closed at $2.50, unchanged.  Unless you have been living under a rock, you know that oil from the tanker Exxon Valdez slimed hundreds of miles of Alaska's coast last spring.  You know that, despite cleanup efforts, much of the rugged shoreline remains shiny and black.  You also know that Exxon Corp. is between a shiny black you-know-what and a hard place because of this.  But you probably don't know that Exxon has discovered that some of those shiny black beauties aren't coated with crude at all.  Oil never touched them.  They've been black for eons and always will be.  They are native volcanic rocks.  In other words, Exxon says, just because it's black doesn't mean we did it.  So now the oil giant is spreading the word to just about anyone who will listen.  "Sometimes, it's difficult to tell which stretches of shoreline are oiled and to what extent," says a videotape shown recently at a congressional hearing and to Alaskan officials.  "In many areas, volcanic rock itself is black, so when wet it looks oiled even when it may not be." (Sure enough, a dull, dry, black rock provided by Exxon becomes wet and oily-looking when dunked in water.)  What do Alaskans say to this?  Boulderdash.  They already knew their rocks were black.  "I don't see where it's relevant," declares John Sund, a member of Alaska's oil-spill commission.  "Wishful thinking," sighs Dennis Kelso, environmental commissioner.  "A piece of PR," huffs Ernie Piper, special assistant to the governor.  Still, Otto Harrison, in charge of Exxon's cleanup, keeps a small collection of "pet rocks" at the ready in his office to show visitors.  One fist-sized specimen is sliced in half to prove that it is black all the way through.  Exxon says its comments aren't an exercise in defensive public relations, but an effort to educate the uninitiated about the area, which was only partly slimed.  Terry Koonce, a top Exxon executive, recalls his first helicopter flight over the shoreline: "I said, 'Gee, is that not oil down there?'" But upon landing, he says, he discovered only "very clean black rock."  And rocks are just one issue.  Steve Provant, a state environmental official, says Mr. Harrison recently handed him a bottle of oily-looking sand.  "I was surprised," Mr. Provant says.  "Then Otto told me: Alaska has black sand beaches."  General Electric Co. received a $298.4 million Air Force contract for the Advanced Tactical Fighter engine program.  Lockheed Corp. received an $80.5 million Air Force contract for C-5 aircraft avionics support.  Martin Marietta Corp. received a $35.1 million Army contract for the line-of-sight forward heavy weapon system.  Beech Aerospace Services Inc. received a $10.5 million Army contract for aircraft support.  Takeover rumors have sparked a lot of investor interest in Ferro Corp. this year.  But two top insiders have sold most of their shares in the industrial-coatings and plastics maker.  Werner Bush, group vice president in charge of the Cleveland company's coatings and colors division, sold 66% of his stake in two separate transactions July 31, according to filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Mr. Bush, who got a total of $372,417 for 8,007 shares, declined to comment.  John W. Slaton, senior vice president of corporate development, sold 12,000 shares for $60 each, or $720,000, on Aug. 11.  He has 474 shares remaining.  Mr. Slaton, age 65, said he will be retiring from the company at the end of the month, but declined to comment further.  Ferro stock closed at $61 a share yesterday, up $2.50, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The stock price has nearly doubled since mid-March, when the company became the subject of takeover speculation.  Lately, there's been persistent talk that Centaur Group or a group of investors led by Oppenheimer & Co. will seek control of the company.  The rumors have made for big gains, boosting the stock as much as $3 in a single day.  Ferro has been seen as an attractive takeover target because of its large presence in Europe, and the company's dominant market share in several of its plastics and coatings businesses, said Karen Lane, an analyst at Merrill Lynch & Co.  But so far, all the takeover talk has been just that, she said.  Moreover, she said, there are reasons to be bearish on Ferro.  "In general, they've had several years of exceptional earnings growth," she said.  But currency exchange rates are working against Ferro, she said, and the tile-coatings market, in which Ferro is a major player, is leveling off.  Ms. Lane predicts a decline in earnings in the fiscal year ending in December and for the next fiscal year.  Said Hector R. Ortino, the company's chief financial officer, "We don't comment either on rumors or on unusual stock activity."  ---  DIAMONDS ON THE SOLES OF HIS SHOES?  Nike Inc. Chairman P.H. Knight sold 200,000 shares, or a third of his Class B common, between July 18 and 25, for $8.7 million.  But Mr. Knight, who has been a frequent seller of Nike shares, is still the majority stockholder of this Beaverton, Ore., maker of athletic footwear.  He retains 13.5 million shares of Class A common and 404,799 shares of Class B common, said a spokeswoman for the company.  "He's still the guy that calls the shots," the spokeswoman said.  Mr. Knight declined to comment on his use of proceeds from the sale.  In over-the-counter trading, Nike stock closed yesterday at $47.50, up 12.5 cents.  ---  M-I-C-K-E-Y M-O-N-E-Y: The sale topping this week's insider chart was by Frank G. Wells, president and chief operating officer of Walt Disney Co.  As previously reported, he sold 850,000 Disney shares July 18 and 19 at a market price of about $101.60, or a total of $86.4 million.  A spokesman for the company said Mr. Wells chose to sell the shares "for estate planning and tax purposes."  Mr. Wells made a profit of $74.2 million.  Disney stock closed yesterday at $114.25, down 75 cents, in trading on the Big Board.  ---  G. Pascal Zachary in San Francisco contributed to this article.  PLM International Inc. said it sold about $64 million of newly-issued preferred stock to its employee stock ownership plan.  S.A. "Chip" Megeath, PLM's chairman, said the company financed the ESOP's stock purchase through a bank loan.  About 160 employees are participating in the ESOP, and in exchange for doing so some workers took pay cuts and others gave up certain employment benefits, Mr. Megeath said.  PLM is a transportation leasing company.  The American Stock Exchange said it asked a federal appeals court to delay an order that would halt trading in a new type of security that is based on the value of broad stock-market indexes.  Amex spokesman Robert Shabazian said the exchange made the request partly to give investors who have bought these securities, known as "stock baskets," more time to liquidate them for cash.  A ruling Friday by the Seventh Circuit Court of Appeals in Chicago threw into question the legitimacy of stock baskets, which have been traded on the Amex, Philadelphia Stock Exchange and Chicago Board Options Exchange for three months.  The appeals court gave holders of stock baskets until Sept. 8 to liquidate their positions.  The court ruling said the securities resemble futures contracts, not stocks, and as such, they should be regulated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission and not the Securities and Exchange Commission, which originally sanctioned them.  The American and Philadelphia exchanges denounced the court's decision, saying it reflected a jurisdictional dispute between two federal regulatory agencies and would harm investors for whom the baskets were designed.  A federal grand jury has indicted Stanford Stoddard for the second time on charges that the former Michigan bank-holding company official misused bank funds.  The indictment charges that while Mr. Stoddard was chairman and chief executive officer of Michigan National Corp., he bought a Jackson, Mich., branch-bank building and leased it back to a subsidiary bank of Farmington Hills, Mich.-based Michigan National at excessively high rates.  Mr. Stoddard, 58 years old, was convicted on similar charges in 1987, but a federal appeals court overturned the conviction this past May on a technicality.  A three-judge appeals court panel in Cincinnati found that the indictment was flawed -- incorrectly stating that the Michigan National subsidiary involved, Michigan Bank-Midwest, was a member of the Federal Reserve System.  But federal prosecutors say they still can prosecute because Michigan Bank-Midwest is a federally-insured bank.  "We think the law has been broken and there is nothing in the (appeals) court's decision that would preclude us from retrying this case," said Stephen J. Markman, U.S. Attorney for the Eastern District of Michigan.  In the first trial, federal authorities accused Mr. Stoddard of misusing $175,000 of bank funds.  Evidence in that trial alleged that Mr. Stoddard used some of the funds to pay for personal expenses, including construction on properties owned by his family and hiring an orchestra for his daughter's wedding.  Mr. Stoddard, who resigned his posts in 1984 following an investigation by federal regulators, couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  In a related ruling this past March, a federal appeals court panel overturned an order issued by the Federal Reserve Board in 1988 removing Mr. Stoddard from his posts at the bank and barring him from serving in any federally-insured bank.  The appeals panel ruled that bank regulators have no authority to remove a person from an office he no longer occupies.  SunGard Data Systems Inc., Wayne, Pa., said it agreed in principle to acquire Dyatron Corp., a Birmingham, Ala., computer services company, in a stock exchange valued at about $58 million.  Under terms of the agreement, which must be approved by holders for both companies, Dyatron holders would receive about one share of newly issued SunGard common for each common share of Dyatron owned.  Dyatron has about 3.1 million shares outstanding.  If those shares were converted into SunGard stock, the merged company would have about 14 million shares outstanding.  In national over-the-counter trading, SunGard common closed yesterday at $18 a share, down 75 cents.  IMA Holdings Corp. extended for the second time its $28-a-share tender offer for 94% of the shares of American Medical International Inc.  IMA, an investment group that includes the Pritzker family of Chicago and First Boston Corp., extended its $3.35 billion offer for the hospital chain until 12:01 a.m. EDT Sept. 12.  The offer was set to expire tomorrow.  IMA's offer is for as many as 68.8 million of American Medical's common shares.  The company said as of Monday, it had been tendered about 22.8 million shares, including shares issuable upon conversion of convertible debentures.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, American Medical shares closed at $25 each, up 12.5 cents.  IMA said it is extending the offer to further review a congressional committee proposal that could eliminate the tax deductibility of certain interest payments or original issue discounts on debt securities used to finance the offer.  The first extension was for the same reason.  Two majority-owned units of Thermo Electron Corp. said they are considering merging.  If the transaction is approved, Thermo Environmental Corp. would merge with a subsidiary of Thermo Instrument Systems Inc.  The two companies have cooperated for the past several years in joint ventures.  Shareholders of Thermo Environmental would exchange their common stock for common shares of Thermo Instrument.  The companies said they expect the exchange to be tax free.  Although the exact terms haven't been decided, the companies said about one share of Thermo Instrument would be exchanged for two shares of Thermo Environmental.  The companies couldn't place a value on the transaction.  The merger is subject to the approval of shareholders and directors of both companies.  Thermo Electron, a Waltham, Mass., maker of environmental and analytic instruments, holds 80% of the stock of Thermo Instrument and 85% of the stock of Thermo Environmental.  After a string of data indicating the economy perked up in July, the government reported yesterday that new orders for durable goods tumbled during the month.  Orders for products from engines to home computers fell 1.9% in July to $122.9 billion, their lowest monthly level since last September, largely because of slackening auto demand and a plunge in orders for engines, the Commerce Department said.  But many economists found hints of strength in the report.  For one, the department sharply revised its calculation of June's orders, to a 1.4% increase from a rise of 0.4% reported earlier.  Also, orders for capital goods outside of the military burgeoned 5.0% on top of a 5.1% gain in June, showing that businesses are still investing.  The report was "pretty well in a pattern of modest growth," said Richard Berner, an economist at Salomon Brothers in New York.  The economy has been flashing mixed signals in recent months.  After a series of reports suggesting the economy was severely slowing, possibly to the brink of recession, the government's main economic statistics pointed to a pickup in many areas of economic activity in July.  Payrolls, retail sales, factory production and home building all grew during the month, the government reports said.  Although orders for durable goods fell, many economists believed they showed enough strength to suggest the economy, though growing slowly, remains safe from recession for the time being.  "These are very volatile numbers," said Peter D'Antonio, an economist at Chemical Bank in New York.  "They bounce up and down, and that masks underlying trends.  What we're trying to get out is that the aircraft industry is going very well, but other than that, it seems to be a sluggish pace."  Some economists remained worried, however.  "The durable goods industry is one of the unfortunate casualties of the {Federal Reserve Board's} high interest rate policy that was designed to cool economic expansion to reduce inflationary pressures," said Lawrence A. Hunter, deputy chief economist at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.  "It clearly is time for the Fed to show sympathy for the economic casualties it is causing and to cease fire by lowering interest rates."  But most analysts believe that is unlikely.  Fed policymakers convened yesterday to set credit and monetary policy through early October.  Even though inflation has been moderating, pulled down by falling oil prices, the economy has showed enough strength that analysts believe the central bank would be reluctant to ease credit at the moment.  It already has let interest rates fall a few notches since the spring.  Part of the Fed's caution may stem from the numerous large upward revisions the government has made to economic data in recent months.  Although dealers reported increased car sales in July, orders for automobiles continued to decline during the month because dealers were trying to sell off excess inventories, analysts said.  The aircraft industry continued to flourish, accounting for most of the 2.3% jump in orders for transportation equipment.  Orders for non-electrical machinery, a category that includes computers, plummeted 9.7%, while orders for electrical machinery grew 1.3%.  Unfilled orders climbed 1.0% in July after increasing 0.7% in June, insuring that factories will be kept busy for some time.  United Stations Radio Networks, partly owned by entertainment entrepreneur Dick Clark, and Star Group Communications merged in a transaction valued at more than $150 million.  The new company, Unistar Communications Group Inc., estimates its radio programming entity, Unistar Radio Networks, will capture about 20% of the total network radio market.  Unistar expects combined revenue of about $90 million a year; it expects to reach more than 3,000 local radiostation affiliates and an estimated 64 million listeners.  The merger joins two closely-held companies with differing strengths -- Star Group Communications, parent of Transtar Radio Networks, primarily a programmer, and United Stations, primarily a sales organization, said Charles Persing, chief financial officer of Unistar.  Unistar will contain three separate networks.  They are Power, aimed at the 18 to 34-year-old market; Super, aimed at the 25 to 54-year-old market; and Ultra, also for the 25 to 54-year-old market.  The company said it will continue to offer affiliations to traditional and 24-hour satellite networks, and that the merger would "strengthen appeal to advertisers."  The company will provide long-form music programming and specials, news and sports coverage, and will operate eight satellite-delivered, turnkey network radio formats.  Among its programs are Solid Gold Saturday Night, U.S. Hall of Fame and Country Datebook.  Announcing a further crackdown on asbestos, the Environmental Protection Agency said it sued 34 companies and individuals found to have violated federal rules governing removal of the cancer-causing substance.  The EPA warned that it may impose much stiffer penalties than in the past for such violations, and it said it has begun using its discretionary authority to bar companies found guilty of civil asbestos-removal violations from getting federal contracts, loans or grants.  Henry Habicht, EPA deputy administrator, said the agency "intends to enforce these rules vigorously."  The agency estimates that as much as half of the asbestos removal being done nationwide doesn't conform to regulations promulgated under the Clean Air Act.  Under its new asbestos policy, the EPA will assess a minimum penalty for each violation of each subsection of its work-practice standard.  Previously, the agency levied a single charge regardless of the number of sections violated.  In addition, the EPA said it will advise Justice Department and EPA attorneys to seek more than they have in the past in out-of-court settlements of asbestos-removal cases.  The government's settlement demands will assume that violators improperly saved $20 a square foot in building renovation or demolition projects by failing to comply with the rules.  Previously, it was assumed they saved only $4 a square foot.  The new settlement guidelines are designed to eliminate any economic benefits of violating the law.  The agency's asbestos rules, which have been in effect since 1975, require that authorities be notified of asbestos-removal projects and that specific steps be taken to keep the substance out of the air.  Asbestos is known to cause cancer of the lung, chest and abdominal linings and scarring of the lung.  The agency said that asbestos fibers can become airborne for considerable periods of time if they aren't wetted down or packaged correctly.  When they settle, even routine movements can cause them to become airborne again, the agency said.  The crackdown on asbestos-removal violations follows the agency's announcement last month of a ban on almost all remaining uses of asbestos by 1997, a move that will force changes in products ranging from construction materials to automobile brake linings.  The Asbestos Information Association, an industry group, yesterday asked a federal court in Richmond, Va., to review the proposed ban.  It argued that the ban will hurt the economy and that there isn't any evidence that the substitutes for asbestos are any less harmful.  Yesterday's suits, which were filed by the Justice Department, accused schools, restaurants and apartment buildings in 11 cities of violating the asbestos rules.  The defendants could face penalties as high as $25,000 per violation per day, the EPA said.  The EPA yesterday also announced its first use of its discretionary authority to bar civil violators from federal contracts.  It said that Big Apple Wrecking Co., Bronx, N.Y., and J.Y. Arnold Co., Central City, Ky., would be barred as a result of previous violations of asbestos-removal rules.  Thomson Corp. posted first-half net income of $641 million, or $1.16 a share, up from $165 million, or 28 cents, in the year-earlier half, but $475 million of profit was a one-time gain on the sale of oil and gas assets.  Sales rose 16% to $2.29 billion from $1.98 billion.  Thomson said the weak performance of its travel division "more than offset" improved results of its newspaper and publishing groups in the first half of 1989.  The earnings were the first released since the merger of Thomson Newspapers Ltd. and International Thomson Organisation Ltd. in June.  Operating profit of Thomson's publishing group rose to $74 million in the half from $64 million a year earlier.  Operating profit of the newspaper division, which includes its North American newspapers, rose to $154 million from $144 million.  But Thomson's travel operations, which accounted for 41% of sales, showed a loss of $21 million.  Thomson said the third quarter, traditionally the strongest for the British travel industry, may show little improvement and "heavy late-season discounting will be necessary to achieve sales."  "Obviously, that won't do our financial results much good," said Alan Lewis, treasurer of Thomson.  Mr. Lewis said higher earnings from the newspaper and publishing divisions should offset a slow second-half performance by the travel group.  He said the company expects better results from its travel division in 1990.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, Thomson closed at 19.25 Canadian dollars (US$12.12), down 25 Canadian cents.  Stocks pulled out of morning losses as investors jumped in to buy cheaper shares.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average finished 3.99 higher at 2650.99, but in morning trading was down more than 20 points following Monday's 40.97-point plunge.  International Paper and Philip Morris led the Dow industrials' rise.  Philip Morris rose 1 3/4 to 157.  International Paper climbed 2 3/8 to 55 3/4 on 617,000 shares, 18% above its average daily volume.  Among the broader averages, Standard & Poor's 500-stock index rose 0.52 to 341.19; the Dow Jones Equity Market Index gained 0.14 to 320.45 and the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 0.14 to 190.11.  New York Stock Exchange volume rose to 141,930,000 shares from 136,800,000 Monday.  International Paper benefited from investors' pursuit of cyclical stocks following yesterday's durable-goods report, which pushed fears of a recession further away.  July orders for durable goods fell 1.9%.  But without defense-related purchases, orders rose 5% in July after a 5.1% increase in June.  "Investors are developing the recognition that we are not going to have a recession and that's why you are seeing strength in the oversold cyclical stocks," said Paul Lesutis, director at Provident Capital Management.  Other cyclical stocks, which rise and fall with the pace of economic activity, also gained.  Dow Chemical rose 2 3/4 to a new high of 102 3/4 on 1,222,700 shares.  Computer-related sell programs helped push stocks into a steep midmorning decline, but then buyers emerged.  Traders took that as a key sign of underlying demand for stocks.  Jack Baker, head of the equity block trading desk at Shearson Lehman Hutton, cited "good-quality buying, coupled with some (computer) program buying" as the main factors behind the rebound.  Other solid advancers among blue-chip issues included Coca-Cola Co., which rose 5/8 to 65 3/8; Eastman Kodak, which added 1 to 49 3/4, and Exxon, which firmed 1/4 to 43 1/2.  McDonald's eased 5/8 to 28 3/4 on Big Board composite volume of 1.7 million shares; Shearson Lehman Hutton lowered its investment ratings on the stock.  Georgia Gulf surged 7 1/4 to 58 3/4, well above the $55 a share offered for the company by NL Industries, and was the most active Big Board issue on composite volume of 2.6 million shares.  NL, controlled by investor Harold Simmons, said it would be prepared to raise its offer if the chemical producer's "foreseeable cash flow" justifies it.  NL added 1/8 to 24 5/8.  Anchor Glass Container, which rejected an offer of $20 a share from Mexico's Vitro S.A., remained unchanged at 20 on 1.4 million shares and traded as high as 20 7/8.  Separately, Goldman Sachs disclosed that it holds a 9.7% stake in the company.  Several other stocks linked to takeover activity and speculation also attracted buying interest.  Tambrands tacked on 2 1/4 to 73 1/2, McGraw-Hill climbed 1 7/8 to 81 7/8, Ferro rose 2 1/2 to 61, Avon Products rose 1 1/8 to 37 1/4 and Midway Airlines gained 1 5/8 to 19 3/4.  Imperial Chemical Industries jumped 2 3/4 to 84 1/8 amid speculation that the company may be considering a stock-swap merger with another British company, Wellcome PLC.  Both companies declined comment, but analysts noted that any takeover of Wellcome would face legal barriers because a charitable trust owns about 75% of its stock.  Other chemical stocks that showed strength included Vista Chemical, which went up 1 1/2 to 47 1/4; International Minerals & Chemical, up 1 1/8 to 49 1/8; Rohm & Haas, up 5/8 to 33 7/8; B.F. Goodrich, up 5/8 to 61, and Aristech Chemical, up 3/8 to 21.  Deere lost 7/8 to 60 1/8.  The company's earnings of $1.30 a share for the quarter ended in July were above the year-ago level, but below most analysts' forecasts.  TCBY Enterprises dropped 3/4 to 23 3/8.  Analysts said that sales growth in company stores open for at least one year has slowed; for the fiscal quarter ending next week, same-store sales are expected to be about the same as a year ago.  Universal Corp. advanced 1 1/8 to 36 5/8.  Kidder Peabody boosted its investment rating on the stock to "buy" from "sell" and slightly increased its estimates of fiscal 1990 and 1991 earnings.  Premark International gained 1 1/4 to 38.  Goldman Sachs placed the stock on its list of recommended issues, based on a belief that its price is relatively cheap even after adjusting for expected earnings disappointments.  GATX went up 1 1/4 to 64 3/8.  Shearson increased its short-term rating on the stock, which has trailed the market recently.  Pinnacle West Capital fell 3/4 to 12 3/4.  Some bearish investors and analysts believe the problems at the company's MeraBank thrift unit could turn out to be thornier than expected.  The American Stock Exchange Index dropped 0.72 to 375.86.  Volume totaled 11,790,000 shares.  "This is not your father's Oldsmobile" was one of last year's most widely-seen ad campaigns.  It was one of the best-remembered.  And it was so well-loved by General Motors and Oldsmobile ad agency Leo Burnett that they're about to launch a second year's worth of spots.  There's just one drawback: Since the campaign began running a year ago, Oldsmobile's car sales have fallen 8.3%, to 543,459 cars as of Aug. 10, down from 592,401 a year earlier.  The sales drop poses quite a challenge for the car maker as it prepares to introduce its "new generation" of ads.  The campaign was supposed to make the cars appealing to younger car buyers.  But the age of the average Oldsmobile driver remains 51 years, suggesting that Oldsmobile still may be your father's car.  With its new ads, the company must navigate carefully, wooing younger buyers while not alienating its dwindling older customer base.  Richard Ross, Oldsmobile's director of marketing, contends that the only problem with the campaign is that it hasn't been around long enough.  "It takes about three years for a marketing theme to really see its way down to sales," he says.  He notes that this year, Oldsmobile is offering several new models, such as a Cutlass Supreme convertible, "and we're hoping {to see} at least a 10%" sales increase.  Mr. Ross says the average age of Cutlass Supreme buyers, which was 50 when the car was introduced two years ago, is down to 45.  He also says that dealers report younger people coming into showrooms.  Last year's campaign highlighted parent/child duos such as Priscilla Presley and daughter Lisa Marie; with a $100 million ad budget, the campaign seemed ubiquitous.  This year, it will seem even more so: the budget has been increased substantially (Oldsmobile doesn't release figures), and the company says its ads will reach 30% more of its target audience than last year.  The new group of ads feature a group of celebrities -- and their children -- who might be plucked out of a textbook entitled "How to Appeal to Baby-Boomers."  Most are familiar '60s icons, with the biggest catch being former Beatle and current People coverboy Ringo Starr with his purple-haired daughter, Lee.  Other ads include Peter ("Mission Impossible") Graves with his daughter Amanda; the late Rod ("Twilight Zone") Serling's daughter Jodi; and Harry Belafonte's children, David and Gina.  One commercial also features two unknowns: 100-year-old "Pop" Ebdon and his 74-year-old son Joe Jr., who tools around in a red Cutlass Calais and shades.  To keep the campaign from getting tired, this year's ads, which make their debut Friday evening, go beyond last season's formula of celebrity and kid driving in a car.  The Ringo Starr ad, shot and scored to evoke '60s Beatles movies like "Hard Day's Night," has the drummer running through a luxury hotel, trailed by a screaming crowd of fans. (His daughter picks him up in her "fab four-door" Cutlass Supreme.)  The spot starring Mr. Graves and his daughter, meanwhile, is a takeoff of "Mission Impossible," with music, tape-recorded instructions, sinister-looking paramilitary types and all.  And in the Belafonte kids' ad, for the Tornado Trofeo, the two drive around tropical St. Croix while singing a bastardized version of Dad's hit, "The Banana Boat Song," in a perhaps unintentional satire.  Among the lyrics: "Trofeo.  Trofe-o.  It's a new generation and we want a new Olds."  Perhaps the most endearing ad may not end up running at all in its current form.  It features Noel Blanc, son of cartoon voice master Mel, walking through a cartoon-cutout house and relating -- in five different characters' voices, from Bugs Bunny to Tweety -- how his dad told him, among other things: "Doc, get a gorgeous car."  Outside, he steps into a Cutlass Supreme packed with all five cartoon characters and his father, whose only words are his immortal "That's all, folks]" However, the elder Mr. Blanc died shortly after the commercial was shot.  Ted Bell, Leo Burnett's president and director of creative services, says the Blanc family wants the ad to run as is.  "We're ambivalent," Mr. Bell says.  "It's a little strange."  He adds that the agency will do some research before deciding whether to re-cut the commercial without the elder Mr. Blanc.  Despite Oldsmobile's disappointing sales so far, Mr. Bell is convinced the campaign can help turn around the car brand.  "Nobody is expecting miracles here.  It takes two to three years," he says.  "But we're moving in the right direction."  Mr. Bell also believes the new car models being introduced will help revive Oldsmobile's image, making it seem a little younger.  The advertising to date, he suggests, has simply been a bit ahead of its time.  The ads "have got to lead {the product} a little bit," he says.  "Last year, the products weren't as 'new generation' as this year.  When you get the marriage of product and the campaign, that's when it begins to work."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Bermuda Department of Tourism, Hamilton, Bermuda, awarded its $15 million account to Omnicom Group unit DDB Needham, New York.  The account had been handled for the past 17 years at FCB/Leber Katz Partners, New York.  In the final presentations, DDB Needham bested HDM, Ogilvy & Mather and the incumbent to win the business.  PROTEST ANNOUNCED: A coalition of more than 20 Black, Hispanic and health organizations is expected to announce a protest of the marketing practices of malt liquor makers at a news conference in Washington this morning.  Industry executives say the organizations are demanding that malt liquor marketers stop targeting minority communities and limit the alcohol content of malt liquor to 5%.  Malt liquors range in alcohol content from 5.6% to 10.9%.  WHO'S NEWS: WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson unit named Dominique Simonin chairman and chief executive of JWT Europe, and appointed Miles Colebrook president and chief operating officer of the European operation.  Both had been regional co-presidents. . . .  Lee Kovel was named executive creative director at HDM, Los Angeles.  He was previously group creative director at J. Walter Thompson, New York.  Cie.  Industrielle's chairman, Jean-Marc Vernes, won the backing of the Paris-based holding company's board to fight a takeover bid by Cie.  Financiere de Suez, but he wouldn't indicate how he intends to defend against France's biggest-ever takeover offer.  Mr. Vernes said directors voted 7-2 to give their support.  Asked to specify how he would seek to fend off the bid, Mr. Vernes said he had until next Wednesday under stock market regulations to unveil a counteroffer.  He added that one of his allies will be Italy's Finanziaria Ferruzzi S.p.A.  Ferruzzi controls the sugar group Beghin-Say S.A., of which Mr. Vernes also is chairman, and also controls insurer La Fondiaria Assicurazioni S.p.A.  Cie.  Industrielle's principal asset is a 40% stake in Groupe Victoire, France's second-biggest insurance company.  Some say Mr. Vernes hasn't any choice but to mount a counteroffer to Suez's offer of 23.7 billion French francs (US$3.59 billion) for Cie.  Industrielle and Victoire.  But under French stock market regulations, any counterbid would have to be at least 5% higher than Suez's bid and many doubt that Mr. Vernes will be able to raise the necessary funds.  Michael Steinmetz, the 31-year-old plant manager of Steinmetz & Sons Machinery Co., is frustrated and angry.  Because current laws make it difficult to pass on family businesses without enormous, even devastating taxes, he frets about the future of his family's Moscow, Pa., company, which makes plastic parts for machinery and packaging.  The thriving business, started in 1967, has a net worth of close to $5 million and employs 20 people.  But because the company has grown so much in the past five years, if the father passed away today the estate would owe state inheritance taxes of $300,000 immediately and more than $3 million in cash over the next 15 years in federal inheritance taxes, the son says.  "Such tax payments would keep us from needed expansion, new hiring and investing in research and development," Michael Steinmetz frets, adding that the family could be forced to sell the business.  "My 63-year-old father, Floyd, struggled for 22 years to build this business. . . .  It's a tragedy he may not be able to pass the company on to his children."  Though tax reform was allegedly aimed at giving small business a break, recent changes in the estate-tax area have hurt family businesses more than they've helped.  While taxes have been eliminated on certain smaller inheritances, the rates are still very high for big estates being passed along, totaling 20% to 55% for amounts up to $3 million and 55% or 60% for amounts over $3 million.  For small business, the biggest blow came in 1987 tax legislation, with the elimination of what was called the estate-tax freeze.  Before 1987, family-owned companies could avoid heavy future inheritance taxes by recapitalizing, giving the parents preferred stock and selling or giving the children all the common stock of the business.  Through this setup, parents would get a steady income through preferred dividends while the taxes on the growth of the business beginning with the day of the transaction were passed on to the children.  Because preferred stock remains valued at par regardless of how much the business grows, the recapitalization essentially froze the value of the portion owned by the parents.  Thus, the parents' deaths wouldn't trigger enormous estate taxes.  The Steinmetz family's worries arrived with the elimination of that loophole.  And the Steinmetz fear is shared by close to 20 million small, family-owned businesses in the U.S. Accountants say that thousands of businesses already have been sold after being hit with the tax burden.  Although there are several bills in Congress to restore the estate-tax freeze, small businesses so far haven't been able to win enough legislative allies to get it passed this year, despite intense lobbying efforts by accountants, attorneys, farmers, ranchers, wine makers, grocers and other trade groups.  A bill in the House of Representatives is stalled behind capital-gains and Medicare catastrophic care legislative efforts.  And in the Senate, three bills are unlikely to pass in 1989 unless the sponsors can figure out how to recoup $1.5 billion in estimated tax revenues that would be lost through 1995 by restoring the freeze.  "The best advice I can give small-business men this year is not to die," says a legislative aide to U.S. Sen. John Heinz (R., Pa.).  It was to Sen. Heinz that the younger Mr. Steinmetz complained about onerous estate taxes.  Besides the estate-tax freeze, there are some other ways to ease the inheritance-tax bite, but none is as effective and none works well enough to protect the parents' estate from paying a big tax if the business grows rapidly.  "Without the estate-tax freeze, it's going to be much harder for a closely held business to survive in the future after the original owner's death without selling the business," says Bruce Thee, who heads the tax department in Reno, Nev., of Grant Thornton, a major accounting firm.  Even if the original owner gives his children significant portions of business in advance of death, as permitted by tax law, the estate-tax penalty can be overwhelming as long as any ownership is retained.  That fact has Kelly Hiatt concerned.  Mr. Hiatt, president of A&K Earth Movers Inc. in Fallon, Nev., gave each of his three sons 25% ownership in 1987, using gift-tax exclusions, leaving himself with 25%.  "The business is currently worth about $1.8 million -- my portion would be $450,000 -- but it could easily go to $3 million or $4 million in net worth over the next few years," the 55-year-old Mr. Hiatt says.  "This means that my estate would still have to pay a pretty onerous tax on the increased valuation."  To avoid saddling his children with those inheritance taxes, Mr. Hiatt may have to sell his 25% before he dies.  "I'm worried because I've seen too many families being forced to abandon their businesses because big estate taxes would paralyze its operations in the future."  Linda Marcus, who advises small businesses for First National City Bank in Chicago, says that business owners who are willing to plan early may ease the estate-tax impact.  She cites one client, a retail store owner, who, when his business began expanding, had his two sons organize separate corporations in the growth areas.  "In that way, he avoided massive estate taxes by giving up ownership," says Ms. Marcus.  However, she adds, "most fathers aren't willing to give up business control so early because they want to remain powerful or fear their kids aren't smart enough."  Arthur Levy, who runs a CPA firm by the same name, says one client passed along his company in the form of a gift to his son just as the business was coming out of bankruptcy.  "It wasn't worth anything then, so it qualified under the $10,000-a-year tax-free gift rule.  But two years later, the company sold some real estate for millions of dollars, which avoided inheritance tax," Mr. Levy said.  Another way to ease estate taxes is to set up a buy-sell agreement between the parent owner and children before death, notes Sam Deutscher, a tax partner at Israeloff, Trattner & Co., a Valley Stream, N.Y., accounting firm.  "If based on a fair market value at the time of the agreement, this setup can avoid estate taxes on appreciation in value," he says.  Increasingly, business owners are buying life insurance to pay for estate taxes when the businesses pass to their children.  Arthur Hoffman, a tax partner with Spicer & Oppenheim, a New York accounting firm, notes that a policy called "second-to-die life" avoids estate taxes entirely but has a high annual cost.  "The policy pays off after both spouses die," Mr. Hoffman says.  "But to avoid estate taxes, the children must own and pay for the policy."  Joan Vines, a senior manager in taxes for Peat Marwick in Washington, D.C., observes that an estate can defer inheritance taxes for five years and then pay them over the next 10 years under certain conditions.  "The heirs must begin paying annual interest on the estate the first year," she says.  "The decedent must have owned more than 20% of the business, there should be 15 or fewer shareholders in the business and the value of the business must exceed 35% of the adjusted gross value {the value after gifts} of the estate."  But despite all these tactics, without the estate-tax freeze, "there really isn't very much a small-business man can do to avoid estate taxes," says Byrle M. Abbin, managing director of Arthur Andersen & Co.'s office of federal tax services in Washington.  "Until Congress acts or the Internal Revenue Service eases its interpretation of the 1987 law eliminating the freeze, the small-business man will suffer."  Nixdorf Computer AG posted a first-half pretax operating loss of 297 million marks ($151.7 million), but management says the worst is over as recovery programs begin to take hold.  The loss at the troubled West German computer company dwarfed the 26 million mark operating loss it had in the 1988 first half, despite a 5% rise in sales to 2.43 billion marks from 2.31 billion marks.  The second quarter pretax loss of 149 million marks was roughly equal to the 148 million mark loss in the first quarter.  Chairman Klaus Luft said Nixdorf likely will post a loss for all of 1989, despite expectations of a second-half profit.  "We believe the reversal of cost rises and an increase in second-half sales will help us along the road to recovery," he said.  He denied speculation that Nixdorf could be put on the auction block soon.  He said the concern is trying to reduce research costs through agreements with other producers of computers and software, particularly as part of Nixdorf's effort to adapt to such new standards as the Unix operating system.  Live Entertainment Inc. officials dismissed the possibility that the murder of the company's chairman and chief executive officer may have been related to any brush with organized crime.  Jose E. Menendez, 45 years old, and his wife, Kitty, 44, were found shot to death in their Beverly Hills home late Sunday evening.  Yesterday, the Beverly Hills Police Department declined to provide any additional information on their investigation.  Roger R. Smith, acting president of Live Entertainment, said, "I regard any suggestion of {organized crime involvement} as bizarre and offensive."  Live Entertainment is a major distributor and retailer of video and recorded entertainment.  Questions regarding possible organized crime involvement in the killings have been raised because of Live's recent purchase of BeckZack Corp., which owns the 81-store Strawberries audio and home-video retailing chain in the Northeast.  Live purchased the company from Morris Levy, who was convicted in May 1988 of conspiring to extort payments from a record wholesaler.  He remains free pending an appeal of his conviction.  An FBI affidavit filed in federal court in New York in connection with an investigation of Mr. Levy quoted an unnamed federal informant as saying that a faction of the Genovese crime family owned an interest in the Strawberries chain.  It isn't clear whether federal investigators ever followed up on the informant's statement, and the matter wasn't mentioned at Mr. Levy's trial.  The assistant U.S. attorney who handled the Levy prosecution said he couldn't comment beyond the affidavit.  The affidavit called Mr. Levy "a lucrative source of cash and property for leaders of the Genovese" crime family.  Mr. Smith said Live Entertainment spent six months in an exhaustive process of due diligence before completing the purchase of BeckZack in June for $40.5 million.  "We engaged lawyers who specialized in white-collar criminal areas.  We found the operation of Strawberries to be whistle clean," Mr. Smith said.  Mr. Smith said Mr. Levy had owned a 90% stake in the company.  He declined to identify the other owners but insisted none of them had any organized crime ties.  "There was no reason for any suspicion about any" of the other owners, he said.  In Hollywood yesterday, rumors circulated that a neighbor had spotted two gunmen entering the Menendez home after the family's two sons went out Sunday evening.  But the police department declined to confirm the rumors.  An investigator for the Los Angeles County Coroner said earlier that the murder appeared to be "a {professional} hit."  Yesterday Live Entertainment's stock continued to slide, falling $1.50 to $17 a share in national over-the-counter trading, though industry analysts and company officials expect Live to continue on a steady course of growth.  In the short-term, "There's a cloud over the stock," said Keith E. Benjamin, an entertainment analyst at Silberg Rosenthal & Co. who has recommended the stock.  "But the value he {Menendez} built didn't go away when he did."  Live Entertainment, which is 49%-owned by Carolco Pictures Inc., was formed in February 1988 by the combination of International Video Entertainment Inc., an ailing home entertainment software concern, and Lieberman Enterprises Inc., a Minneapolis-based distributor of recorded music, videocassettes and computer software.  Mr. Menendez was credited with being responsible for the sharp gains in revenue and earnings at the company.  Such was Mr. Menendez's value that Live Entertainment took out a $15 million key-man life insurance policy on the executive.  In 1988, the company had net income of $17.5 million, or $3.22 a share, on sales of $352.1 million.  "The stock became known in the investment community.  There were three analysts really tracking the stock, and all of us were positive," said Mr. Benjamin.  Analysts noted that Mr. Menendez has sharply cut costs at Live Entertainment, aggressively pursued new business and hired new executives to head the International Video Entertainment and Lieberman Entertainment divisions.  "Basically there are people there who are capable of handling the operations," said Lisbeth Barron, an analyst at McKinley Allsopp Inc. "Essentially, there isn't anything to indicate yet that the company won't be right on track."  As summer began, Larry Gordon was in a position to write his own ticket.  At 53, he'd been in the entertainment business since starting as a gofer to TV producer Aaron Spelling in the early 1960s.  He'd churned out beach-party and motorcycle-gang movies, produced television shows and movies.  He'd delivered his share of turkeys along with the hits.  He'd run a studio, but left when the stress nearly killed him.  But throughout this time, like nearly everyone else in Hollywood, he'd had to sell.  And Mr. Gordon was a great seller.  ABC movie chief Brandon Stoddard recalls when Mr. Gordon and TV producer Aaron Spelling pitched him an idea that became the series "Matt Houston": "They were jumping up on couches, on tops of tables, screaming at each other, screaming at me, making it up as they went along.  It was wild."  Nevertheless, until a few days ago he was still a supplicant.  That was about to change.  Last Friday, as he reached the end of his three-year, non-exclusive "first look" deal with News Corp.'s Fox Inc., he was perhaps Hollywood's most successful independent producer.  "Die Hard" had been a blockbuster.  But "Field of Dreams" drew even more admiration because, though it was a marketing nightmare -- "the lowest concept in the world," as movie chief Thomas P. Pollock of Universal Pictures describes it -- it has grossed nearly $60 million to date.  Major studios wanted to hire Mr. Gordon as an executive, make co-production deals with him; financing interests wanted to back him.  Mr. Gordon told friends he was putting something together, something that would transform him into a buyer -- a man who could say "yes" to movies.  "He'd been very frustrated dealing with the studios," says a major agent.  But he didn't want to run one: "He doesn't enjoy bureaucracy," the agent says.  Then all of a sudden Mr. Gordon stopped talking, and his friends knew something was up.  That something emerged when he announced that a major Japanese corporation had given him a virtual carte blanche to make movies.  Mr. Gordon's attorney, Peter Dekom of Bloom, Dekom & Hergott, had been retained by JVC/Victor Co. of Japan to look at opportunities in the movie business.  JVC/Victor, 50%-owned by mammoth Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., wanted American entertainment "software" to go with its consumer electronics hardware; with revenue of $6.2 billion, it had the resources.  JVC/Victor looked at buying a major studio, Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc., but one of its major assets, its film library, was "encumbered" by long-term deals in several foreign countries.  Columbia wanted $30 a share, sources said, which JVC/Victor felt was too high.  JVC/Victor also felt there were too many intangibles in the deal: What was the management worth?  The good will?  It was better, the Japanese decided, to "grow their own company, to learn the business," Mr. Dekom recalls.  So he matched JVC/Victor with Mr. Gordon, forming Largo Entertainment.  The name comes from Larry Gordon's name, "but they looked it up," a spokeswoman for Largo says, and found out it was a musical term meaning slow and dignified.  It fit.  "Now when I wake up in the morning, I can make a movie," Mr. Gordon crows.  Foreign investors have a long history of burning their fingers when they try their hand at the peculiarly American business of making Hollywood movies.  But entertainment industry insiders agree that this time, somebody's doing it right.  JVC/Victor will give Mr. Gordon more than $100 million to start, which will fund perhaps three major films at the studio average of $20 million plus another $10 million to release each film.  Then, with various triggers, Mr. Dekom says, more capital can be infused, either to make an expensive movie or an acquisition.  Half a billion dollars is a possibility, but by the same token, if six or seven films in a row are bombs, JVC could pull out.  "People who come in from the outside and deal with the motion picture business on a power basis, dealing directly, get killed," says Mr. Dekom.  "You need to get an insider."  And Mr. Gordon is an insider, albeit with an outsider's style.  He is also one of the most popular producers in Hollywood.  "Everyone's happy about this," says producer Sherry Lansing, "because they put a real film maker in charge and gave him $100 million and complete autonomy to make movies."  Adds Fox Inc. Chairman Barry Diller: "It's a great choice both ways.  This is a significant activity, not the normal hype that passes for production announcements in this town.  There's clearly substance on both sides."  Mr. Gordon's forte is making big films with big stars: Bruce Willis in "Die Hard," Eddie Murphy in "48 Hours," Sylvester Stallone in "Lock Up."  JVC/Victor wants to do this, too.  Isamu Tomitsuka, associate director and general manager of JVC's audio and video software group, talks of making an "E.T." or a "Batman."  Mr. Tomitsuka, now back in Japan, worked in Hollywood for nearly eight years, seeking films for JVC to distribute in Japan.  That's when he became friends with both Mr. Gordon and Mr. Dekom.  "The maximum commitment is unlimited," says Mr. Dekom.  "There's a way for Larry to green-light a $40 million picture without having to talk to anyone if he wants."  Mr. Gordon will be able to function almost like a studio chief, developing and making movies and owning half of the new venture.  He'll cherry-pick from among the major studios for distribution of each film.  But because he won't have to pre-sell home video and television rights to finance the movies, Largo will retain all the profit potential except for relatively small distribution fees.  Aggressive and sometimes confrontational, Mr. Gordon is a "scrapper," an "outsider," according to acquaintances.  He's a salesman and a deal-maker with mainstream commercial tastes, a restlessly energetic producer who doesn't relish laboring over the ninth draft of a script and apparently doesn't function well in a large corporation.  He was president of what is now Fox Inc.'s film and TV unit from 1984-86 until he left with heart problems after tumultuous relations with Mr. Diller, whose tastes and style are less brash than Mr. Gordon's.  Mr. Diller calls reports of his stormy relationship with Mr. Gordon "a myth -- we've been friends for 20 years and were friends throughout the entire experience."  Indeed, Mr. Gordon enjoys good relationships all over town.  "He must have been the most popular guy at the most popular fraternity in college, and he's the same here, in this Hollywood fraternity," says one executive.  "He can dance you across the room with the best of them."  Mr. Gordon grew up in Yazoo City, Miss., and attended Tulane University, where he was in a fraternity and says he "majored in the French Quarter."  He started in television, and has kept a hand in it ever since, still dabbling as recently as 1985.  He made a short-lived series called "Dog and Cat" in 1977, starring a then-unknown actress named Kim Basinger.  Another failed series was "Renegades," starring Patrick Swayze.  Despite his eye for future stars, he was never very successful at television, perhaps because episodic TV requires a tolerance for grinding routine.  Mr. Gordon's restless nature was more suited to the movie business.  He says he learned the business as head of world-wide production at American International Pictures, a specialist in low-budget exploitation movies.  Then Columbia hired him to produce low-budget action features.  His first was also the first for director Walter Hill, a movie about street-fighting in New Orleans called "Hard Times."  They made it for $3.1 million, recalls Mr. Hill, with "very close to a million" of that going to star Charles Bronson.  The film turned the trick of wringing from critics rave reviews for Mr. Bronson, and made a nice profit.  Mr. Gordon was off and running, and his relationship with Mr. Hill eventually led to the blockbuster "48 Hours."  Mr. Gordon's production entity, Gordon Co., will remain at Fox to finish its ongoing projects, the next of which is "Family Business" with Dustin Hoffman.  Mr. Gordon has already started to run Largo from his office there.  Mr. Gordon has accumulated a large number of potential film properties; those that haven't already been committed to other studios will be available for Largo, which therefore could give the go-ahead to a picture in a matter of weeks.  Gordon Co. will continue to be run by Mr. Gordon's brother, Charles Gordon, who is expected to join Largo eventually.  The Japanese were attracted by Mr. Gordon's background in action films, which tend to play better than comedies in Japan and elsewhere.  "Larry is 100% entertainment-oriented," JVC's Mr. Tomitsuka says.  He would rather have large audiences than an Academy Award, the executive adds.  "Japanese films are almost impossible to export to the international market," Mr. Tomitsuka says.  "Hollywood movies can be sold world-wide."  While JVC/Victor-financed films may help sell a few more of the company's videocassette players, Mr. Tomitsuka makes it clear that the "software" business is an end in itself.  Software, which the company defines as including blank tapes, makes up about 13% of its revenue.  A spokesman says JVC/Victor's short-term goal is to have software sales make up 15% of revenue and eventually 20%.  But Mr. Gordon doesn't have to make films that cater to his corporate partners.  His bankroll allows him to finance films without having to prove to anybody that the film has overseas box-office potential before cameras can roll.  "Larry's wanted to run his own race for a long time," says a top agent.  "But he's not a corporate animal, so this is perfect for him."  Mr. Gordon himself produces this line to sum up: "As a career move, this is my field of dreams."  ---  Jacob M. Schlesinger in Tokyo contributed to this article.  Negotiations for British Airways and KLM Royal Dutch Airlines to each take a 20% stake in Sabena World Airlines, the operating subsidiary of Belgian national carrier Sabena, should be completed in time for a late October signing, according to a British Airways official.  Andy Geary Stevens, British Airways managing director for Benelux countries, told Belgian journalists the three-way talks had been slowed by the European vacation season, according to one Belgian financial daily news report.  A British Airways spokesman confirmed the remarks.  A Sabena spokesman confirmed that talks are continuing, but taking longer than expected.  A definitive agreement had been expected last month.  The BA spokesman, who requested anonymity, said the three companies should be able to present a report on their proposed link-up to the European Community Commission by the end of August.  None of the companies have disclosed the amounts of the investments involved in Sabena World Airlines.  BICC PLC, a British cable and construction group, reported a 37% gain in interim pretax profit because of the group's European and North American cable units.  In the first six months, world markets were favorable, BICC said, with a "particularly marked" demand for telecommunications cable and power cable refurbishment in the U.K. and U.S.  Profit climbed to #93 million ($146.3 million) from #68 million ($107 million) a year earlier.  Pretax profit was sharply above market forecasts, which ranged between #80 million and #86 million.  BICC said its major marketplaces of power, communications and construction remain strong, as infrastructure spending in the major world economies continues to expand.  The company expects this progress to persist during the second half of the year.  HealthVest said its board removed David L. Whelan as chairman and Elliott H. Weir Jr. as president of this real estate investment trust.  The trust said that the men will remain trustees.  Stephen R. Jepson, one of three independent trustees, said the board removed Messrs.  Whelan and Weir because of their previous positions with Healthcare International Inc., a troubled operator of health-care concerns that missed a $4 million lease payment to HealthVest due in early August.  Mr. Whelan resigned as president and Mr. Weir resigned as executive vice president of Healthcare International in late July, after Healthcare International said that it would report a fourth-quarter loss and that it was facing cash-flow problems.  Messrs.  Whelan and Weir couldn't be reached for comment.  HealthVest was begun with four properties leased to Healthcare International properties.  It now owns more than two dozen health-care related properties leased by Healthcare International and others, but Healthcare International still is HealthVest's largest tenant.  HealthVest said it hired Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. as its financial adviser to evaluate the current status of Healthcare International.  COLOMBIA STARTED extraditing an alleged drug finance boss to the U.S.  Eduardo Martinez, who is said to manage funds for the Medellin cartel, faces U.S. conspiracy charges for his alleged role in a billion-dollar money laundering scheme.  He was arrested during a crackdown on drug lords after the murders of a judge, police colonel and presidential candidate last week.  Meanwhile, Colombia's judges, who went on strike to protest drug violence, announced they would return to work.  And Colombia said it wouldn't accept any help from U.S. troops in fighting drug traffickers.  Attorney General Thornburgh issued a "dozen most wanted list" of Colombian drug lords and warned the U.S. can't bow to fears it will be a target.  ---  Gorbachev conferred with Poland's Communist chief by phone and agreed that solving Poland's problems is impossible without the party, a spokesman said.  The conversation came as Solidarity activist Mazowiecki held talks on forming a government.  He is expected to be elected prime minister tomorrow.  ---  Voyager 2 found at least one complete ring of debris orbiting Neptune.  The discovery surprised scientists, who were trying to relocate one of two partial rings -- called ring arcs -- that appeared in pictures the spacecraft sent back to earth Aug. 11.  The new photos also show the second arc and suggest that it may be a complete ring as well.  ---  An East German was shot to death in a struggle with Hungarian border guards as he tried to escape to the West.  Bonn said it was closing its embassy in Prague because it was overwhelmed by refugees.  It closed its embassy in Budapest and its mission in East Berlin this month because of the crush of East Germans trying to flee.  ---  The EPA said it sued 34 firms and individuals that have violated federal rules on asbestos removal.  The agency also warned that it has begun to use its authority to bar companies found guilty of asbestos-removal violations from getting federal contracts, loans and grants.  ---  A Lithuanian commission denounced the Red Army's occupation of the republic in 1940 and said a vote by its Parliament to join the Soviet Union was invalid.  The parliamentary panel's views were published in official Lithuanian newspapers on the eve of protests marking the 50th anniversary of a Nazi-Soviet pact to carve up Europe.  ---  Fuel shortages hit the Armenian capital of Yerevan, and strikes in neighboring Azerbaijan entered their second day as hundreds of thousands demonstrated in the city of Baku.  The shortages and unrest increased tensions in the Soviet republics, where more than 100 Armenians and Azeris have died in ethnic turmoil in the past 18 months.  ---  South African police used whips, tear gas and rubber bullets in clashes with schoolchildren near Cape Town, and they arrested 113 hospital workers in the city.  In Durban, nine white activists were arrested.  Conflict has increased in the past few days as a campaign to defy apartheid and emergency restrictions has spread to most major cities.  ---  Huey P. Newton was found shot to death on the sidewalk of a drug-infested neighborhood in Oakland, Calif.  Newton, 47, was a co-founder of the militant Black Panther Party in the 1960s.  The Panthers advocated armed self-defense for blacks and had frequent clashes with police.  They also ran breakfast programs for ghetto children.  ---  Eight African leaders met in Harare, Zimbabwe, to try to shore up a faltering cease-fire in Angola.  Since a peace accord was reached in Zaire in June, truce violations have raised fears the Angolan civil war could escalate and threaten complex, U.S.-brokered peace accords signed by Angola, South Africa and Cuba in December.  ---  Najibullah outlined ways to end Afghanistan's civil war.  Diplomats said the Afghan president's plan drops his previous insistence on a cease-fire before talks but doesn't meet Moslem guerrilla demands that he step down.  Western experts had expected the U.S.-backed guerrillas to oust Najibullah soon after Soviet forces withdrew Feb. 15.  ---  The Nicaraguan opposition would return confiscated land and dismantle much of the army if elected in February, according to a draft platform obtained by the Associated Press.  The coalition also envisions maintaining state control of foreign trade while freeing the domestic market.  The coalition ranges from communists to conservatives.  ---  Arafat warned the PLO may rethink its peace drive unless the U.S. and Israel respond to it.  He also said at a news conference in Amman that the PLO may call for full-scale civil disobedience in the Israeli-occupied territories.  Washington wants the PLO to accept some form of Israeli proposal for elections in the West Bank and Gaza.  ---  Died: Diana Vreeland, fashion editor, in New York City, of a heart attack.  NL Industries Inc., a company controlled by investor Harold Simmons, said it offered to help Georgia Gulf Corp. recapitalize or go private in a leveraged buy-out that would pay Georgia Gulf shareholders $55 a share, or about $1.38 billion.  Mr. Simmons said the move is intended as a friendly proposal that would give him a significant interest in the chemical concern, allow Georgia Gulf's management to retain their stake and give shareholders a nice return on their stock.  But the offer, made in a letter to Georgia Gulf Chairman James R. Kuse, also could be the first salvo in a takeover battle between Georgia Gulf and the aggressive corporate acquirer.  Mr. Simmons, who can be a tenacious foe when companies don't want to negotiate, has been prowling for a major acquisition for about a year.  The market apparently saw the offer as just a first step.  Georgia Gulf's stock soared $7.25 on the news to close well above $55 at $58.75 in heavy New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  It was the most active issue on the Big Board, with 2.6 million shares changing hands.  NL, a Houston-based chemicals concern, said in a letter to Mr. Kuse that it believes Georgia Gulf's cash flow could easily handle the debt taken on in a transaction paying shareholders $55 a share.  NL also said it is willing to discuss a transaction at a higher price if Georgia Gulf can show that it has the cash flow to justify it.  Georgia Gulf already has gone through one successful leveraged buy-out.  Its management bought the company for about $250 million from Georgia Pacific in 1984, and all that debt has been repaid, leaving the company without debt.  Mr. Simmons says current management owns about 18% of the stock, and all Georgia Gulf employees combined might own as much as 25%.  Mr. Simmons said he and NL would like to participate with Georgia Gulf's management in a buy-out because "we'd like management to stay there.  We think they're good."  In Atlanta, Georgia Gulf declined comment on the letter.  J. Landis Martin, NL president and chief executive officer, said that NL doesn't have any current plans to combine NL and Georgia Gulf, in part because there is only "modest" overlap between their businesses.  Mr. Martin said that in a brief discussion with Mr. Kruse, Mr. Kruse said Georgia Gulf would respond to the offer "at an appropriate time."  Clearly, NL's management could benefit from a buy-out.  Mr. Kuse owns more than 1.7 million Georgia Gulf shares, which would have a value of more than $93.5 million in such a $55-a-share transaction.  According to Wealth Monitors, an investment newsletter that is recommending the stock, Mr. Kuse bought the shares for $250,000 in the earlier leveraged buy-out.  Other Georgia Gulf officers and directors also have significant stock holdings.  The company has been reporting improved earnings as demand for its commodity and specialty chemicals, used in construction products and plastics, has increased.  For the six months ended June 30, Georgia Gulf reported net income of $104.7 million, or $4.04 a share, on sales of $610 million, up from year-earlier $86.1 million, or $3 a share, on sales of $498.3 million.  NL said it is willing to contribute its 9.9% stake in Georgia Gulf's approximately 25 million shares and warrants outstanding to the equity in a leveraged buy-out.  In a leveraged buy-out, a company is acquired in a transaction financed largely through debt, which is ultimately repaid through asset sales and cash flow from the target company.  Both Mr. Simmons and Mr. Martin said they hope Georgia Gulf is willing to talk with them.  But if it isn't, it may well discover how persistent Mr. Simmons can be.  When he acquired NL in 1986, he successfully challenged the company's poison pill anti-takeover measure in court.  Then, when legal appeals stalled his takeover effort, he dropped a tender offer for NL and bought enough NL shares in the open market to oust NL's board.  Mr. Simmons owns 88% of Valhi Inc., which in turn now owns 66% of NL.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Texas Utilities Co. -- a $300 million, two-part issue of first mortgage bonds by underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The $200 million of 9 1/2% first mortgage bonds due Aug. 1, 1999, were priced at 99.84 to yield 9.523%.  The 10-year issue is noncallable until June 1, 1999, and was priced at a yield spread 123 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  The $100 million of 10% first mortgage bonds due Aug. 1, 2019, were priced at 98.518 to yield 10.157%.  The 30-year bonds are noncallable for five years and were priced at a yield spread 185 basis points above the 30-year Treasury bond.  The offering is rated Baa-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B by Standard & Poor's Corp.  @ MUNICIPALS  Arizona Department of Transportation -- $360 million of 1989 resolution transportation excise tax revenue bonds (Maricopa County Regional Area Road Fund), Series A, due 1990-2001 and 2005, tentatively priced by a Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. group to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.10% in 2005.  Serial bonds are priced to yield to 7% in 2001.  There are $126 million of 7% term bonds due 2005.  The bonds are insured and rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  University of Maryland System -- $95.3 million of auxiliary facility and tuition revenue bonds, 1989 Series B, with current interest bonds due 1990-1999, 2007 and 2009, and capital appreciation bonds due 2000-2004, tentatively priced by an Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. group to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to 7.10% in 2007.  Current interest serial bonds are tentatively priced at par to yield to 6.75% in 1999.  There are $21,955,000 of 7% term bonds due 2007, priced to yield 7.10%, and $12.4 million of 6% term bonds due 2009, priced to yield 7.05%.  Capital appreciation bonds yield to maturity from 6.80% in 2000 to 6.90% in 2002-2004.  The bonds are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and double-A-plus by S&P.  Hampton Roads Sanitation District, Va. -- $65 million of primary pledge sewer revenue bonds, Series 1989, due 1990-2001, 2005 and 2009, through a Dillon, Read & Co. group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and S&P, were priced to yield from 5.90% in 1990 to 7.20% in 2009.  Serial bonds, all of which carry 7.10% coupons, are priced to yield to 6.90% in 2001.  Bonds due 2005 are priced at par to yield 7.10%, and bonds due 2009 are priced at par to yield 7.20%.  Board of Trustees of the University of Alabama -- $59.8 million of University of Alabama at Birmingham general revenue bonds, Series 1989, with current interest bonds due 1990-2001 and 2009, and capital appreciation bonds due 2002-2005, tentatively priced by a Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. group to yield from 6% in 1990 to about 7.22% in 2009.  Current interest serial bonds are tentatively priced to yield to 7.05% in 2001.  There are $11,855,000 of 7 1/8% term bonds due 2009, priced at 99 to yield 7.22%.  Capital appreciation bonds yield to maturity from 7.05% in 2002 to 7.15% in 2005.  The underwriters expect ratings of single-A-1 from Moody's and double-A-minus from S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  Nippon Light Metal Co. (Japan) -- $300 million of bonds due Sept. 7, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd. Guaranteed by Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct. 2, 1989, through Aug. 31, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 30.  Ishihara Sangyo Kaisha Ltd. (Japan) -- $250 million of bonds due Sept. 8, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Sept. 21, 1989, through Aug. 24, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Aug. 29.  National Bank of Hungary -- 75 million European currency units of 10% bonds due Sept. 26, 1996, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 10% less full fees, via Kredietbank SA Luxembourgeoise.  Fees 1 7/8.  Inter-American Development Bank (agency) -- 300 million Swiss francs of bonds in two parts via Credit Suisse.  First part is 100 million francs maturing Sept. 13, 1999, with 5 3/4% coupon issued at 101 1/4 to yield 5.58%.  Second part is 200 million francs maturing Sept. 13, 2004, with 6% coupon issued at 101 1/4 to yield 5.87%.  Finnish Export Kredit -- As much as 100 million Swiss francs of 8 1/4% bonds due Oct. 2, 1992, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 7.57% via Banque Paribas Suisse.  Guaranteed by Republic of Finland.  Redemption at the borrower's discretion in either Swiss francs or in U.S. dollars at strike price of 1.62 francs per dollar.  WESTVACO Corp. directors boosted the quarterly dividend on common stock by 8.7%, to 25 cents a share from 23 cents, payable Oct. 2 to shareholders of record Sept. 6.  Westvaco also posted a 7.1% rise in profit for the fiscal third quarter, ended July 31; John A. Luke, president and chief executive officer, said in a statement that Westvaco's long-term business plans "have been very rewarding."  As of Nov. 30, the big New York paper, packaging and chemicals company had 64.7 million shares outstanding.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Westvaco's shares closed up 25 cents at $30.625.  The Justice Department and Securities and Exchange Commission apparently are investigating possible insider trading in connection with the merger agreement between Bristol-Myers Co. and Squibb Corp.  Both companies make pharmaceuticals.  The securities fraud unit in the U.S. attorney's office in New York issued a subpoena to Dow Jones & Co. seeking copies of all news reports related to the merger that were published by Dow Jones wire services from July 25 through July 27, including the time the stories ran.  The subpoena refers to a grand jury inquiry of "an alleged violation" of U.S. mail fraud and wire fraud statutes.  At Squibb, executives were unaware of the U.S. attorney's investigation, according to a spokeswoman for the company, based in Princeton, N.J.  But she added that Squibb officials have been questioned by the SEC about details surrounding the proposed merger, which involves a transfer of Bristol-Myers stock valued at $12.1 billion to Squibb shareholders.  She added that the company understood the SEC inquiry to be "routine."  "Squibb is aware that the SEC is asking questions that are routine in nature for any large merger, and that to our knowledge neither Squibb nor Bristol is the target of any investigation," the spokeswoman said.  Neither the U.S. attorney's office nor the SEC would confirm or deny whether they are conducting an investigation of the two companies.  A review of trading in Squibb's common shares on the New York Stock Exchange in the days preceding the merger announcement shows spurts in the stock's price and trading volume.  Last night, Big Board officials couldn't be reached for comment.  On July 26, the day before the announcement, Squibb stock closed at $87.75 each, up 4% from the $84.375 closing price the day before.  July 26 also saw the heaviest trading volume for Squibb stock in a week, as rumors about a merger swept through the market.  On July 26 Dow Jones's Professional Investor Report news service published a story giving details of widespread speculation by securities analysts about a possible takeover in the pharmaceutical industry.  That story referred to a rise in Squibb's stock price in the two preceding days.  According to the story, analysts and traders said the activity in Squibb stock "couldn't have been anything but vague and wishful takeover thinking."  The Bristol-Myers-Squibb merger agreement, which will lead to the world's second-largest drug company, had its beginnings in a series of meetings between the chairmen of the two companies, Richard L. Gelb of Bristol-Myers and Richard M. Furlaud of Squibb, beginning June 20.  At that session Mr. Gelb raised the merger issue.  The two men met again July 14 and during the next several days negotiated the deal that was eventually announced.  Under the merger agreement, Squibb shareholders will receive tax-free stock valued at about $12.1 billion.  As previously reported, Squibb shareholders will receive 2.4 shares of the new Bristol-Myers Squibb Co. for each share of Squibb, which will come from issuance of 233 million new shares of Bristol-Myers common stock.  Cumberland Federal Savings Bank, a unit of Cumberland Federal Bancorp., Louisville, Ky., said it agreed to acquire $290 million of deposits and 11 Kentucky offices of First Nationwide Bank.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Cumberland Federal, with assets of $1.2 billion, said the transaction is pending regulatory approval but is expected to be completed before year end.  First Nationwide is a unit of First Nationwide Financial Corp., based in San Francisco.  It said that divesting itself of its Kentucky operations is part of a strategy of focusing on major markets that "offer us the greatest potential for growth."  First Nationwide Financial, a subsidiary of Ford Motor Co., has assets of about $34 billion.  Fleming Cos., Oklahoma City, Okla., said its board amended its shareholder-rights plan to give additional protection against a hostile takeover bid.  The giant food wholesaler said the move wasn't in response to any efforts to acquire a large stake in the company and said it doesn't know of any such efforts.  Under the amendment, if a person or group acquires 20% or more of Fleming's common stock outstanding, each right will entitle the holder to buy Fleming stock at a discount.  The threshold previously was 35%.  The amendment also allows the board to reduce the 20% threshold to 10%.  A dispute over trading records sealed by a judge in a now-settled case involving Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. has erupted into a battle between two law firms with charges of ethical misconduct.  Attorneys for Drexel, including the New York firm of Patterson Belknap Webb & Tyler, have charged the Chicago firm of Winston & Strawn, which represented Staley Continental Inc. in a suit against Drexel, with using the sealed documents to solicit another client in violation of ethical codes of the bar.  Winston & Strawn and the client, Home Shopping Network Inc., claim Drexel is attempting to use the protective order to "bury this information about its high-yield bond department forever" and to prevent Winston & Strawn from representing any clients in future cases against Drexel.  Federal Judge James F. Holderman, who issued the gag order and approved the settlement in the Staley case, said he would issue a ruling in the dispute.  In a 1988 settlement, Staley agreed to drop a $210 million suit charging that Drexel had tried to "extort" Staley management into a Drexel-led takeover of the food company in exchange for Drexel's $35 million purchase of a small commodity trading unit from Staley.  Drexel said the allegations were "totally without merit."  The current battle arose in June when Winston & Strawn and Home Shopping Network moved to lift the protective order to allow Home Shopping to review trading records it says are crucial to a Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations case the television shopping concern has brought against Drexel in Florida.  Winston & Strawn claims that Drexel already abused the protective order in the Staley case by stonewalling on the delivery of documents.  It also charges that with Drexel's guilty pleas on six felony RICO counts and the labeling of its high-yield bond department as a "criminal enterprise," Drexel can no longer withhold materials on the department in other cases.  In response, Drexel's brief charges Winston & Strawn with repeated violations of the protective order.  But in court, Harold R. Tyler of Patterson Belknap backed off of Drexel's charge that Winston & Strawn had solicited Home Shopping, or had been solicited by it, because of Winston's access to the sealed documents.  Winston & Strawn joined the Home Shopping case in January, nine month's after the suit against Drexel was filed.  A previous move by Patterson Belknap to disqualify Winston from the Florida litigation was denied by a federal judge in Florida and Mr. Tyler asked Judge Holderman to transfer the question to Judge Milton Pollack who is overseeing a number of consolidated Drexel matters in Manhattan.  Drexel "doesn't want its records to be seen all over the world," Mr. Tyler told the court.  "The Home Shopping Network case has as much to do with the Staley case as Mother Teresa and Colonel Gadhafi."  Terry Grimm of Winston & Strawn asked for a lifting of the protective order to prevent Drexel "from continuing what is close to being a fraud on this court."  "Drexel constantly threatens me with contempt," Mr. Grimm told the court.  "Their gamesmanship should be brought to an end."  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Ackerley Communications Inc., proposed offering of 2.2 million common shares, of which, 200,000 shares will be sold by the company and two million shares will be sold by holders, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Agouron Pharmaceuticals Inc., offering of 1.5 million common shares, via PaineWebber Inc.  Aloette Cosmetics Inc., secondary offering of 677,886 of its common shares, of which, the shares are being sold holders, via Wheat First Butcher and Singer Capital Markets.  Centel Capital Corp., a unit of Centel Corp., shelf offering of up to $300 million of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  Electronic Technology Group Inc., initial offering of 500,000 units, each unit consisting of six common shares and four purchase warrants, via Andrew Alen Securities Inc.  Humana Inc., offering covering $400 million of unsecured debt securities, including $200 million of debt securities previously registered but unissued.  International Lease Finance Corp., proposed offering of 500,000 units.  Each unit consists of two common shares and one purchase warrant, via Salomon Brothers Inc.  Mauna Loa Macadamia Partners L.P., offering of two million Class A depositary units representing limited partners' interests, via Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. and Merrill Lynch.  Petrolane Gas Service L.P., offerings of $125 million of senior secured notes and $375 million of senior debentures, First Boston.  Petrolane Gas and certain related entities were acquired on Aug. 1 by QFB Partners, a partnership formed by affiliates of Quantum Chemical Corp. and CS First Boston Inc.  Western Investment Real Estate Trust offering of four million shares, via Merrill Lynch.  Tokyo stocks fell back from Monday's record level to close easier in thin trading.  Brokers described the session as characterless with sluggish participation by institutional investors.  Share prices also ended lower in London and were off sharply from their intraday highs as the market was undermined by a weak opening on Wall Street.  Tokyo's Nikkei 225-stock average fell 26.48 to 35114.35.  The index rose 77.69 points Monday to its latest record.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index was down 59.72 points, to 35054.63, midway through the morning session.  The market started Tuesday weaker, recovered to carry the Nikkei average into the plus column by midmorning, then fell back again.  Volume on the Tokyo Stock Exchange's first section was estimated at 450 million shares.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 496-378, with 229 issues unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 6.58 points Monday, was down 5.63, or 0.21%, at 2653.45.  The second section index, which gained 22.60 Monday, was up 19.65, or 0.60%, to close at 3279.81.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 30 million shares, compared with 23 million shares Monday.  Institutional investors largely stayed on the sidelines out of fear that the market is vulnerable to a correction.  Last Thursday was the first time the Nikkei average had ever closed above 35000.  "There was no incentive to buy on today's market," said a fund manager at a major life insurance company.  "On the other hand, there is also no reason for the market to lose heavily.  "In spite of the low daily volume, the Nikkei has maintained the 35000 level since Thursday.  I think the market is now taking time to solidify at the new level."  What little buying there was came from individual investors hunting for issues with strong earnings outlooks and low price-earnings ratios and for other incentive-backed issues.  But the trickle of bids wasn't enough to produce a notable advance in any sector, traders said.  Sony fell back on profit-taking.  The stock's advance to the 9,000 yen ($62.89) level Monday attracted investor interest and even prompted talk the price could rise to 10,000 yen.  The stock has also moved up and down as expectations of a gratis distribution by the company have grown and receded, one fund manager said.  Sony, which reached an intraday high of 9,000 Monday, closed yesterday at 8,680 yen a share, down 120.  Other gainers included Toyota, which gained 20 to 2,720.  Housing issues again were bought by major Japanese brokerages in what was widely seen as an effort to stir investor interest in the sector, but the dealers' efforts weren't successful, traders said.  Misawa Homes gained 50 to 2,660, but Daiwa House lost 60 to 2,640, and Sekisui House was down 20 at 2,330.  London's retreat was accentuated by the actions of market-makers, who juggled prices to try to reignite buying interest.  The market opened lower in response to Wall Street's 40.97-point decline Monday, rallied around midday as several major stocks attracted investor interest, then slid back into negative territory as Wall Street again opened easier.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended down 3.9 points at 2370.8, compared with an intraday high of 2385.2.  Dealers said, however, that the retreat occurred in thin trading and didn't denote significant profit-taking.  "The market is still very short of stock," one dealer said.  "Although private clients are sticking to the sidelines, most institutions are still on the lookout for a good, reasonably priced line of stock."  The Financial Times 30-share index was down 2.7 at 1966.3.  Volume was 391.6 million shares, compared with 349.7 million Monday.  Chemical giant Imperial Chemical Industries was a standout issue, closing 31 pence stronger at #13.18 ($20.72) a share.  Dealers said the stock benefited from rumors that the company has built up a war chest to finance an imminent bid, with Wellcome mentioned as a possible candidate.  Wellcome continued to surge on the strength of reports last week that U.S. health officials have found the company's drug AZT more effective than originally thought in treating the acquired immune deficiency syndrome virus.  The stock rose 27 to 756 pence.  Great Universal Stores rose 24 to #11.34 as players continued to evaluate it against the rest of the stores sector.  "GUS has got very strong assets and is a good defensive stock during a downturn," one trader said.  B.A.T rose 14 to 847 as the market continued to applaud the company's defense document issued Monday against Hoylake's hostile #13.4 billion bid for the U.K. conglomerate.  BICC, a cables and construction group, advanced 23 to 558 after reporting a 37% rise in interim pretax profit.  It cited a strong performance by European and North American cable units.  Several stocks that have led the market higher in recent weeks encountered profit-taking.  Among them, Reuters shed 13 to 950, Scottish & Newcastle fell 5 to 404, and Pearson declined 7 to 807.  Saatchi & Saatchi fell 20 to 304 after a report in The Wall Street Journal in which the company said revenue on the agency side will remain depressed in the current year.  English China Clay retreated 7 to 477 after U.K. brokerage concern UBS Phillips & Drew lowered its pretax profit forecast for the year ending in September to #150 million from #155 million.  In other European markets, share prices closed higher in Zurich and Milan, lower in Paris, Frankfurt, Amsterdam and Stockholm and mixed in Brussels.  In South Africa, gold stocks closed lower.  Elsewhere, prices closed lower in Singapore and Taipei and were mixed in Manila, higher in Hong Kong, Seoul and Wellington and little changed in Sydney.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 21 Aug 18 Year  @ U.S. ................... 313.9 318.8 +22.6  @ Britain ................ 712.8 714.0 +30.5  @ Canada ................. 430.0 432.7 +17.1  @ Japan .................. 1572.5 1569.4 +10.7  @ France ................. 523.1 523.1 +18.2  @ Germany ................ 251.1 247.9 +20.7  @ Hong Kong .............. 1890.7 1930.8 - 6.8  @ Switzerland ............ 235.7 235.1 +36.3  @ Australia .............. 345.0 343.7 +18.8  @ World index ............ 536.9 538.2 + 8.6  The Treasury plans to raise $500 million in new cash with the sale Monday of about $14.4 billion in short-term bills to redeem $13.90 billion in maturing bills.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills maturing Nov. 30 and March 1, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum denominations of $10,000, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  In a watershed in Mexico's market-oriented economic program, the government unveiled a plan to take public its 58%-owned Mexicana de Aviacion, Mexico's largest airline, by allowing a group of Mexican and U.S. investors, including Chase Manhattan Corp., to take an equity stake.  The new investment group, headed by Mexicans but including Chase, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and British investor Sir James Goldsmith, will provide $140 million in fresh capital to a new airline-holding company that would include all of the existing Mexicana equity.  The government's stake would be diluted to 40%, the current private shareholders would hold 35%, and the new Mexican and U.S. investment group would hold 25%.  The foreign investors would be limited to a minority stake in the new holding company for three years, after which time the government is to have liquidated all of its holdings.  Foreign investors would then be permitted to acquire the majority if they chose to do so.  The move to allow private control and foreign investment in a high-profile enterprise such as Mexicana could help convince investors, both in Mexico and abroad, that Mexico's new president, Carlos Salinas de Gortari, is serious about reducing the role of the government in the historically state-dominated economy.  A group of Mexicans, led by the conglomerate Grupo Xabre, will provide 52% of the new $140 million in equity.  Chase Manhattan would provide 35%, a Drexel Burnham Lambert unit 7%, and a company controlled by Mr. Goldsmith, 6%.  The opening to foreign investment and private control should also bolster troubled Mexicana at a time when deregulation has brought increasing competitiveness to the Mexican airline industry.  "New equity of $140 million would support another billion dollars or so in debt and basically put the company in a position where it could really be a player," says Louis Marckesano, an analyst at Janney Montgomery Scott in Philadelphia.  In 1988, Mexicana had a profit of $136 million, compared with a profit of $5 million a year earlier.  Besides cuts in spending and an increase in international business, Mexicana benefited from the government's anti-inflationary freeze in the value of the peso against the dollar.  The move, which caused the peso's value to increase against that of the dollar in relative terms, worked to the advantage of companies that had debts in dollars, such as Mexicana, which owes about $250 million to creditors abroad.  Mexicana flies to 28 cities in Mexico and 18 in the U.S. and Caribbean.  The airline has a fleet of 28 planes and a work force of 13,000.  Mexicana's financial and labor problems have discouraged potential buyers during the three years in which the government has had the carrier on the block.  The cost of servicing the carrier's heavy foreign debt has made it difficult for Mexicana to upgrade its aging fleet of planes.  Also, the carrier has been plagued by the demands of powerful unions.  For instance, Mexicana pilots work far fewer hours than do the pilots at most airlines, but Mexicana has a relatively poor record for on-time arrival.  Meanwhile, the rest of the Mexican airline industry is undergoing a period of ferment because of the government's program of deregulation and denationalization.  Late last year, the governments of the U.S. and Mexico signed a new air agreement, which greatly expanded the number of routes between the two countries.  Mexico also denationalized its wholly owned air carrier Aeromexico.  Its new, private owners have rapidly upgraded the company's service and cut many unprofitable routes.  The scaling down of Aeromexico has also opened the skies to new Mexican regional carriers.  The government said the new investors in Mexicana would provide $3 billion in investment over the next decade, allowing the airline to upgrade its fleet and airport facilities.  The move to take Mexicana public is sure to be popular with the private sector both in Mexico and abroad.  The government is eagerly courting private investment by trying to rid itself of nonessential state-owned companies.  Just Monday, the government pre-empted a threatened strike at the state-owned copper company, Mineria de Cananea, by declaring it bankrupt.  The government said it would try again to take the company, which has been for sale for 1 1/2 years, public.  Nathan's Famous Inc., which began selling hot dogs on the boardwalks of New York's Coney Island a year before the Bolshevik Revolution, is taking its act to Red Square.  Closely held Nathan's, based in Westbury, N.Y., announced a joint-venture agreement yesterday with the Lenin District Catering Trust and Zeiger Enterprises Inc. of Trenton, N.J.  The Catering Trust supervises more than 200 cafeterias and eateries in the Lenin District, which includes Red Square.  Zeiger specializes in arranging U.S. business ventures in the Soviet Union.  William Landberg, vice chairman of Nathan's, said he expects Nathan's promotional trailers to be set up and serving hot dogs in the square "in less than a month."  Chairman Stuart A. Benson said Nathan's is negotiating with GUM department store, which is on Red Square, for a permanent space for an outlet, and "we anticipate we will be opening there in mid-November."  The hot dogs will be made in the U.S. and shipped to the Soviet Union, a Nathan's spokeswoman said.  Nathan's has 30 fast-food outlets in the U.S., which have annual sales of about $55 million.  The company started as a hot-dog stand at Coney Island in 1916.  In 1987, it was taken private for $19.6 million by a group led by Mr. Benson.  The Interior Department released a draft plan for assessing the damage to natural resources caused by March's grounding of Exxon Corp.'s oil tanker.  Environmental groups immediately blasted it as inadequate.  The draft, which will be available for public comment until Sept. 30, was drawn up by the Interior and Agriculture departments, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration and the Alaskan Commissioner of Fish and Game.  They will use the plan, once final, to assign a monetary value to the damage incurred and to develop a strategy for restoring the environment.  Attorneys for the Natural Resources Defense Council and the National Wildlife Federation objected strenuously to the draft on the ground that it committed the agencies to only one year of study.  An NRDC attorney said a one-year study "could lead to a serious underestimation of harm to the environment and a limited recovery of damages from Exxon."  Moreover, officials of both groups said the draft doesn't make clear whether Exxon is to participate in the damage-assessment process.  Bob Adler, director of the council's clean-water project, said, "This would be like asking the fox to evaluate how many chickens he ate."  The state of Alaska has already sued Exxon and the other oil companies that own the Alyeska Pipeline Service Co., alleging that their response to the oil spill didn't prevent contamination of hundreds of miles of wilderness shoreline.  The company also faces a suit by the National Wildlife Federation and more than 150 suits by individuals and businesses.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it is reviewing credit ratings on subsidiaries of most U.S. bank holding companies as a result of the recently enacted legislation aimed at rescuing the thrift industry.  Moody's didn't say whether the review has positive or negative implications, but bankers said they expect widespread downgradings to result from the review.  Moody's noted that under the new law, all units of a bank holding company must indemnify the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. against possible losses stemming from the failure of a sister bank.  Bankers were reluctant to discuss the Moody's action.  But one bank adviser, who asked not to be identified, criticized the rating service's decision to announce a broad-based review.  "For strong institutions like Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. of New York, this cross-guarantee provision {in the thrift legislation} has no importance, and their rating shouldn't be under review.  It only makes a difference when a bank has a weak sister," the adviser said.  Currently, Moody's ratings on different banking units of the same bank holding company can vary by as much as three numerical rating levels.  With this review, those variations are expected to narrow or even to disappear in some cases.  However, Moody's said some rating differentials may remain, depending on each bank's strategic importance and operational integration into the parent company.  The average interest rate fell to 8.6647% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.69% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $575 million were submitted.  Accepted bids ranged from 8.6625% to 8.6650%.  Citicorp said it accepted 40.9% of the bids at the high rate on a pro-rata basis.  Citicorp also said the average rate rose to 8.4557% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 8.427% at last week's sale.  The range of accepted bids was 8.4425% to 8.4650%.  Bids totaling $535 million were submitted.  Half the bids at the high rate were accepted.  The bank holding company plans another $50 million sale of each maturity next Tuesday.  JOHNSTON COCA-COLA BOTTLING GROUP Inc. (Chattanooga, Tenn.) -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. assigned a Ba-2 rating to the second largest Coca-Cola bottler in the U.S. for $100 million senior notes, due 1999, and a single B-1 rating to the company's $200 million subordinated notes, due 2001.  Moody's assigned a "not prime" rating to commercial paper.  Moody's said it based the ratings on the company's "high financial leverage" which it expects will continue, "based on the company's acquisition strategy."  Moody's also said Coca-Cola Co.'s 22.1% ownership of the bottler is "viewed positively" and that the ratings reflect "favorable prospects."  Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp., Hong Kong, posted a 15% increase in first-half profit to 1.93 billion Hong Kong dollars (US$247.2 million) from HK$1.674 billion a year earlier.  The colony's biggest bank said that per-share earnings rose to 33 cents from an adjusted 29 cents a year earlier and that the proposed interim dividend was increased to 14 cents a share from 12 cents.  The results were roughly in line with most analysts' forecasts.  But the ability of Hong Kong banks to transfer funds to and from undisclosed inner reserves allows them to manipulate profit figures, which are viewed as providing only an indication of an institution's true profitability.  Most of its Asian and Middle East branches had good results.  Among North American banking operations, Marine Midland Bank and Hongkong Bank of Canada had better earnings.  Hongkong Bank of Australia was hurt by loan provisions.  The Wardley Holdings Ltd. merchant bank's results improved.  CM&M Group, a New York-based primary dealer in U.S. government securities, returned to profitability.  The James Capel brokerage firm, which had a loss last year, posted a small firsthalf operating profit, but had a net loss owing to a cost-cutting reorganization.  MEXICO PLANS to sell a stake in its 58%-owned airline company to a group that includes Mexican investors, Chase Manhattan Corp., Drexel Burnham, and Sir James Goldsmith.  The move to allow private control and foreign investment in Mexicana is a watershed in Mexico's market-oriented economic program.  ---  Airlines are changing fares in a way that will make flying more expensive for many business and leisure travelers.  The moves, coming despite softness in air traffic, include raising the price of a popular excursion fare.  ---  Orders for durable goods fell 1.9% in July to $122.9 billion, their lowest level since September, largely because of weaker auto demand and a plunge in engine orders.  But June's rise was revised to 1.4% from 0.4%.  ---  Georgia Gulf received a $55-a-share, or $1.38 billion, buy-out bid from NL Industries, controlled by Harold Simmons.  Georgia Gulf's shares surged $7.25 to $58.75.  ---  Wang Labs may announce today the selection of Richard W. Miller, a former GE executive, as president and chief operating officer.  ---  The government apparently is investigating possible insider trading in connection with the merger accord between Bristol-Myers and Squibb.  ---  Tucson Electric slashed its dividend more than 50%.  It blamed continuing losses and cash-flow problems, and uncertain prospects for a proposed increase in rates.  ---  Socanav won control of Steinberg in a $1.13 billion tender offer.  Oxdon withdrew its higher bid for the food retailer and real-estate concern after failing to block Socanav's proposal.  ---  S&Ls had $3.7 billion in second-quarter losses as interest rates rose and regulators slashed the book value of some insolvent thrifts' assets.  ---  Anchor Glass's board rejected a $251.4 million offer from Vitro and disclosed it has held talks with other parties about a possible transaction.  ---  A Thomson S.A. unit is close to acquiring most of N.V. Philips's European defense-electronics assets.  ---  Bond prices tumbled in reaction to a huge supply of debt securities.  Stocks rose slightly, while profit-taking sent the dollar lower.  ---  UAL is waiting to see bank financing for Marvin Davis's $6.19 billion offer before deciding whether to put the United Airlines parent up for sale.  ---  GE's Kidder Peabody reassigned most of the 115 people in its futures-trading operation and set up a separate program-trading division.  ---  California insurance regulators ordered $110.6 million in additional premium refunds under a new state law.  More refunds are possible and could raise the total to $815.9 million.  ---  Boots Co. said it gained control of Ward White Group in a $1.42 billion bid for the auto-parts company.  ---  Mazda raised car prices as much as 8.9% in line with its effort to develop a more upscale image.  ---  Yields on most CDs rose modestly in the past week as interest rates in general halted their recent decline.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 141,930,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2650.99, up 3.99; transportation 1433.50, off 4.62; utilities 213.34, off 0.57.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3260.04, off 25.89.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 131.12, up 0.68; spot index 129.45, up 0.58.  Dollar: 142.20 yen, off 0.90; 1.9395 marks, off 0.0182.  Coca-Cola Co., Atlanta, said it will report a gain of about $36 million, or 10 cents a share, in the third quarter from the completed sale of Belmont Springs Water Co. to Suntory Water Group Inc.  Coke said that Belmont Springs had revenue of $21.1 million in 1988.  Coke said the divestiture, made at an "attractive" price, is in keeping with its plan to focus on core businesses.  Suntory Water Group, a unit of New York-based Suntory International Corp., markets water under the brand names Kentwood, Polar, and Crystal.  Suntory International is a unit of Kotobuki Fudosan, a closely held Japanese concern.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Winn Dixie Stores $1.06 ... $ .95 (6) 11.58  @Baker (J.) Inc. $ .38 ... $ .36 (4) 5.56  @ NEGATIVE  @Pansophic Systems $ .09 ... $ .14 (6) 35.71  @Carolco Pictures $ .09 ... $ .12 (4) 25.29  @Trans World Music $ .11 ... $ .13 (3) 15.38  @Tandy Corp. $ .66 ... $ .72 (17) 8.33  Source: Zacks Investment Research  Joseph S. Vassalluzzo was named executive vice president, growth and development, a new post at this discount office-products retailer.  Mr. Vassalluzzo, 41, will be responsible for overseeing real estate and the construction of new facilities.  Previously, he was president of American Superstores Development Co.  Wendell R. Beard, 62 years old, has been elected to the new post of senior vice president-office of the chairman of this transportation-services concern.  Mr. Beard was formerly vice president-office of the chairman.  WESTERN INVESTMENT REAL ESTATE TRUST said in San Francisco that it filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for a public offering of four million shares.  The company, which owns real estate in northern and central California, expects to sell the shares next month.  After the offering, the company will have 16 million shares outstanding.  Merrill Lynch Capital Markets is the lead underwriter for the offering, the company said.  Cooper Industries Inc., a manufacturing concern, said it agreed to acquire substantially all of the Dual-Lite Inc. division of Insilco Corp. of Midland, Texas.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Dual-Lite makes emergency lighting products and systems.  SONAT Inc. said it is offering $100 million of 9 1/2% notes due Aug. 15, 1999, at 99.55% of par to yield 9.57%.  The Birmingham, Ala., energy concern said that after the offering, it will have used $300 million of the $400 million covered by a shelf registration.  Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, including payment of short-term debt.  Goldman, Sachs & Co. is the lead underwriter of the offering.  SAN JUAN ROYALTY TRUST, Fort Worth, Texas, said it won't pay a cash distribution to unit holders of record Aug. 31 because expenses exceeded revenue by $988,000 during the latest month.  Based on terms of the royalty trust, the excess of expenses over revenue must be recovered from future months' income before a distribution can be resumed.  The trust's trustee, Texas American Bridge Bank, said it was advised by Southland Royalty Co., which operates the trust's properties, that royalty income for the next several months may be negative or negligible because of the cost of drilling additional coal-seam gas wells and continued low seasonal demand for natural gas.  The trust's most recent distribution was 0.2451 cent a unit, paid Aug. 14.  FINANCIAL CORP. OF SANTA BARBARA, parent of Santa Barbara Savings & Loan Association, said it plans to offer two of its common shares in exchange for each share of its $2.183 cumulative convertible preferred stock, Series A.  The Santa Barbara, Calif., company also will offer 168 of its common shares for each $1,000 principal amount of the association's 13 3/8% subordinated notes due 1998, as well as 168 of its common shares for each $1,000 principal amount of its and the association's 9% convertible subordinated debentures due 2012.  The offering, through Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., is subject to shareholder approval and could close by early November.  A registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission hasn't yet become effective.  Hunt Manufacturing Co. said it reached agreement with striking workers at its Florence, Ky., plant for a new contract.  About 94 members of the United Steel Workers of America have been off the job since Aug. 14.  They will receive a 3% general wage increase for each of the next three years.  Robert C. Stempel, 56 years old, president and chief operating officer of General Motors Corp., was elected a director of this bank holding company, expanding board membership to 21.  He also was elected a director of NBD's principal subsidiary, National Bank of Detroit.  Lufthansa German Airlines said its first-half pretax profit climbed 6.1% to 87 million West German marks ($44.4 million) from 82 million marks a year earlier, as air-traffic delays continued to cut into profit.  The West German national air carrier's revenue climbed 13% to 5.47 billion marks from 4.85 billion marks a year earlier.  Total sales, including cargo, rose 12% to 5.83 billion marks from 5.22 billion marks.  The airline said the modest increase in earnings came against a backdrop of higher jet fuel prices and lengthy delays because of crowded airports and air corridors.  Lufthansa's jets spent a total of 6,000 hours in the air waiting for landing clearance and were delayed a total of 7,000 hours waiting to take off.  In 1988, Lufthansa's pretax profit climbed 16% to 241 million marks from 207 million marks in 1987, on an 8.1% sales rise to 11.85 billion marks from 10.96 billion marks.  Norton Opax PLC launched a #484 million ($757.9 million) cash-and-shares takeover bid for rival British specialty-printing concern De La Rue Co.  The unsolicited offer, which Norton valued at 339 pence ($5.31) a De La Rue share, consists of one Norton ordinary share, 30 pence of Norton convertible unsecured loan stock and 150 pence in cash.  Norton said its bid is intended to unite De La Rue's core printing operations, which specialize in currency and stock certificate production, with Norton's own specialty-printing operations.  Peripheral businesses, such as De La Rue's bank-check printing operation, would be sold.  De La Rue called the offer "opportunistic" and said the price "fails to reflect the full value" of the company.  Company officials couldn't be reached immediately for comment on whether they intend to meet with Norton.  Analysts said the battle for De La Rue could prove acrimonious and reckoned Norton may have to increase its offer to 400 pence a share or more to succeed.  Medstat Systems Inc. said it agreed to license its specialized database and cost-management software to Blue Cross & Blue Shield of Missouri.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Medstat develops and markets medical-cost databases and computer services.  The company said the agreement marks its initial foray into the insurance sector.  Japan's wholesale prices in the first 10 days of August fell 0.2% from the previous 10-day period and rose 2.8% from a year earlier, the Bank of Japan said.  The wholesale price index, in which the year 1985 equals 100, stood at 89.5.  Canon Sales Co. said net income for the six months ended June 30 rose 33% to 3.007 billion yen ($21.06 million), or 49.79 yen a share, from 2.260 billion yen, or 40.35 yen a share, a year ago.  The Canon Inc. unit, based in Tokyo, reported that in the six months ended June 30, sales rose 20% to 177.832 billion yen from 148.093 billion yen.  Sales of office equipment, the largest category of sales, rose 22% from a year earlier to 68.624 billion yen, for example, while sales of computers, peripherals and other system equipment, were up 59% to 30.355 billion yen.  Operating profit nearly doubled to 7.991 billion yen, from 4.159 billion yen.  Pretax earnings were held back somewhat by a tripling in charges for liquidation of inventories, to 2.517 billion yen, in the latest reporting period.  We want to commend you for your powerful three-part series ("Addiction: America's Drug Crisis").  Your articles captured the human dimension of the problem of alcoholism and drug dependency, as well as the complexity of these diseases, which afflict millions of people and their families each year, and cost the U.S. more than $100 billion in economic losses annually.  We were particularly pleased with the fact that your articles focused on the treatment of drug addiction as a chronic disease, characterized by relapses and the need for a lifelong personal commitment to recovery on the part of the patient through self-help groups.  Treatment all too frequently is overlooked as a vital part of the equation for combating the nation's alcohol and drug problems.  Access to quality chemical-dependency treatment should be viewed as one of the key elements in the nation's drug and alcohol abuse/prevention efforts, and federal and state governments and private insurers should work together to ensure that every citizen has access to treatment.  Your insightful articles should help raise public consciousness of the devastating effects of drug addiction and, it is hoped, improve the climate for addressing the drug and alcohol crisis in a humane and compassionate way.  Michael Q. Ford  President  National Association of Addiction Treatment Providers  Irvine, Calif.  ---  Ronald G. Shafer's July 31 page-one article "Stolen Future," about his son Ryan's death from drugs, took a tremendous amount of courage on the part of both the Shafer family and the Journal.  I cannot think of the amount of less-developed-countries debt or the number of leveraged buyouts that could possibly be more important to your readers than the drug crisis and our youngsters.  Many misconceptions were vividly dispelled and warning signs agonizingly brought to our attention.  As a parent of three young children, I thank you for your brave essay and am confident many potential users and families will be spared pain because of you.  Robert F. Cavallari  Buffalo, N.Y.  ---  I read with intense interest your article "Born to Lose: Babies of Crack Users Crowd Hospitals, Break Everybody's Heart."  I commend you for telling about a very important problem out there -- the cocaine babies, a problem that society seems to be ignoring.  Frances De Bartolo  Chicago  ---  It has been my experience, as someone involved in the adolescent drug-use issue for more than 10 years, that journalism rarely probes into this social problem as it should.  Often, stories on drug use among kids are shallow and don't describe the outrageous facts of the pervasiveness of drug use, its deepening roots in our culture and the vulnerabilities of any family anywhere to its lies and pain.  Without question, illicit drug use by kids is "bad news."  Its swath of destruction and despair is never a pretty story.  But, as Mr. Shafer points out, if one young person or one family is helped by its telling, then that's "good news."  Kent C. Cooper  Los Angeles  ---  My only son also was once full of laughter; then, at age 14 he got hooked on LSD and angel dust.  Unlike Mr. Shafer's son, Ryan, my son is not dead -- physically.  However, he resides off and on in a mental institution, never to laugh again.  And every day my heart breaks a little more.  Paul Jasper  Kinnelon, N.J.  ---  Mr. Shafer's poignant tale brings the problem home better than all the experts and statistics in the world.  I'm grateful to him for sharing what is obviously a painful and bewildering story.  Deborah R. Dakins  San Francisco  ---  Mr. Shafer's story of his son's addiction and death certainly got my attention.  I'm a baby boomer and have grown up during a time when drug abuse has become almost commonplace and acceptable.  While a lot of information is available on the subject, it is often skipped over, being someone else's problem.  This poignant account of warning signs is effective in pointing out the devastation of drugs to our nation's best resource, our children.  As a father of two boys, ages 9 and 11, a school-board member, church elder and Sunday school teacher, I am motivated to challenge other "silent majority" people to become educated on drug abuse and join local schools, churches and organizations to fight the drug problem on your home fronts.  It is no longer someone else's problem; it is yours and mine.  The Shafer family's sharing of its tragic loss can start turning the tide in the drug battle if each of us fights against drug dealers and pushers in our communities.  W. William Weispfenning Jr.  Oakes, N.D.  ---  Mr. Shafer made us feel the devastating impact of the drug epidemic in a deeply personal way.  His skill and courage produced both the highest form of journalism and a moving tribute to his son.  Frederick G. Harmon  Wilmington, Del.  ---  Your writers remind us the problem cuts across all socioeconomic lines, affects all age groups, and results in staggering human and financial losses.  As your articles so aptly state, the severity of the problem is intensified by the lack of good and accessible treatment options.  Most people cannot afford the treatment when it's necessary.  Meanwhile, the nation is fighting an unwarranted health "rationing" crisis.  As a result, we lose countless young people every day as they slip "off the waiting lists" into oblivion.  There are some bright spots, however.  For instance, citizen volunteers are uniting to seek answers.  In Illinois, where some 2,500 people wait for treatment, volunteers -- many among your readership -- joined with the Gateway Foundation to complete a $4.5 million campaign to expand treatment opportunities for young people.  Business people -- representatives from Household International, Kraft General Foods, Allstate and many others -- formed an alliance to provide an effective response for people in need.  Our thanks for drawing greater attention to the problem and thereby helping our volunteers work toward a solution.  Michael Darcy  Chicago  ---  Mr. Shafer's story helps educate and motivate a large audience to wake up to this national disaster.  However, a story on the second-front page of the same issue whimsically describes the way the Houston Police Department has developed a "marijuana use index" to deal with large numbers of applicants who have more than experimented with that drug.  It's no wonder families find it difficult to keep their kids clean when even responsible publications can find humor in epidemic drug abuse.  John A. Harding M.D.  Fairport, N.Y.  ---  In your story on the strategic muddle in Washington's war on drugs, an unmentioned casualty is the legitimate importer of goods from potential drug-source countries.  The U.S. Customs Service is pursuing its new drug-interdiction role with a crusader's vengeance and has immunity for damages caused by inspections.  In some jurisdictions, this is leading to unrecoverable costs for importers.  As an example, our company imported a container of zinc wire from Brazil through New Orleans after having imported dozens like it through Norfolk without difficulty.  In New Orleans, the Customs Service's idea of inspection was to drill holes in nearly half the drums of wire.  Although our customer was able to use most of the shipment, the amount we had to refund to him for damaged wire was a disastrous hit to our razor-thin margins.  To our claim for damages, the U.S. Customs Service response was, "If you don't like it, take us to court."  Who is recognizing these costs as we evaluate our war against drugs?  And who is watching that the Customs Service, trained mainly in the art of assessing tariffs, doesn't go off the deep end as it plays policeman?  John Grace  President  Cascadura Raleigh, N.C.  ---  Your focus on the devastating consequences of alcoholism and other drug abuse vividly portrayed the personal tragedy of this disease.  Your message concerning treatment will give hope to millions of Americans who need help in dealing with their addictions.  William J. Mueller  President  Parkside Medical Services Corp.  Park Ridge, Ill.  Ketema Inc. said it acquired Textile Products Inc., a closely-owned fabrics producer.  The price wasn't disclosed.  Textile Products, based in Anaheim, Calif., had more than $8 million in sales last year.  Ketema is an industrial manufacturer.  South Africa's inflation rate, as measured by the consumer price index, rose 15.5% in July from a year earlier, the government's Central Statistical Services said.  July's CPI rose to 179.3 points from 155.3 points a year earlier and was up 0.9% from June's 177.7 points.  June's year-to-year increase was 15.7%.  The July food index was 188.4 points, up 9.9% from 171.5 points in June 1988.  June's year-to-year increase was 11.2%.  First Empire State Corp. said the Supreme Court of New York dismissed a suit filed by depositors of East New York Savings Bank.  The suit challenged the conversion of East New York Savings' mutual form of organization to stock form, to become a subsidiary of First Empire State.  The class action suit was filed in January 1988.  Personnel Opinion  Job applicants have learned to ask  Insightful, probing questions --  About the work environment  And benefit selections.  And thus they gain an overview  Of each and every perk.  I wish they'd show as much regard  About the type of work.  -- Harriet Cooper.  ---  Agonized Ascent  Being upwardly mobile  Should be considered a thrill,  But in my case I am gasping  Because I'm jogging uphill.  -- Joshua Adams  ---  Daffynition  Writer's block: blankruptcy.  -- John H. Dromey.  Credit Lyonnais Securities yesterday became the ninth firm to halt market-making in British government bonds recently, and the second in less than a week.  More firms are expected to follow, analysts say, with the question of who's next likely to be answered within days.  Despite the pullouts, the government bond, or gilts, market still has too many market makers, too few investors and a lack of new issues.  Instead of selling debt, the government is using its large budget surplus to buy back outstanding bonds.  That limits downward price movements, discouraging trading and depriving market makers of a key source of revenue.  Then there's the "domino theory" in the gilts market.  When a powerful player like Merrill Lynch decides to cut its losses, others can exit without losing face.  Credit Lyonnais Securities Chairman Ian Hay Davison says Merrill's withdrawal was a factor in the move by his firm, an affiliate of the Paris-based bank.  "If big firms like Merrill Lynch and Credit Lyonnais are withdrawing, that indicates that there is considerable overcapacity in the market," he says.  Currently, the market consists of three groups of firms.  At the top, controlling nearly half of all market share, are four large firms: S.G. Warburg Securities; Greenwell Montagu, an affiliate of Midland Bank; Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd., a unit of Barclays Bank PLC; and UBS Phillips & Drew, a subsidiary of Union Bank of Switzerland.  At the opposite end of the spectrum are eight or so firms with modest operations in gilts.  But those firms also are viewed as relatively secure, in part because their parent firms would have little to gain from shutting them down.  Among the smaller gilts market-makers are units of Daiwa Securities and Nomura Securities.  Nomura's operation, with a gilts staff of only 14, is low-cost, tightly run and mostly profitable, according to trading head Ian Abrams.  "We're designed to withstand a long war of attrition in gilts," he says.  That leaves perhaps another half-dozen medium-sized firms who may not survive such a war, according to analysts.  Such firms aren't big enough to compete effectively, but are large enough to present a substantial cost burden to their parent companies, they say.  The Federal Reserve Board decided to allow four big Japanese securities firms to maintain their primary-dealer status in the Treasury bond market, but sent a stern signal that it expects Japan to further open its government bond market to U.S. companies.  Yesterday's decision came two days before the Fed was required, under a provision of last year's trade bill, to deny primary-dealer status to foreign companies if their countries don't give U.S. companies "the same competitive opportunities" given to domestic firms in the government debt market.  Gingerly handling an issue imbued with some of the tension between the U.S. and Japan over the balance of trade, the Fed said Japan had made significant moves recently to give American firms and other foreign companies a bigger role in its debt sales.  The decision, which was expected, was politically sensitive because Japan has been an important buyer of U.S. Treasury debt in recent years, thus helping finance U.S. budget deficits.  On the other hand, American firms want freer access to the Japanese bond market, which is second only to the U.S. market in size.  Manuel Johnson, Fed vice chairman, said there has been "much improvement" by Japan in opening its bond business to U.S. firms.  But he also said the decision "doesn't mean this issue is complete.  We still have a ways to go to reach a more efficient international financial system."  Fed Governor John LaWare said he didn't consider the decision affirming the primary-dealer status for the Japanese firms "irrevocable."  Continued opening of Japanese bond markets to U.S. firms must be "an ongoing dynamic process," he said.  Primary dealers are a group of 42 financial firms chosen by the Fed to deal directly with the Federal Reserve Bank of New York when it buys and sells Treasury bonds.  The four Japanese firms whose primary-dealer status was affirmed are the U.S. units of Daiwa Securities Co., Nikko Securities Co., Nomura Securities Co., and Yamaichi Securities Co.  The vote to continue primary-dealer status for the Japanese firms was 5-1.  Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan, Mr. Johnson, and three other Fed governors voted for continuation, but Martha Seger voted to deny the privileged status to the firms.  Mrs. Seger argued that the other governors were giving Japan too much credit for too little movement to open its bond sales.  "Same competitive opportunities" means just that," Mrs. Seger said.  Rep. Charles Schumer, the author of the amendment that required the Fed to rule on primary-dealer status for the Japanese firms, said he felt the Fed may have sacrificed some leverage over the Japanese by agreeing with a Fed staff conclusion that Japan already is affording U.S. firms the "same competitive opportunities" as Japanese firms.  "The Fed should have said the Japanese are on the right road, but aren't all the way there yet," Mr. Schumer said.  The New York Democrat said the Fed decision was correct "in light of the significant progress," but added that the central bank has "taken the pressure off the Japanese.  The Fed may be boxing itself in and that's a terrible mistake."  The board based its decision on a Fed staff report that pointed to recent Japanese changes in its bond market such as full auctions for 20-year bond issues.  Auctions, which are used by the U.S. in all its securities sales, give U.S. firms equal access to the bond sales, in contrast to distribution through syndications.  While only 40% of 10-year bonds -- the most important financing vehicle -- are sold through auctions, the staff report noted that "until several years ago," the 10-year bonds were sold only through a syndicate of Japanese firms.  The staff report also said foreign firms are gaining a larger part of the syndicated business in Japan.  The syndicated portion of 10-year issues allocated to foreign firms was about 8% in October 1988, three-quarters of which went to U.S. firms, up from 1% in July 1986, the report said.  None of the U.S. financial firms that sent comments to the Fed -- including First Boston Corp., Morgan Stanley Co., and two units of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. -- recommended denying primary-dealer status to the Japanese firms.  However, the staff report said Morgan Stanley complained that Japanese regulations "prejudice the ability of U.S. securities firms . . . to further penetrate this marketplace."  As part of its decision, the Fed decided not to revoke primary-dealer status of British firms.  There hasn't been any controversy over U.S. access to United Kingdom bond sales.  Warrantech Corp. said it agreed to acquire Dealer Based Services Inc., a closely held administrator of vehicle-service contracts, for stock and cash.  Terms are being withheld pending a final agreement, but Warrantech will pay about 70% stock and 30% cash, said Joel San Antonio, Warrantech's chairman and chief executive officer.  Dealer Based Services, Euless, Texas, earned $350,000 on $40.2 million in revenue last year, Warrantech said.  Financial results for 1989 weren't disclosed, but Mr. San Antonio said the company, which administers service contracts for cars and recreational and marine vehicles, had an operating loss in the first half because of market conditions.  Mr. San Antonio added that Dealer Based Services' performance is closely linked to auto sales and that its third and fourth quarters are traditionally its strongest as auto makers unveil new models.  Dealer Based Services will complement Warrantech's existing business of administering service contracts for consumer electronic, appliance and office equipment, the executive said.  For the year ended March 31, Warrantech earned $471,176, or less than one cent a share, on revenue of $13.5 million.  Warrantech had said last December that it was considering making acquisitions.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Warrantech shares were quoted at 84.375 cents bid.  Combining Japan's vast capital and know-how with Siberia's vast natural resources would surely give the sagging Soviet economy a much-needed boost.  But such a combination isn't likely to occur soon -- and that appears to be good news both for Japan's European and U.S. competitors and for Southeast Asian nations currently enjoying an economic boom because of Japanese investment.  Beginning tomorrow, 170 Japanese business leaders will hold four days of economic cooperation meetings with Soviet officials in Moscow.  Considering the current East-West thaw, it would be natural to assume this will be one of the most productive of the 12 such meetings the two nations have held since 1966.  It also would be wrong.  Japanese businessmen expect little to come of the talks.  Soviet trade officials here decline to comment, but it isn't thought that the U.S.S.R. expects much from the talks, either.  More than ever, two big obstacles -- one political, the other economic -- appear to block increased Japanese trade with and investment in the Soviet Union.  Despite wider diplomatic contacts, no progress has been made in resolving claims to four islands north of Japan that the Soviet Union occupied in the waning days of World War II.  The more the two sides talk about the issue, the more entrenched their positions seem to become.  A Foreign Ministry official has been urging Japanese business leaders not to proceed with any major projects until the Soviets make a major concession on the territorial issues, according to trade association officials.  It would be undesirable, says one government official, to allow the Soviets "to take only the delicious part" and get sweet deals without swallowing some bitter political concessions.  But even if the dispute were resolved, it isn't clear that Japanese companies would find it profitable to jump into Siberia.  That's a big change from the outlook a decade ago, when the economic interests of the two nations seemed to be converging perfectly.  The Soviet Union had enormous reserves of untapped natural resources in Siberia, just a short boat ride from Japan.  And Japan had an insatiable appetite for natural resources, but none of its own.  The world in those days seemed resource-starved.  The world looks different now, as do oil prices.  Of the more than 400 Soviet-foreign joint ventures undertaken since the Soviet Union began promoting such ventures in 1987, only 12 have been with Japan.  Less than 2% of Japan's trade is with the U.S.S.R.  A Sakhalin Island natural gas and oil project has been under discussion for more than 10 years, but "given the current oil price level, any investments we might make wouldn't pay," says Kazuo Ogawa, managing director of Japan Association for Trade with Soviet Union and Socialist Countries of Europe.  Even if energy prices were to rise, Siberia might not be Japan's most attractive alternative source of supply.  "Why do Japanese companies have to choose the Soviet Far East?" asks a government official.  "There is no infrastructure and the climate is also very severe.  Southeast Asia is available {for investments}.  Unless the Soviet side provides incentives, no way."  To be sure, economic contact between the two nations is far from drying up.  Trade between the two reached an all-time high last year, surpassing the record set in 1982, with combined value of exports and imports totaling $5.9 billion.  But trade association officials attribute the rise largely to price increases.  Japanese industry sources also complain about dealing with the labyrinthine Soviet bureaucracy.  Soviet attempts at economic reform have meant a constant reshuffling of government bureaus and the officials responsible for them, making it difficult for Japanese companies to locate the right person when they do want to negotiate possible deals.  However, Ryoichi Kawai, chairman of Komatsu Ltd., the big maker of construction machinery, told Kyodo News Service that he is particularly looking forward to meeting this week with representatives of Soviet enterprises, which will be a first.  Mr. Kawai, who is also vice chairman of the Japan-Soviet Business Cooperation Committee, said he expects progress in talks on the development of energy, paper pulp, and coal, Kyodo reported.  Japanese businessmen also doubt that joint-venture companies in the Soviet Union can make export-quality products.  The Soviets are believed to be targeting the products of ventures at its domestic market, but that solution raises another problem: The lack of convertibility of the ruble, which prevents Japanese companies from repatriating any profits.  To set up plants in the Soviet Union capable of producing export-quality products, Japanese companies would have to bring in up-to-date facilities with them.  But that could bring Japanese companies up against Cocom regulations against high-technology exports to East bloc nations.  Cocom, the Coordinating Committee for Multilateral Export Controls, is a group of 16 industrial nations that sets common policies to control exports to Communist countries.  Japanese companies have been fearful of offending the U.S. over Cocom since the 1987 incident in which a Toshiba Corp. subsidiary was disclosed to be in violation of the rules -- a disclosure that led to the subsidiary being shut out of the U.S. market and the resignation of the parent's two top officials.  For most major Japanese companies, trade with the Soviet Union isn't worth the risks incurred in other markets, particularly the U.S., trade association officials say.  The U.S. accounts for 29% of Japan's total exports and imports, compared with only 1.3% for the Soviet Union.  Some Japanese businessmen worry that unless their nation strengthens economic relations with the Soviets, European, U.S. and South Korean companies might displace it.  West Germany, for example, recently concluded an investment-protection agreement with the Soviets.  But in the absence of an easing of Cocom rules, progress is unlikely at this week's meeting except, possibly, on a Siberian forest-resource development project.  And even that won't be easy, industry and association officials say, because the Soviet Union is pushing to export furniture and lumber instead of logs for higher added value.  Japanese businessmen doubt that this furniture will do well with Japan's style-conscious consumers.  Short interest for the month ended Aug. 15 climbed 14.3% on the New York Stock Exchange and 6.4%, to a record, on the American Stock Exchange.  Big Board short interest advanced to 554,537,766 shares from 484,818,847 shares a month earlier.  On the Amex, the figure grew to 52,076,794 shares from an adjusted 48,922,594 shares.  In the year-earlier month, the New York exchange reported short interest of 445,674,104 shares, while the Amex recorded 34,310,924 shares.  A trader who sells short borrows stock and sells it, betting that the stock's price will decline and that he can buy the shares back later at a lower price for return to the lender.  Short interest is the number of shares that haven't yet been purchased for return to lenders.  Although a substantial short position reflects heavy speculation that a stock's price will decline, some investors consider an increase in short interest bullish because the borrowed shares eventually must be bought back.  Fluctuation in short interest of certain stocks also may be caused partly by arbitraging.  The figures occasionally include incomplete transactions in restricted stock.  The level of negative sentiment measured by the Big Board short interest ratio rose to 3.13 from last month's 2.99.  The ratio is the number of trading days, at the exchange's average trading volume, that would be required to convert the total short interest position.  Some analysts suggest, however, that the ratio has weakened in value as an indicator because options and other products can be used to hedge short positions.  Varity Corp. led the list of Big Board short volume, as short interest leapt to more than 15.3 million shares from 6.5 million.  Investors may be uncertain of the outcome of its proposal to acquire K-H Corp., formerly Fruehauf Corp., for $655 million.  Last month's volume leader, Exxon Corp., posted a 3.6% decline, to nearly 8.5 million shares from 8.8 million.  Another bellwether stock, International Business Machines Corp., inched up 1.9% to 2.71 million shares from 2.66 million.  On the Amex, Texas Air Corp. was the volume leader, although short interest edged down 0.2% to 3.67 million shares from 3.68 million.  The previous record for total Amex short interest, set in June, was 49,054,037 shares.  The adjacent tables show the Big Board and Amex issues in which a short interest position of at least 100,000 shares existed as of mid-August or in which there was a short position change of at least 50,000 shares since mid-July (see accompanying tables -- WSJ Aug. 22, 1989).  After eight years of failing to put a lid on big product-liability judgments, the business lobby is lowering its sights.  Business certainly hasn't given up the fight for federal limits on plaintiffs' rights in lawsuits over dangerous products.  In fact, by scaling back its campaign, business may now have its best chance ever to get Congress to act.  "We've got a new strategy," says Victor Schwartz, a Washington lawyer who coordinates corporate lobbying on the issue.  Chiefly, that strategy rests on legislation recently introduced by Sen. Bob Kasten (R., Wis.), whose previous bills have been shot down by trial-lawyer groups, consumer advocates and the wily parliamentarian, Sen. Ernest Hollings (D., S.C.).  Conspicuously absent from Sen. Kasten's latest offering are two provisions that were prominent in past versions -- and that were particularly dear to business.  Missing is a proposed cap on punitive damages (those imposed to punish a company, rather than to compensate a victim).  Also omitted is a requirement that plaintiffs prove a specific act of corporate negligence, as opposed to merely a product defect, which is all that is currently necessary in 46 states.  By forgoing those provisions, Mr. Kasten has already achieved a notable victory in securing a handful of Democratic co-sponsors, some of whom have previously opposed such legislation.  The Democrats, led by Sen. John Rockefeller (D., W.Va.), could provide key pressure on the Senate leadership to allow a floor vote later this year or in early 1990.  Highly visible support is also coming from the Republican side.  In an interview, Vice President Dan Quayle said President Bush is considering lobbying for the Kasten bill, or one like it, because the president "understands the burden our current liability system puts on business."  Meanwhile, behind the scenes, Mr. Schwartz and other lobbyists are subtly recasting the focus of the bill.  In private Capitol Hill sessions, the former law professor who calls himself "Schwartz on Torts" is tutoring legislators to link the liability bill to Washington's current buzzword: competitiveness.  He argues that lawsuit-induced paralysis will doom U.S. industry as the European Economic Community sprints toward regulatory unification.  The Schwartz lesson is sticking.  Sen. Kasten avers that by next year, "product-liability law will be more stable and consistent between Great Britain and Italy than between Wisconsin and Minnesota."  That's an almost verbatim quote from Mr. Schwartz's lobbying materials.  Earlier campaigns for a federal liability law focused on one issue above all others: skyrocketing insurance premiums purportedly caused by the size and unpredictability of damage awards.  The "insurance crisis," according to this argument, had forced family businesses to close their doors and cities to disassemble their playground swing sets.  Proponents of the Kasten bill and its House counterpart still reel off horrifying anecdotal claims.  U.S. small airplane manufacturing has almost ceased because of lawsuits, they assert, while U.S. litigation costs have enabled foreign competitors to seize the market for the diphtheria-tetanus-pertussis vaccine.  And business continues to call attention to the heavy cost of lawsuits over products allegedly posing health risks.  "American innovation is being cut off," seethes Richard Mahoney, chairman of Monsanto Co.  One Monsanto product is a chief exhibit in the corporate lobbying campaign.  Recently, the company developed a substitute for asbestos, the insulation material once widely used but now known to be carcinogenic.  Mr. Mahoney says he shelved the new phosphate-fiber product, fearing that plaintiffs' lawyers who have brought more than 75,000 suits over asbestos would next attack the substitute, which Monsanto contends is perfectly safe.  Mr. Schwartz, the lobbyist, acknowledges that in the past, business placed too much emphasis on the insurance scare.  Indeed, new research is casting doubt on the breadth of the alleged crisis.  Rand Corp., a nonprofit research concern in Santa Monica, Calif., found in a recent study that while the number of lawsuits over allegedly defective products increased sharply between 1973 and 1986, more than half the cases were brought against a relatively small number of defendants.  In 1986, Rand estimated, only about 0.9% of the nation's roughly 360,000 manufacturers were defendants in federal lawsuits, up from about 0.5% in 1976.  Mr. Schwartz concedes that "the principal {liability} proposals in this Congress will not lower insurance costs, and they should not be marketed in that fashion."  That admission ought to cheer opponents of federal liability law.  But they still object to provisions designed to shield companies from legal attack.  Consumer-advocate Ralph Nader says big manufacturers can't "bribe judges to stop lawsuits, but they can have a lot of influence in Washington" by financially supporting legislators who vote for liability limitations.  Among the Kasten bill's main elements are: a weightier burden of proof on plaintiffs who seek punitive damages; a corporate defense against punitive damage claims for manufacturers whose products have received federal regulatory approval; and a uniform statute of limitations, under which a plaintiff must file suit within two years after discovering his injury and its cause.  These and other federal limits, Mr. Kasten contends, would "replace our current crazy patchwork quilt of 50 different and confusing state product-liability laws with a uniform national system based on common sense and fairness."  "False," counters Russ Herman, president of the Association of Trial Lawyers of America.  "Can industry bear the cost of their mistakes?" he asks.  "Of course they can] This is the little guy going up against the big corporation]"  The trial-lawyer group's 70,000 members, of course, take their cut of the little guy's winnings -- typically 30%.  Spurred by that self-interest, as well as by professed concern for their clients' rights, the trial lawyers have helped build a sturdy congressional wall blocking federal legislation to limit liability.  The rampart is held together by personal loyalty -- some allies, such as Sen. Hollings, are themselves former plaintiffs' lawyers -- as well as by healthy campaign contributions.  The trial-lawyer association's political-action committee is the seventh biggest supporter of federal campaigns, according to the Federal Election Commission, just behind such liability-lid advocates as the American Medical Association, which ranks No. 3.  Sen. Hollings's FEC records are thick with maximum $1,000 individual contributions from lawyers; in addition, members of the trial lawyers' association have sponsored major fund-raising events on his behalf.  Mr. Hollings declined to be interviewed for this article, but aides confirmed that he intends to use his considerable power as chairman of the Senate Commerce Committee to oppose the Kasten bill.  "He believes that the current system, developed at the state level, encourages manufacturer safety," explains one aide.  The last time a liability bill made it to the Senate floor, in 1987, Sen. Hollings easily prolonged debate until it died.  He's again expected to pull out every parliamentary trick, including a filibuster, if the current Kasten bill gets that far.  Similar procedural hazards await the recently introduced House version of the bill.  And if the business lobbyists try to add further limits to plaintiffs' rights, they may alienate their already nervous Democratic co-sponsors.  At a recent U.S. Chamber of Commerce meeting, Sen. Rockefeller warned that he wouldn't support the Kasten bill if it's amended with more pro-business provisions: "I said, 'Don't look at this as a chance to load up; it's not a Christmas tree.'"  Poland's Communist Party government and the incoming Solidarity-led regime traded political barbs that illustrate the transition to something resembling democracy won't be easy.  The Communist Party's Central Committee accused Solidarity and its two smaller partners in the new governing coalition of breaking agreements reached earlier this year.  The committee said Solidarity violated the pact by agreeing to participate only in a government led by itself and giving the Communists only the ministries of defense and interior.  Even though these posts would control the army and police, the Communist Party said that it wants more and that it won't vote on supporting Prime Minister-designate Tadeusz Mazowiecki until he presents his government's program and a full list of cabinet members.  Mr. Mazowiecki's nomination is supposed to be voted on tomorrow and he is expected to take at least two weeks after that to assemble his cabinet.  Mr. Mazowiecki said he wasn't going to negotiate with the Communists before he was confirmed as prime minister.  Solidarity leader Lech Walesa called the Communist Party statement "blackmail" and said he wouldn't give into it.  "Political threats and blackmail won't change the tragic situation in the country," Mr. Walesa said.  "I appeal to the Communist Party to drop this demand and help build a program of lasting reform."  Other Solidarity members dismissed the Communist statement as "attempting to deny the inevitable" and "an attempt to satisfy their rank-and-file members with words."  As these statements were flying, most Polish politicians expected Mr. Mazowiecki, a 62-year-old veteran opposition activist and thinker, to be confirmed tomorrow or Thursday as the first non-Communist Party prime minister in Eastern Europe for more than 40 years.  After an emotional send-off from Solidarity backers in Gdansk, Mr. Mazowiecki returned to Warsaw to begin assembling his cabinet.  As he did so, all the other parties were also busy hammering out positions and plans to try to drag Poland out of its economic mess and political stalemate.  Solidarity member of Parliament Aleksander Malachowski, a writer and television personality, said Solidarity's first act tomorrow when Parliament resumes sitting, would be to introduce a bill to abolish the death penalty.  Its first economic move, he said, will be to amend the law to allow the government to seize bank accounts of state-owned companies that never repay loans made to them by the state.  These unpaid debts total "thousands of billions of zlotys," he says, although "nobody knows for sure because we've never had access to the records."  Solidarity will also soon try to open up the secret bookkeeping of Poland's closed companies.  Other parties will propose measures to help ease food shortages, a major source of public unhappiness.  The small but pivotal Peasants' Party, which has 76 seats in Parliament (Solidarity has 161, the Communists 173, and smaller parties 50) wants to overturn Poland's system of keeping consumer prices low while penalizing farmers.  It wants instead Western-style subsidy programs to pay farmers to produce more.  Peasants' Party Secretary Aleksander Luczak said working in coalition with Solidarity won't be easy "because the workers they represent and the farmers we represent have totally opposite interests."  But, Mr. Luczak says, in Poland the problem is even more complicated than just prices.  "Many farmers limit their production because even if they got more zlotys, they have nothing to buy in the shops or from farm-equipment suppliers.  We need to stimulate industry, too, so farmers will have products to spend their money on."  The Peasants' Party wants one of its members to be minister or vice minister of industry in the new government, along with at least five other cabinet slots.  Poles have reacted remarkably calmly to all of this political activity, common in the West but unthinkable here as early as a few months ago.  Solidarity's Mr. Malachowski, who hosts Poland's most popular TV show, a talk program where people can pour out their troubles, says the weariness and skepticism about Poland's fledgling democracy don't surprise him.  "Joy can be swamped by everyday hardships," he says.  "People are trying to find food, and worry about being able to pay for it.  There's no time for joy.  And besides, even I, who have watched the process from the beginning still find it hard to believe all the changes that have taken place."  Wang Laboratories Inc. finally announced a debt restructuring agreement with its banks that analysts said will allow the company to start dealing with the other crises it faces.  Wang said its new agreements cover $575 million of bank borrowings, an increase of $100 million from previous agreements.  Wang said it pledged all of its assets except inventories to its bank lenders.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Wang Class B common closed at $5.75, up 12.5 cents.  Besides being highly leveraged, Wang faces continuing erosion of its position in the computer market, the likelihood of at least two more quarters of losses and a search for a new president to succeed Frederick A. Wang, who was forced out of his job by his father two weeks ago.  "While this is significant as a step in the company's progress, it's not sufficient for recovery," said Barry Willman, an analyst with Sanford C. Bernstein Inc.  "The company has a long list of issues to address, and this was the first."  Wang officials didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  Wang had been in violation of net worth portions of its loan agreements since July 31, when it reported a record $424.3 million loss for the year ended June 30.  Executives were also desperate to renew a $125 million revolving credit line that was scheduled to expire Sept. 30.  Wang had been negotiating with its banks for several weeks before the loss was announced and continued as the banks granted it waivers.  Last week, Wang officials and the banks reached an agreement, but at the last moment Wang's directors turned it down.  Wang then said it wouldn't make any interest payments to institutional lenders.  Individuals close to the situation said that An Wang, the chairman and chief executive, was "playing hardball" in an effort to extract less onerous conditions from the banks.  The new agreement came early yesterday morning after weekend talks, said a spokesman for Bank of Boston Corp., Wang's lead bank.  Wang wouldn't disclose interest rates or other conditions of the borrowing agreement.  The company said it will resume interest payments as they come due.  Wang said the banks will allow it to use collateral to raise $175 million of working capital.  However, proceeds of other asset sales or financings will be applied to paying short-term bank financings in order of maturity.  The revolving credit agreement was extended to July 15, 1990.  Mr. Wang said "the company believes that this debt restructuring, together with the completion of the $175 million of additional secured financings, will provide the company with the financing required to meet its business plan."  The company said it is continuing to explore the sale of certain business including its domestic and international leasing subsidiaries.  Wang has told financial analysts it believes the units could be sold for between $200 million and $250 million.  Mr. Wang said that the search for a new president by a committee of three directors "is proceeding rapidly."  In the wake of the new bank agreement, Moody's Investors Service Inc. lowered the ratings on about $440 million of Wang convertible debt and Eurobonds to Caa from single-B-3.  Moody's said the bank agreement is "somewhat positive from a short-term perspective," but said it leaves debtholders inferior to banks because the collateral is pledged to bankers.  The Wall Street Journal recently identified me by noting that the organization I head, the American Council on Science and Health, "gets about 10% of its funding from pesticide producers such as Uniroyal Chemical Co., the maker of Alar."  Possibly the editors, who were publishing my commentary on the Great Apple Scare of 1989, meant to convey that 90% of ACSH funding did not come from the makers of pesticides.  But this 10% figure was used constantly in subsequent media attempts to detract from ACSH's credibility.  One example among many was a 90-minute interview that Ed Bradley of CBS's "60 Minutes" conducted with me while preparing a follow-up segment to that program's initial Alar report that triggered the scare.  He began our discussion of the safety of pesticides thus: "Let's go right to the issue of funding. . . .  You get a lot of money from the chemical industry.  A lot of people who've looked at your contributors list accuse you of being little more than a hired hand for the companies that make chemicals and pesticides."  As it happens, our funders -- which we've always listed annually -- include the American Medical Association, insurers, private foundations, individuals and a spectrum of food, chemical, energy-producing and pharmaceutical firms.  They don't always agree over the subjects we examine, and we've lost backing when our findings didn't support some grantors' aims.  In truth, however, it doesn't matter to our opponents who gave us money, or whether 10% or 5% or some parts per billion came from chemical companies.  What matters is that, after a scientific examination, we might designate a consumer product "safe" or dismiss charges of an environmental hazard to human health.  During ACSH's first years, the group did not accept funding from corporations.  But even then the issue was made paramount, because our primary foundation supporter had a stake in the oil business.  ACSH has had similar experience with journalists asking about individual supporters: "But he worked for a chemical company before he retired . . . and she is married to a pharmaceutical executive."  After 10 years, what it boils down to is that no source of funding would be acceptable to ACSH's critics.  What our critics object to is not our funding -- but our conclusions.  If the money rained on us from heaven above, it would be considered polluted or acidic.  Respected scientists affiliated with us or retained by corporations directly to evaluate the contributions of technology to health in America are impugned on a continuing basis.  When you raise questions about the safety of industrial products, it is easy to win a debate -- you don't even have to get to the science; just say your opponent is funded by industry.  Many people have asked us over the years why more scientists do not step forward to unmask those pseudoscientists who constantly terrify us about the quality of our food, air and water.  Here is one good reason: Since nearly all scientists, either through consulting or university funding, directly or indirectly receive grants from some corporation sometime in their lives, they feel vulnerable to public humiliation by those who throw funding pies instead of addressing the science.  Better to stay in the lab or classroom.  Do we not have hypocrisy here?  When a publication gratuitously introduces us as the "industry supported" American Council, does it consider its own funding (advertisements) from the same companies that fund ACSH?  When I raised the question about CBS's advertising dollars to Mr. Bradley, he bridled.  "We are neutral here," he assured me.  And what of the National Resources Defense Council, the group that brought us Meryl Streep and apple-Alar panic?  If the conflicts of funding and finances were universally of interest, why wasn't this organization that zeroes in on pesticides as a carcinogen asked about its substantial holdings in R.J. Reynolds stock?  What ultimately matters is not funding but scientific accuracy and legitimacy.  The Tobacco Institute claims that it has never been "proven" that cigarette smoking causes human disease and death.  Is this outfit credible?  No, but not because it gets all its money from tobacco companies.  If the institute were funded by the Easter Bunny its pronouncements still would be scientifically outrageous, because the "controversy" about cigarettes as the No. 1 cause of premature, preventable death has long disappeared.  Only the Tobacco Institute says otherwise.  We invite our critics, the ones who claim that our food supply is contaminated, that we suffer from an industrially caused "cancer epidemic," to step forward for real dialogue and debate.  The idea that scientists who are corporate advisers or groups that take unrestricted industry funding are by definition mouthpieces for commercial interests will only continue to chill free exchange because effectively only one side of the issue -- the anti-industry side -- is permitted the status of "credible."  He who pays the piper does not always call the tune.  ---  Mrs. Whelan holds a Harvard doctorate in public health.  Net new investment in British investment trusts in July was #327.2 million ($512.2 million), up sharply from #139 million in June and from #110.7 million in July 1988, the Unit Trust Association said, citing "a gradual return of investor confidence in equities."  Sales of new investment trusts were #786.3 million, down 2.2% from #804.3 million in June but up 45.8% from #539.1 million in July 1988.  Repurchases fell 30.9% to #459.1 million in July from #665.3 milllion in June, but rose 7.3% from #428.4 million in July 1988.  The value of funds held in the association's trusts amounted to #54.637 trillion, up 2.6% from #53.226 trillion in June, and up 31.5% from #41.553 trillion in July 1988.  Martin Marietta Corp. said it received a contract to sell more than $10 million of aircraft navigation and targeting systems to Egypt, and noted the exact value was still being negotiated.  The transaction, approved by the Air Force and Defense Department and the Egyptian government, includes 12 sets of Martin Marietta's Pathfinder navigation pods and Sharpshooter targeting pods.  Nord Resources Corp. said it reached an agreement with the government of Sierra Leone deferring the date of Sierra Leone's right to acquire 47% of the company's subsidiary to Jan. 1, 2000, from July 1, 1992.  The agreement also changes the percentage of royalties and income tax to be paid to Sierra Leone to 37.5% for income tax and 3.5% of gross sales for royalties from a maximum of 50% combined, the company said.  The subsidiary, Sierra Rutilee Ltd., is the world's largest producer of high-grade titanium dioxide.  Nord Resources is an exploration and mining concern.  UDC-Universal Development Limited Partnership said that nearly three million common shares were tendered under its self-tender offer, and that it will buy 2,187,000 of the shares at $27.50 each, or $60.1 million.  UDC said it will buy all odd-lot tenders, but won't buy any conditional tenders.  For the remaining tendering shareholders, about 75% of their shares will be purchased, UDC said.  The company, which builds family and adult residential communities, has about 9.4 million common shares outstanding.  Malaysia's real gross domestic product growth this year is likely to be sustained "at very close to 8%," said Bank Negara, the nation's central bank.  The bank said on the supply side, overall output was expected to be bolstered by further expansion in the manufacturing sector at double-digit rates of 15%.  In contrast, output in the agriculture sector would slow to 3%.  On the expenditure side, aggregate domestic demand was expected to be sustained in 1989 as a result of higher public and private investment outlays as well as strong consumer demand.  The central bank said inflation was expected to stabilize at 4% this year against 2.5% last year while continuing strong growth in economic activity would result in some improvement in employment.  Charter One Financial Inc. said it completed the merger of Western Reserve Savings Bank, Cleveland, and First Federal Savings of Akron with its subsidiary, First Federal Savings Bank.  The addition of the two banks increases the number of First Federal Savings Bank offices to 56 from 41 and boosts Charter One Financial's assets 32% to $2.1 billion, the bank holding company said.  In June, the Naderite consumer group Buyers Up made a media splash by predicting tight supplies would send gasoline prices soaring by 10 cents a gallon this summer, and could lead to 1970s-style gas lines.  Pump prices instead have dropped seven cents a gallon since June, and even remote resort areas haven't seen any lines.  Buyers Up admits it "totally underestimated" refiners.  And, as usual, markets as well.  Editor's Note: The Wall Street Journal has followed the fortunes of the Kelly Street neighborhood since 1968.  Then, it was a cohesive black community just beginning a slide into desolation.  Articles in 1977 chronicled a community mired in despair and nearly devoid of people, as block after block succumbed to neglect, arson and abandonment.  Much has happened on Kelly Street since, and the Journal now returns for another report.  BRONX, N.Y. -- There may be no prouder property owner in the city of New York than Jose Madrigal.  Mr. Madrigal, a 43-year-old of Mexican descent, has put down deep roots in a neighborhood that until recently was written off by most people as a hellish no man's land: the South Bronx.  It's an area that has become a symbol of despair in the midst of America's plenty.  In 1977, President Jimmy Carter stood amid the Dresden-like landscape and vowed to rebuild.  The Bronx became a quadrennial campaign backdrop, as well as the setting for much of Tom Wolfe's apocalyptic novel "The Bonfire of the Vanities."  The sporadic bursts of attention proved of little help to those who actually lived here.  By the end of the '70s, the neighborhood had lost 70% of its population.  Landlords set buildings ablaze for the insurance.  "It was desolate," recalls Millie Velez, who grew up here.  "Even the junkies left."  Now, however, there is change again in the South Bronx.  A few of the people who stayed behind, like Mr. Madrigal, have begun to succeed where the politicians and other well-wishers failed.  Poor people in need of decent housing, they banded together in 1977 and stopped the city from demolishing three empty tenements in the 900 block of Kelly Street.  After working all day driving taxis or operating machines, they worked an additional eight hours in shoulder-high debris, restoring the abandoned shells that landlords had left to rot and burn.  The apartments finally sold for $250 to those who had invested at least 600 hours of labor.  Out of those first three buildings grew housing for 21 families.  Also created was the Banana Kelly Community Improvement Association, a grass-roots self-help organization named after the crescent-shaped block where it began.  In its early days, a boxing match had to be held to raise money for tools.  A dumpster was bought with $500 someone won in a beauty contest.  Outside funding eventually began to trickle in as organizers learned to write proposals and to traverse the labyrinthine city bureaucracy.  Today the organization has a staff of 90 that manages 415 apartments, plus a $22 million budget that includes funds to renovate an additional 333 units.  Part of the neighborhood -- now largely Hispanic -- has even been designated a historic landmark district, where apartments rent for up to $700 a month and stately brownstones have sold for nearly $200,000.  For Mr. Madrigal and others like him, "sweat equity" arrangements, in which labor constitutes most of the down payment, have provided an otherwise unobtainable ticket to home ownership and, in many respects, to the middle class.  Mr. Madrigal now proudly houses his family in a spacious five-bedroom, two-bath apartment he spent 2,800 hours renovating.  "We are poor," he says, "but we have something that is ours.  When you use your own blood, sweat and tears, it's part of your soul.  You stand and say, 'I did it.'"  Yet in the South Bronx today, the pride and self-determination have begun to collide with some of the grander agendas of city officials.  The success of groups like Banana Kelly has shown city planners what potential lies in the vast wasteland just north of Manhattan.  And in some ways, the area's newfound value poses a threat to those who have worked so hard to make it livable.  Like property owners everywhere, the homesteaders are jealously protective of their investments.  They see their neighborhood as a fragile oasis of stability imperiled by the magnitude of the city's drug and housing crises.  Now they are torn between extending a helping hand and pulling up the ladder before their rebuilt neighborhood is swamped by new waves of the desperately poor.  "Let me tell you a true story," says Abraham Biderman, the city's commissioner of Housing, Preservation and Development.  "Last year we fixed up an apartment {building} for the homeless in the Bronx.  After successfully resettling the families, we began planning to fix up the building next door for more homeless people.  But the families in the first building said they didn't want any more homeless in their neighborhood."  Mr. Madrigal and most of his neighbors remember their own struggles too well to turn their backs completely on those who are now in similar straits.  But with the long-neglected South Bronx now a wide-open urban frontier, they are painfully aware that a delicate balance must be struck as the territory is resettled.  A central issue is the city's plan to use the thousands of still-vacant apartments it owns here to help solve its housing crisis.  New York City has begun a 10-year, $5.1 billion program to create affordable housing for 250,000 homeless, low-income and middle-income families -- a municipal construction project so ambitious it is equal to providing new or renovated housing for the entire population of Buffalo.  A $1 billion chunk of that funding is earmarked for the South Bronx, where 20,000 city-owned abandoned apartments are targeted for "gut rehab."  Mr. Biderman boasts that "the South Bronx as a national symbol of urban blight is very quickly becoming a fading memory."  But around Kelly Street, resentment simmers over the city's plan to cluster in the South Bronx nearly 70% of the homeless families it is resettling -- a policy that some term "the laundering of Manhattan."  This concentration of the needy is being pushed through, local residents charge, without adequate support to help the homeless adjust.  Already, they say, the influx of people is straining local services, which were cut sharply when the area lost most of its population during the '70s.  The maternity ward at Lincoln Hospital, the main municipal facility in the South Bronx, is designed for 2,500 deliveries annually but handles more than double that number.  And only some 29% are "normal" births, uncomplicated by such factors as low birth weight, AIDS or drug addiction. (Nearly 500 of the infants last year were born affected by crack cocaine.)  When they first joined forces, the Kelly Street pioneers could not have envisioned a nightmare equal to the arson and abandonment then swallowing up their neighborhood.  But it has come, in the form of crack.  For the past three years, the highly addictive drug has been openly dealt on the south side of the area's main commercial thoroughfare, Longwood Avenue, where dealers appear to have consistent hours and clearly delineated turfs.  Even some Banana Kelly buildings have become infested with dealers.  The drug has proven more than a match for police and local activists.  After mustering 200 people for an anti-drug rally in the neighborhood a year ago, Bertha Lewis, a neighborhood organizer until her recent move to Greensboro, N.C., and others on Banana Kelly's anti-drug task force planned a second event for last November.  The night before it was to take place, she says, all 30 members of the task force steering committee received telephoned threats, presumably from local dealers.  Turnout for the rally was poor.  Ms. Lewis thinks the demonstrators' courage in the face of this was pivotal in bringing the police Tactical Narcotics Team into the neighborhood for a 96-day sweep, during which 1,500 drug arrests were made.  Now that the team has departed, however, residents fear the dealers will return.  "It's just like moving dirt around," says Mr. Madrigal.  The schools, too, are being pushed to the breaking point.  At P.S. 62, principal Muriel Pagan says the local school district has had to absorb 239 new units of homeless housing over the summer.  Many children from those families will be assigned to her school, already burdened by overcrowding and poverty. (Only 10% of the 875 students at P.S. 62 live in homes with telephones.) Ms. Pagan has expedited repairs on the aging school building's damaged roof, which sidelined several classrooms this past year.  "And if worse comes to worst, we'll have to uncap the limits on class size," she says.  Many shelter residents have already been resettled here, and tensions flare from time to time.  Marta Rivera, a caseworker with the Casita Maria Settlement House on Simpson Street, lived for a time in a Banana Kelly building that took in 21 families displaced by a fire.  Unemployed and crowded four to a bedroom, the families were disruptive, she says.  "There was screaming in the hallways at all hours -- they'd stay up all night.  It was very annoying for a person who works."  Even so, Ms. Rivera and others argue that isolating homeless families in one building or block is a mistake.  The Rev. Louis Gigante, a priest whose South East Bronx Community Organization has erected 2,000 units of housing in this area, says: "We learned you can't put all poor in one place.  You've got to mix it."  Under pressure from housing advocates, the city recently backed down from plans to create 100% homeless buildings under its Special Initiatives Program.  Now the formula calls for half homeless and half working poor, among whom preference will be given to community residents.  The housing department says many of these buildings -- attractively finished with oak floors and tiled bathrooms -- will offer services such as job training or day care on the premises.  The city will rely heavily on nonprofit community groups like Banana Kelly to manage this housing.  Banana Kelly hopes to turn one building for the homeless at 800 Fox Street into a model, enlisting tenants in a "work prep" training program designed to get them off welfare rolls.  Nonetheless, 800 Fox Street is controversial.  Gonzalo Ortiz, a 74-year-old retired city employee who has lived in the neighborhood for 40 years, says he's been assured that the homeless tenants will be screened carefully.  But as he sees it, Banana Kelly "must take whoever the city tells them to take" or risk the loss of funding for its projects.  Mr. Ortiz reflects the kind of upward mobility now possible in the neighborhood.  He bought the Beck Street building in which he lives 31 years ago for $10,000, and thinks it would fetch $200,000 today.  A grown son and daughter live in two other buildings he owns on the block, and a grandson attends Yale University on scholarship.  "Ten years ago," he says, "all the smartest people were leaving.  They sold cheap, and now they are sorry."  But success has another side.  Banana Kelly has taken some criticism for occasionally veering from its longstanding emphasis on low-income housing.  It is sponsoring construction of 80 two-family homes in the Sound View section of the Bronx that it will sell for $160,000 each.  Getz Obstfeld, Banana Kelly's executive director, talks of the "balancing act" involved in stabilizing neighborhoods.  "We're trying to promote a mix," he says.  "There are two-earner families in the area that are renting.  If we don't provide home ownership, they'll flee."  Mr. Obstfeld insists that the punishing work of homesteading, while tremendously important as a symbol of hope, is difficult to sustain.  He offers this paradox: Currently, he says, Banana Kelly is trying to mobilize neighbors to renovate the Kelly Street park.  "We have $30,000 to rebuild it, and minimum participation.  In the old days, we had nothing to build it with, and we built it."  Banana Kelly's evolution from a movement to an organization troubles some of the earlier pioneers.  It's now "a business like anything else," asserts Ms. Velez.  Some even worry that the area's new commercial potential may lead to the sort of gentrification that could force the old-time residents out.  Ms. Lewis, the organizer, doubts that the planned transformation of the South Bronx will ultimately benefit the poor.  She has bitter memories of the Philadelphia slum in which she was raised, where she says the same pattern of fires, abandonment and flight was exploited by developers who moved in and bought up land at depressed prices.  As a girl, she says, "I remember seeing a new building being built on the waterfront -- I think they called it Society Towers.  I said to my grandmother, 'Isn't that wonderful?' My grandmother said, 'Girl, those people got plans, and they don't include you.'"  Whether such fears are warranted or not, it is clear that the South Bronx is at a new crossroads, capable of heading in either direction.  Many in the community feel powerless to decide its fate.  But Mr. Madrigal believes that the pride and self-determination taking root there will ultimately allow residents to prevail.  "We are so close," he says.  "We could build a paradise of this neighborhood."  His son Fernando, 17, isn't sure.  He says his high school is torn with strife between black, Dominican and Puerto Rican gangs, and a friend of his was shot dead last year by a group of toughs.  "It's going to be hard," he says, shaking his head doubtfully.  Mr. Madrigal takes a swig of thick Latin coffee and stares pointedly at Fernando across their dining-room table.  "How many weekends we work here?" he reminds his son.  "We built it ourselves.  Nothing is easy, baby."  Alberta Energy Co. said the provincial government amended the Alberta Energy Company Act to allow non-residents of Canada to hold shares of the oil and natural gas producer, with the combined foreign holding limited to 10%.  The amendment also permits any shareholder to own as much as 5% of the company's stock, Alberta Energy said.  Previously, individuals were limited to stakes of 1% and non-residents couldn't hold shares.  The government of Alberta owns 35% of Alberta Energy.  Alameda Bancorp. said it signed a letter of intent to purchase Westside Bank in Tracy, Calif., in a stock exchange valued at about $13.5 million.  Alameda Bancorp. has about $300 million in assets.  Westside has four branches and assets of $64 million.  Kelley Oil & Gas Partners Ltd. said it acquired certain oil and gas properties in Louisiana and Texas for $8.1 million.  Kelley is an oil and gas exploration and development concern.  The properties had estimated proven reserves at Jan. 1, of nine billion cubic feet of natural gas and 101,299 barrels of oil and condensate.  Genentech Inc. said it raised $72.5 million through a private partnership to fund future research into drugs used in therapy for acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Included in the partnership offering were warrants to purchase shares of the biotechnology concern.  The Olympia oyster has survived more perils than Pauline, thanks in large part to the efforts of David McMillin.  Mr. McMillin, vice president and manager of Olympia Oyster Co., a processor, has nursed the small, coveted bivalves through near-fatal bouts of pollution and predation over the past 39 years.  He recalls that several years ago the mollusks had become the world's rarest oysters, and that their survival was in grave doubt.  He received a telephone call about that time from the chef at New York's Four Seasons Restaurant, seeking a rush order because of a food critic's glowing account of the tasty mollusks.  Mr. McMillin could only reply with a sigh that he might spare a pint of the oysters -- if the chef was willing to wait a year or so.  This year was supposed to be a different story.  With acres of healthy Olympias sitting on the bottom of this sleepy little bay last January and a Hong Kong millionaire ready to snap them up at the premium price of $200 a gallon, Mr. McMillin figured the oyster's time had come.  He figured wrong.  "I went away for a weekend vacation, and we got hit with the worst storm of the century," he says.  Mr. McMillin raced home to find a blizzard blanketing Puget Sound and record-low temperatures freezing his oyster beds.  Three-quarters of the Olympias perished.  The Hong Kong high roller disappeared.  "Sometimes," says Mr. McMillin, nearing the fourth decade of his fight to save the Olympia, "I don't think God wants me to sell these oysters."  Olympias, once prevalent all along the northern Pacific Coast, now are found in commercial quantities only in Totten Inlet and a neighboring small bay at the foot of Puget Sound.  But the Olympia has spawned a cult of admirers far and wide among food experts.  James Beard, the legendary chef and food writer, was so taken with the Olympia's flavor that he included a recipe for them in his autobiography.  Another fan, Julia Child, says, "They're so unusual, so small, so rare."  Adds New York cooking school owner Peter Kump, "They're like truffles.  What you can't have, you want."  Olympia devotees sometimes show up at the door of Mr. McMillin's ramshackle oyster processing plant here, begging for samples.  Even during months without the letter R, when oysters are usually avoided because their spawning affects the taste, calls for Olympias come from aficianados as far away as Boston and Washington, D.C. "Olympias taste like heaven," says Stephen LaHaie, general manager of Shaw's Crab House in Chicago.  Jon Rowley, a Seattle-based seafood restaurant consultant, becomes positively lyrical in describing the Olympia's flavor.  "It's very sweet, with a high metallic finish that is characteristic of oysters from Europe," he says.  Others say the Olympia's size -- about the diameter of a quarter-- is appealing to some consumers who might be skittish at downing larger raw oysters.  More than a century ago, gold-rush gourmets paid up to $20 for a plate of Olympias. (Archeologists recently unearthed a 12-foot-thick vein of Olympia shells behind the remains of one Gold Rush-era eatery in Sacramento.) The "Hang Town Fry" -- a concoction of eggs and oysters -- is said to have been invented during the last century by a condemned man in Placerville, Calif., who requested the two most expensive items in town for his last meal.  When entrepreneurs discovered they could make more money digging oysters than panning gold, they cleaned the Olympias out of every coastal bay as far north as Washington State.  Water pollution and oyster predators just about completed the job over the next century.  Olympia production, which stood at more than 90,000 gallons at the turn of the century, dwindled to only about 500 gallons a year in the 1980s.  Mr. McMillin is spearheading the Olympia's last stand.  A 64-year-old marine biologist of bulky girth and near-infinite patience (his hobby, grafting fruit trees, is another pastime not for the fidgety), he has nursed the slow-growing and finicky Olympias along ever since he came to work for the oyster company in 1950.  When a local pulp mill pouring chemical waste into a nearby bay threatened to wipe out his oysters, he sued the mill.  Although he lost the suit, the pulp makers eventually gave up the fight and closed the mill in 1957.  The next crisis resulted from the importing of Pacific Oysters from Japan as insurance against the erratic Olympia harvest.  But along with the Pacifics came a predator, the Japanese Oyster Drill.  The tiny crustaceans had a hearty appetite for the Olympias, easily boring through their thin shells and gobbling them up.  Mr. McMillin watched with anguish as his beds were again decimated.  "We brought in the Pacifics to make sure we could make enough money to save the Olympias," he says, "and they almost wiped us out."  Sitting in his office overlooking the oyster beds, Mr. McMillin relates with relish the tale of the Olympia's dramatic rescue from the Oyster Drill's clutches: Just as the Olympia looked like a goner, he says, the black-clawed crab, another tiny underwater denizen that had been nearly wiped out here by pollution, made a sudden reappearance.  Like the cavalry coming over the hill, the crabs attacked the Oyster Drills, and the Olympia was saved.  With the pulp-mill pollution gone and the Oyster Drill routed, Olympias began to thrive.  The oyster takes about four to five years to reach full maturity -- more than twice as long as most other oyster species.  But Mr. McMillin recalls going out on his carefully diked oyster beds late last year to find Olympias everywhere, nearly ready for harvest.  "Thousands of bushels," he says, eyes alight at the recollection.  "I said, 'Thank you Lord.'"  Although the January freeze ended that dream, Mr. McMillin remains optimistic about the Olympias' future.  The bitter cold apparently caused a boom in crustacean fertility.  The oyster beds are alive with little Olympias.  He pulls on a pair of hip boots and invites a reporter to slog along out on the tidal flats where the oyster beds are located.  Indeed, tiny Olympias are everywhere in the muddy beds, clinging to the shells of their departed ancestors.  Mr. McMillin moves into slightly deeper water, reaches down, and gathers up a handful of survivors from last winter's depredation.  He pulls out a pocket knife and pries open several of the little oysters, which he shares.  The oysterman listens as his guest describes the flavor: a clear, briny tang, with a low, mellow undertone.  All true, he says, but there is another quality that is probably the real reason for the rare little oyster's allure.  And what is that?  Pearls?  No, these aren't pearl oysters.  Mr. McMillin pops an Olympia into his mouth and smiles.  "Snob appeal," he says.  New Zealand's unemployment rate in the fourth quarter ended June 30 fell to 7.3% of the labor force from 7.4% in the previous quarter and rose from 5.3% in the year-earlier quarter, according to a survey by the Department of Statistics.  Lee-GN Acquisition Corp. said that 30,823,733 shares of General Nutrition Inc. were tendered as of Friday and that it accepted for payment 28,668,016 shares, or 91.3% of the total outstanding.  Lee-GN, formed by Thomas H. Lee Co., a Boston investment firm, offered $11.50 a share for General Nutrition.  The offer expired Friday.  Apache Corp. said it discovered natural gas in the Ardmore basin of Oklahoma.  The oil and gas concern said the well flowed from two zones at a combined rate of 7.9 million cubic feet of natural gas a day.  The well flowed at 5.1 million cubic feet of natural gas and 118 barrels of condensate-a-day through a 5/16-inch opening at a depth between 8,349 and 8,382 feet, and it flowed at 2.8 million cubic feet of natural gas and 51 barrels of condensate-a-day through a 1/4-inch opening at a depth between 9,528 and 9,593 feet.  Apache operates the well and owns a 75% working interest.  The remainder is owned by Warren American Oil Co., Tulsa, Okla.  Prime Computer Inc. was dropped from the computers industry group of the Dow Jones Equity Market Index because it is being acquired.  Chemical Bank threw a last-minute monkey wrench into the Washington Public Power Supply System's plan to return to the municipal bond market for the first time since its record 1983 default.  Today's planned pricing of the first leg of a $2.8 billion WPPSS refinancing was abruptly postponed after Chemical, as the defaulted bonds' trustee, vowed to try to grab part of the new offering's proceeds.  By sending a tart letter to the new bonds' trustees last week, Chemical made clear that it will continue to press its courtroom battle to extract as much as $1 billion from the power agency for holders of the old WPPSS bonds.  Though WPPSS's refinancing plan has been common knowledge on Wall Street for nine months, the Chemical Banking Corp. unit waited until less than one week before the bond sale to assert its position to Morgan Guaranty Trust Co., a unit of J.P. Morgan & Co., and Seattle-First National Bank, the new bonds' trustees.  Said William Berls, who oversees the WPPSS bonds for Chemical: "It is the position of the bank that Chemical . . . may have a lien on these funds.  We wanted the trustees to consider the position of Chemical Bank" before selling new bonds.  He added that Chemical sent a similar letter to WPPSS months ago.  WPPSS earned its Wall Street nickname Whoops when it defaulted on roughly one-fourth of the more than $8 billion of bonds it sold in the 1970s and early 1980s to build five nuclear plants.  The agency's planned bond sale this week was an attempt to refinance at lower interest rates the bonds that aren't in default, namely the debt securities sold to build power plant Nos. 1, 2, and 3.  But Chemical, which is trustee for the defaulted bonds used to build project Nos. 4 and 5, contends those bondholders paid more than their fair share of building costs for the plants.  In a "cost-sharing" lawsuit, Chemical is arguing that because of accounting errors and delays, expenses common to all the plants were charged to the final two.  Right now, the investors in the $2.25 billion of defaulted bonds stand to get only about 40 cents on the dollar.  The planned sale of $450 billion of taxfree bonds has been postponed while "we sort out the bond trustees' position," said Frank Ingrassia, an official of Goldman, Sachs & Co.'s public power division.  Goldman and Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. are co-managers of the bond sale.  The power supply system said it will announce today whether the sale will occur in the next few days.  Lawyers for both WPPSS and the underwriters said they believe Chemical's assertion of a claim or lien on the bond sale proceeds is "without merit."  Peter Ueberroth, frustrated in an attempt to purchase Eastern Airlines a few months ago, now is in a group bidding for control of small, financially ailing Hawaiian Airlines.  HAL Inc., owner of the carrier, said it will support the sale of at least 51% of its stock to a group that includes Mr. Ueberroth, the former commissioner of professional baseball in the U.S., and is led by J. Thomas Talbot, a Ueberroth associate.  The group will offer $22 a share, or about $21.9 million for a 51% stake, through a tender offer to all shareholders, the airline holding company said.  The price gives an indicated value of $43 million for all of HAL.  A source close to the proposed transaction said terms call for Mr. Ueberroth to serve as co-chairman of the company along with John H. Magoon Jr., HAL's current chairman, chief executive officer and majority holder.  Mr. Talbot would become chief executive, the source said.  Mr. Magoon, 73 years old, who owns about 57% of HAL, wasn't available for comment.  News of the accord and the price, which was far lower than an earlier bid, sent HAL's share price tumbling.  It closed at $25.25, down $6.375 a share, in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Mr. Talbot said the group's formal tender offer won't be made until Friday at the earliest.  The $22-a-share price is less than half the price of an earlier tentative offer by a unit of PacifiCorp, Portland, Ore.  In April, however, PacifiCorp declined to proceed with its $45-a-share bid.  Mr. Talbot, founder and former chairman of Jet America Airlines, participated in Mr. Ueberroth's unsuccessful bid this year to buy Eastern Airlines from Houston-based Texas Air Corp.  In an interview, he said he first approached HAL in May and said discussions resumed in earnest about a month ago.  The lower value of the bid reflects "losses for 2 1/2 years totaling $30 million" at HAL, he said.  "The latest financials speak for themselves."  Mr. Talbot said he believes he can reverse the carrier's fortunes.  He said its best prospects lie in the increasing air traffic between Japan and Hawaii.  HAL recently posted a first-half net loss of $13 million on revenue of $168 million.  The company, which has about 2,500 full-time employees, said its loss left it with a negative net worth -- or an excess of liabilities over assets -- of $8.5 million as of June 30.  For all of 1988, the company had a net loss of $8.8 million on revenue of $354 million.  Analysts said any new owner would face a difficult job in turning the airline company around.  "I think it's a desperate situation," said Daniel Hersh, an analyst at Bateman Eichler, Hill Richards Inc. "Quite frankly, any buyer who goes in will have to fund losses for some time."  Mr. Hersh said the strength of Hawaiian Airlines lies in its inter-island business, flying passengers among Hawaii's major islands.  The company has failed to compete with bigger carriers for traffic to and from the mainland U.S. and now should "reorient its business" to take advantage of traffic between Hawaii and Japan, he said.  To raise cash in recent months, HAL sold $8.4 million of airplanes and equipment.  Mr. Talbot said the company currently leases all of its roughly 30 planes.  P. Howard Edelstein, vice president, marketing, at Knight-Ridder Inc.'s financial information division, was named senior vice president, product marketing, a new position at this provider of financial information, decision-support products and transaction services, effective in early September.  Dow Jones & Co. owns 67% of Telerate.  For nine years I have been the super of a city garden and now I know for sure: No two denizens read a city garden the same way.  As for one's own, you don't really know how your garden's going over until the day you hear the folks next door refer to "that jungle"; until you've sent Thelonious Monk, the rooster you'd rescued from full-moon ceremonies at the local voodoo parlor, up the river to be with some hens near Sing Sing, and the selfsame neighbors express dismay at his absence -- whereas the lawyer two doors down had phoned daily to ascertain your longterm intentions in re "that rooster" whose crowing was wrecking his sleeping.  But I did not know what the upstairs folks in the brownstone across the street thought until the night this spring they phoned about my garden, at 10 p.m.  These people had wanted to visit when the clematis-rose-peony-iris ensemble peaked, so I assumed they were making an appointment for the blooming weekend.  Not exactly.  They wanted to arrange an undertaking.  "You see," my neighbor explained, "my husband's science class hatched these Pekin ducks from eggs as a school project a month ago.  He brought two home for our six-year-old daughter, and they'd learned to swim in the bathtub, diving for guppies and goldfish.  But this afternoon one of them, Funny, fell off the deck and died on the fire escape next door.  My Jamaican neighbors didn't know there was a dead duck out there 'til I went over.  The girl said, 'That duck's going to fly away.  You just have to fix its wings.' But what was broken was its neck.  I feel like a murderer and my daughter is very upset and -- could we bury our dead duck in your garden?  Right now?  I remember you said you had buried your dog there."  I recalled one day on the street having told this neighbor, who was musing about a final resting place for the elderly family dog, that four years ago, on a crisply beautiful spring day, my golden retriever, Thurber, had been put to sleep out back beside the blue columbine patch and that the kindly veterinarian had allowed Thurber to stay in the garden.  "It's not legal," he had said, "but if you'll promise to give him a good Jewish burial -- before sundown today -- O.K."  The six-year-old girl next door, who'd been questioning my gardening all along and had observed Thurber's passing through the chain-link-and-wisteria fence, thought things over for a few days and then asked: "If you water Thurber, will he turn into a plant?" (Thurber turned into a white birch, Betula papyrifera).  There was room for the duck between the white birch and a non-running bamboo, Sinarundinaria nitida, recently arrived from California.  However, since my garden is intensely densely planted and by 10 p.m. visibility is low even with fireflies and the all-night burglar light of the people over the back fence, I proposed burial in the a.m.  All the same, I wondered if it had occurred to my neighbor to ask her landlord, resident downstairs, if she might bury the duck in his all-ivy Skinner Boxstyle yard?  Yes, the thought had occurred, but her landlord had AIDS and despite AZT had been hospitalized several times already.  "I can't ask him about burying a dead duck -- or even talk to him about anything to do with death." (And besides, the man hated flowers.)  Well, had she thought of asking the woman two houses down, who likes flowers and is a gardener?  "I'm sure she'd freak out.  Her garden is very orderly, very tidy, it has a lawn . . .  I just wouldn't feel comfortable asking to disrupt that garden to bury a duck."  Which is why my garden had come to mind.  Not only was there already a golden retriever in it but, my neighbor observed, "your garden is so wild."  A little after 8 the next morning she crossed the street carrying a shoebox with the deceased duck and a bag of lime borrowed from the gardener with the ruly garden.  Funny was interred midway between the Thurber birch and the new bamboo.  We covered the downy yellow duckling with a sprinkling of lime and a pickup potpourri of rose petals (Gloire des Mousseux, Jacques Cartier, Climbing Cecile Brunner, Golden Showers), the last fantastical black and blue parrot tulips, foxglove bugles, catalpa bells, bleeding heart lockets and clematis.  A while later my neighbor's daughter came to pay her last respects and lay the duck's tombstone.  She had painted a sizable rock, found on the street, in dabs of red, white, yellow, blue and green, and written FUNNY in red topside.  As she floated more flower petals over the grave, the little girl said goodbye to the duck.  Her mother said, "Funny would like this place.  I'm sure Funny will be happy in this garden."  Funny lies very near the compost pile where, earlier in the season, I had informally recycled a ruby-crowned kinglet and two warblers that my cat, Be-bop, had downed along the Eastern Flyway, of which my garden is a very small stretch.  With the memorial service concluded, I got on with the planting: two houttuynias, a Phuopsis stylosa, a Cynoglossum nervosum, coreopsis "Goldfink," hemerocallis "Good Fairy of Oz" and so forth, but all afternoon I kept returning to my childhood garden.  Growing up in the woods across Lake Washington from Seattle, my sister, brother and I each had a vegetable and a flower garden to tend, and a surfeit of pets.  My flower garden, a fairly shady place, was also the family pet cemetery.  There rested Tweetie, the canary the cat caught on the bird's solo flight through the house; Pete the hamster -- instead of breeding, the night I left them together, Repeat killed Pete; three bunnies -- I was a notably unsuccessful rabbit breeder -- when Mopsy, my white rabbit, finally gave birth, she also committed infanticide; the Muscovy ducks, GusGus and Waddles, brought down by a neighbor's boxer, who later got Mammy and Pappy, the Bantam couple.  Whenever a pet died I would put the body in a Sunny Jim peanut butter jar, insert a scrap of paper with the animal's name printed for posterity, and twist the lid tight, so as to preserve my pet intact, for later exhumation.  I would bury the glass peanut butter coffin in my funerary flower garden and mark the spot with a small twig cross.  Each turtle, hamster, guppy, canary, etc. would be sent to R.I.P. according to modified Catholic rites, based on the old Baltimore Catechism.  So Funny, the Pekin duck, lies between Thurber, the birch, and the Chinese stationary bamboo, and has made me remember that my garden has always included dead pets, and most likely always will.  One way or another -- even in New York City -- animals find their way into my garden.  I water them and they come up roses.  White House budget director Richard Darman said he is "cautiously optimistic" that Congress will narrowly avoid triggering automatic spending cuts this fall under the Gramm-Rudman deficit-reduction law.  Mr. Darman also said delays in completing work on the budget for fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1., lessen the chances of reaching a bipartisan budget agreement for fiscal 1991 before Christmas.  Issuing a report required by the Gramm-Rudman law, Mr. Darman said passage of pending spending bills and faithful execution of the bipartisan budget accord reached earlier this year will bring the projected deficit below the $110 billion trigger for spending cuts.  "It'll be $109.999 billion," he said.  "They {Congress} will try to find a way to spend every last dime up to the . . . trigger."  The Congressional Budget Office, which makes different assumptions about the economy and the handling of the thrift-industry rescue, last week forecast that the deficit will be about $124 billion -- even if Congress lives up to the pact its leaders made with the White House in April.  But under the Gramm-Rudman law, only the White House budget office numbers count.  The Treasury yesterday said the deficit in July was $18.24 billion, compared with $22.92 billion in July 1988.  That produced a total deficit of $123.77 billion for the first 10 months of fiscal 1989, compared with $142.25 billion in the year-earlier period.  Mr. Darman said the administration currently estimates the deficit for the current fiscal year at "something just short of $170 billion."  That is well beyond the Gramm-Rudman target of $136 billion and also exceeds the 1988 deficit of $155.1 billion.  The new estimate reflects recent legislation to put $20 billion of the cost of cleaning up the thrift industry into the 1989 budget.  The Gramm-Rudman spending limit no longer applies to fiscal 1989, however -- a "giant loophole" that Mr. Darmam said should be closed.  Mr. Darman had hoped to resolve all the 1990 budget before Congress left on vacation Aug. 4, clearing the way for talks this fall on ways to cut the deficit for fiscal 1991 and subsequent years.  But delays in finding ways to raise the revenue and controversy over capital-gains taxes interfered.  Deliberations over the 1990 budget will extend at least through the end of September, Mr. Darman predicted.  Whether progress on the 1991 budget can be made after that depends on "the mood, attitude and spirit" of congressional leaders, he said.  "For those who might wish not to do this," he said, "the fact there isn't much time gives them an excuse."  Mr. Darman acknowledged there is "a possibility" that legislation to increase the federal debt ceiling may turn out to be a vehicle for a major budget compromise or an overhaul of the budgeting process.  He urged, however, that Congress and the administration first come to terms on reducing the deficit before trying to alter the budget process or the Gramm-Rudman law.  House Budget Committee Chairman Leon Panetta said in a statement yesterday, "Congress shouldn't be lulled to sleep by {the budget office's} artificially low deficit projections."  Even if automatic spending cuts are averted this fall, the California Democrat said, "we still need $30 billion to $60 billion in additional deficit reduction for 1991."  The Gramm-Rudman law requires the budget office to issue a deficit prediction that ignores pending legislation and assumes current policies are unchanged.  The budget office put that figure at $116.2 billion.  Pending appropriations bills would add about $6 billion or $7 billion to the deficit, but pending revenue bills and other legislation would reduce it by between $12 billion and $14 billion, Mr. Darman said.  "The margin for error is very small," he said.  Under the Gramm-Rudman law, the budget office must make a deficit projection on Oct. 16 that will determine if automatic spending cuts are triggered.  In its budget report for July, the Treasury said receipts totaled $66.26 billion, up from $60.69 billion in July 1988.  Outlays were $84.49 billion, up from $83.61 billion the year before.  The July outlays don't include any of the $20 billion to be spent on the thrift industry.  That spending will show up in August and September.  The narrowing of the deficit so far this year represents stronger tax receipts than the government expected.  THE TOKYO STOCK EXCHANGE'S capitalization is about 1 1/2 times that of the New York Stock Exchange.  The difference was misstated in an earlier edition.  (See: "Trading in Tokyo: U.S. Brokerage Firms Operating in Japan Have Mixed Results --- Salomon Brothers, Goldman, Morgan Stanley Thrive, but Chase Is Pulling Back --- Still, No Match for Nomura" -- WSJ Aug. 16, 1989)  When Congress returns from its August recess, lawmakers will crank the Commodity Futures Trading Commission through a political wringer every bit as tight as the narrowly averted soybean squeeze in Chicago.  CFTC officials already are being whipsawed by some critics who say the agency and the Chicago Board of Trade should have moved sooner to stave off the squeeze last month in the soybean pit -- and, at the same time, by others who contend they should have let the squeeze play out.  "It may prove to be that the cure was worse than the disease," says Sen. Christopher Bond (R., Mo.) in a letter to CFTC Chairman Wendy Gramm.  The CFTC is also under mounting pressure to take enforcement action against Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. for allegedly trying to corner the market.  Some major traders are calling the Italian grain merchant a reckless cowboy and warning of further market chaos if Ferruzzi isn't penalized by the CFTC and disciplined by the exchange.  The Ferruzzi affair, coming on the heels of 46 indictments in the government's investigation of fraudulent futures trading in the Chicago markets, has deepened widespread distrust of the CFTC and the futures industry's system of self-regulation.  The credibility of the agency, never known for regulatory ardor, is at stake as never before.  And the outcome of the investigation will influence the shape of market-reform legislation, as well as the scope of CFTC's regulatory powers.  "The CFTC has got to deal with this matter, and promptly," says Commissioner Fowler West.  "We have to find a way to discourage people from taking the whole system to the brink."  Pressure on the agency is particularly intense from Farm Belt lawmakers, many of whose constituents suffered heavy losses after the exchange forced Ferruzzi to sell contracts for the delivery of more than 20 million bushels of soybeans.  The big selloff caused a plunge in soybean prices.  "I know who lost -- every farmer in Iowa," asserts Rep. David Nagle (D., Iowa).  "It's important to know who won."  Ferruzzi is depicting itself as the biggest loser of all in a public relations campaign guided by Hill & Knowlton Inc., and appears to be winning some sympathy.  Many foreign traders and soybean producers agree that Ferruzzi's massive holdings were economically justified; the Board of Trade stepped in, they maintain, to protect U.S. traders from defaulting on obligations to deliver to Ferruzzi.  The exchange insists it had to act to ensure an orderly market.  Other than jawboning and imposing trading limits on large commercial traders, it isn't clear what power the CFTC has -- or is willing to exercise -- to deter squeezes.  For one, the agency has brought only five price-manipulation cases in its 15-year history.  Moreover, in a case two years ago the commission adopted such a narrow interpretation of price manipulation that "it's difficult for us to find a manipulation," says Commissioner West.  "Hell, it's virtually impossible."  This situation isn't likely to sit well with those members of the Senate and House agriculture committees who favor a more aggressive CFTC, nor with major traders who are familiar with Ferruzzi's dealings.  "It was a classic squeeze," says one trader.  "If there's no action, people will get the impression they can . . . get away with it.  This goes to the fabric of the regulatory system."  This trader, who insists on anonymity, blames Raul Gardini, president of the Ferruzzi Group, a Milan-based conglomerate, for what happened in the Chicago soybeans pit.  "That Italian has a gigantic view of himself as conqueror of the world," he asserts.  U.S. regulators must bring him in check, he says, adding: "The market relies on firmness, integrity and rationalityand having a cowboy out there is bad news."  David Swanson, chief executive officer of Ferruzzi-controlled Central Soya Co., which has processing plants in Indiana and Ohio, takes sharp issue with such a characterization of his boss, describing Mr. Gardini as a "dynamic" and "visionary" businessman who "certainly stands large on the international stage."  Mr. Swanson also denies that Ferruzzi sought to corner the market.  "We didn't own one more bean than we needed," he says."We simply were trying to hedge the legitimate and bona fide interests of our company."  It would be "ridiculous" for Ferruzzi to attempt squeeze, he adds.  "We need the Chicago Board of Trade."  At a hearing Sept. 8, the Senate Agriculture Committee will ask CFTC officials for their assessment of what happened.  "Charges of market manipulation are always serious," says Committee Chairman Patrick Leahy (D., Vt.) in a letter to Mrs. Gramm.  "If anyone has broken the rules . . . they must be discovered and punished."  Lawmakers also will demand a full report on the CFTC's response to the so-called emergency in the soybean market.  It still isn't clear whether the agency acquiesced to the Board of Trade's liquidation order or forced the exchange's hand in the closing days of the July soybean contract.  Some House members are unhappy with Mrs. Gramm, the CFTC chairman, claiming she was initially less than forthcoming about the agency's role.  The most pressing issue facing Congress and the CFTC, however, will be how to prevent another market crisis.  "Whether you call it a squeeze or a corner, you're talking about somebody jerking the market around," says Mr. West, the CFTC commissioner.  "We need to find a way to move earlier."  PARAMOUNT COMMUNICATIONS Inc. doesn't plan to appeal the Delaware Supreme Court ruling rejecting Paramount's challenge of the Time-Warner merger.  Lawsuits filed by Time shareholders opposing the merger are pending in Delaware trial court.  A previous edition stated otherwise.  (See: "Marketing & Media: Warner Settles Suit With Chris-Craft, Advancing Process of Merger With Time" -- WSJ Aug. 21, 1989)  Anthea Disney, editor of Conde Nast Publications Inc.'s Self magazine, abruptly resigned just a year after taking the job and only months after a significant redesign of the magazine.  Ms. Disney, 44 years old, a highly respected editor who joined Self in July 1988, officially announced her resignation from the monthly women's lifestyle and health magazine that is Conde Nast's third-largest magazine in terms of circulation.  In a statement, the company said Ms. Disney left because of "personality conflicts."  The company declined to elaborate, and Ms. Disney couldn't be reached for comment.  But Conde Nast executives, who requested anonymity, said she resigned because of direct and frequent run-ins with Alexander Liberman, Conde Nast's editorial director, over the recent redesign of the magazine and its future direction.  Mr. Liberman, a 77-year-old veteran of Conde Nast, oversees the editorial content of nearly all of Conde Nast's stable of magazines.  "Liberman became involved this spring," said one Conde Nast executive.  "She {Ms.  Disney} had redesigned it, but he wanted to become more involved in the look of the magazine.  He started calling the shots."  Conde Nast said it expects to name a "high profile" new editor, possibly by tomorrow.  Neither Mr. Liberman nor Conde Nast Chairman S.I. Newhouse Jr. would comment on Ms. Disney's resignation.  In a press release, Mr. Newhouse praised Ms. Disney for her contributions to Self.  Ms. Disney, whose previous editorial experience includes editing posts on British tabloids and the New York Daily News, was editor of Us magazine last year when she was lured to Self by Mr. Newhouse.  Self was one of the fastest-growing magazines in the early 1980s, but it was slumping in advertising pages and in paid circulation at the time of Ms. Disney's appointment.  Ms. Disney is credited with infusing the health-centered magazine with a slick, sophisticated tone that has drawn a slew of new advertisers.  The magazine had been radically redesigned with its December 1988 issue to include a new logo, bolder graphics, more celebrity-related stories, new senior editors and articles by high-priced free-lance writers.  Ad pages at Self for the first six months of 1989 jumped 8.2% to 662, while ad revenue increased 18% to $21 million.  A spokesperson for Self said that since Ms. Disney had become editor, Self had attracted 50 new advertisers while losing only a few.  New advertisers have included Guess jeans, Mazda autos and Calvin For Men fragrance.  Total paid circulation had been climbing in 1988, but in the 1989 first half, it dropped 4.2% to 1.2 million.  Newsstand sales were down 13%, but subscriptions jumped 7.2%.  Conde Nast is a subsidiary of Advance Publications Inc.  James F. McDonald, formerly chairman of Gould Inc., will have the job of rebuilding Prime Computer Inc. following its acquisition by J.H. Whitney & Co. in a leveraged buy-out.  Although he is best known for selling off Gould's many businesses after finding a chaotically assembled company with many hidden losses, Mr. McDonald said he plans to keep nearly all of Prime's operations and make them profitable enough to pay off substantial debt.  Russell H. Planitzer, a Whitney partner who has been shepherding the $1.3 billion acquisition, said Mr. McDonald, 49 years old, will be named president and chief executive of Prime after Whitney completes its $20-a-share tender offer, which he expects within 10 days.  Mr. Planitzer is expected to become chairman of Prime.  Mr. McDonald said in an interview that he plans to break Prime's businesses into smaller operations with separate profit and loss reporting.  "We have to get costs in line with the revenue structure" at Prime, a Natick, Mass.-based maker of midrange computers and computerized design systems.  While operations won't be sold, Mr. McDonald expects to make the company more profitable by trimming the work force and paring research and development spending.  Among those leaving will be Prime's current president, Anthony L. Craig, a former General Electric Co. executive who took office last November.  Mr. McDonald declined to estimate the number of Prime employees who will be laid off.  Since last fall, Prime has been fighting off a hostile takeover attempt by MAI Basic Four Inc., a Tustin, Calif., minicomputer maker.  Whitney emerged as the suitor of choice in June after Prime's investment bankers had contacted 65 different potential acquirers.  Prime has been posting losses recently, partly because customers worried by the takeover fight deferred orders.  Analysts and consultants question whether Prime will be profitable enough to handle $150 million a year in interest payments after the buy-out and continue to adequately fund research and development.  Mr. McDonald maintains that Prime's $500-million-a-year computer service business generates enough cash to pay the interest.  He said Prime's fast-growing computerized design business may get more R&D funding, and that the proprietary Series 50 minicomputer line will be able to cut costs.  "The series 50, over time, will diminish," in sales because of the industrywide shift to standard computer designs, Mr. Planitzer said.  But "if we manage it right, it can pay off the debt," he said.  Mr. McDonald, a one-time University of Kentucky basketball player, was a 21-year International Business Machines Corp. veteran when he was recruited to take the No. 2 job at Gould, a Rolling Meadows, Ill., company that had acquired a slew of high-tech businesses.  But after he arrived in 1984, he said, it became clear that there were huge hidden losses in certain defense contracts and that other divisions would never be profitable.  Mr. McDonald then executed an often criticized sell-off of Gould's disparate divisions in a series of moves that ultimately proved highly profitable for shareholders.  Last September he agreed to sell Gould's remaining operations to Nippon Mining Co. for an unexpectedly high $1.1 billion.  John Driscoll, a former Gould director who is president of Rock Island Co., a St. Paul., Minn., investment company, said: "He got into something he hadn't bargained for but he stuck with it.  I really respect him for that."  He added, "I hope he gets to run a show where he isn't dragged down by a financial condition for which he isn't responsible."  Since last fall, Mr. McDonald has been working to sell off certain of the Gould operations that Nippon decided to spin off.  He met Mr. Planitzer while unsuccessfully trying to peddle some computer operations to Concurrent Computer Inc., another computer firm in which Whitney has invested.  Ironically, Encore Computer Inc., a computer company headed by former Prime president Kenneth Fisher, ultimately bought Gould's computer business.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Aug. 18, Aug. 11,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.95 7.92  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.66 8.50  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.76 8.56  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 9.04 8.98  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.75 8.54  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.30 8.12  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.23 8.01  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 8.20 7.99  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.18 8.04  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.17 8.10  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, August 16, 1989 and Wednesday August 9, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  Paul W. Douglas got his first taste of the coal industry in Great Britain in 1948, when horses still helped men pull the rich black mineral from the mines.  Fresh from Princeton University, Mr. Douglas was part of an international team studying the post-war British economy.  And four months in the mines -- an assignment he got because "my boat arrived a day late" -- taught him about the powerful culture of coal.  Even miners who hated going underground wouldn't leave for better paying factory jobs.  Today, the 62-year-old Mr. Douglas is still learning how stubborn coal miners can be.  Only this time, the obstinate miners are his own employees.  The chairman and chief executive officer of Pittston Co. is the target of a bitter, five-month-long strike by 1,700 members of the United Mine Workers union at sites in Kentucky, Virginia and West Virginia.  His decision to reject the union's industrywide contract in 1988 and insist on leaner terms has sparked the UMW's biggest battle in more than a decade.  Earlier this summer, the Pittston dispute led to wildcat strikes at scores of companies.  And while only the Pittston workers remain on strike, coal companies say they're bracing for more work stoppages.  Until recently, Mr. Douglas has been mum on the strike.  But in a recent interview, he insisted that he's determined to wait out the miners.  "We're clearly prepared to go indefinitely," he says, as he takes a puff on his signature Montecruz cigar.  If the UMW wants a contract, it will have to agree to reduced health benefits, changes in work rules and an end to Pittston's contributions to a multi-employer pension fund.  While Pittston's coal operations reported a $3.6 million loss in the second quarter, the company's strategic plan permits such short-term sacrifices to win this battle.  And Mr. Douglas's five years as chairman have shown he isn't afraid to go head to head with unions.  It's a stance some don't expect from the son of labor advocate Sen. Paul Howard Douglas.  "It must be extremely difficult walking in his father's footsteps to go through what he's gone through," says Marc Cohen, coal analyst at Kidder Peabody.  "But he's tough as nails."  Mr. Douglas spent nearly 30 years at Freeport Minerals Co., rising to chief executive before he was hired to salvage Pittston.  The company's three major divisions -- Brink's, Burlington Air Express and the coal mines -- were losing money.  At Brink's, Mr. Douglas says he found a company that was being run by the Teamsters union rather than management.  He refused to negotiate with the Teamsters, relying on a court ruling that prohibited one union from representing both guards and drivers.  Wages and benefits were cut, although employees were given a profit sharing plan.  Brink's is now profitable and expanding into new markets.  "Our plan wasn't to get rid of the union," Mr. Douglas insists.  "We've simply got to have a healthy company to provide jobs.  And we'll pay any price and make any sacrifice to get that done."  In Burlington's operations, Mr. Douglas is credited with repeating the Brink's strategy.  "We had to slash a lot of jobs," he says.  As a result, he claims, Burlington "will probably be the jewel in our crown."  In the second quarter, Burlington reported operating profit of about $6.1 million, nearly three times that of the year-earlier quarter.  The final task in rebuilding Pittston is taking on the beleaguered coal division, whose problems mirror the plight of the entire U.S. coal industry.  Foreign coal producers, helped by lower labor costs and government subsidies, have won increasing numbers of contracts.  Pittston began to revive its coal operations by writing off about $240 million in assets and investing another $140 million in new equipment.  Mine managers were sent to short business courses.  Productivity soared 67% to 20 tons per miner a day from 12 tons a day between 1984 and 1987, Mr. Douglas says.  But the price of metallurgical coal, used mainly in making steel, fell by 30%.  "All the managerial and labor successes kept getting washed away," he says.  Then Pittston bought another coal company, Paramount, which the UMW has failed to organize.  Paramount, with its less restrictive work rules, convinced Mr. Douglas that Pittston didn't need the Bituminous Coal Operators Association, the industry group that bargains with the UMW.  While Mr. Douglas says he considered dropping out of the BCOA as early as 1984, the company didn't quit until last year.  Since then, Mr. Douglas says he has repeatedly sought concessions from the UMW.  "The days of Appalachia and the coal business are vastly different than when my father was alive," he says.  Pittston wants to cut costs with a health plan requiring workers to pay 20% of medical bills and flexible work hours, such as weekend shifts.  It figures the plan would create jobs, but the UMW says it will mean cuts.  In addition, Pittston wants to drop out of a multi-employer pension fund that covers retired miners and their dependents, a demand the UMW strongly opposes.  Both sides differ vastly on how many workers Pittston should support in the fund.  Pittston, for example, claims it never employed many of the workers the union insists fall under its obligations.  The UMW says Pittston is guilty of numerous unfair labor practices and hasn't budged on its demands for concessions.  It also charges the company with transferring coal reserves to its non-union subsidiary to get around the contract.  "It's a classic case of union busting," says Richard Trumka, UMW president.  Pittston officials deny that.  Formal talks haven't been held for months and the outlook for a settlement is bleak, especially as violence escalates in the coalfields.  The UMW estimates that Pittston's production is about 35% of capacity as the company moves supervisors and replacement workers into UMW jobs.  Mr. Douglas says the mines will reach 50% production by this fall.  "Time is not on the union's side," he says.  Think double-digit yields are a thing of the past?  Take a look at municipal bonds.  For investors in high tax brackets, many munis offer yields equivalent to 10% or more, when the value of these bonds' tax-exempt status is taken into account.  "If people have been waiting and have missed a lot of the rate declines this year, then this is an especially attractive time to consider buying munis," says Neal Attermann, vice president and manager of municipal research at Kidder, Peabody & Co.  That's because yields on municipals haven't fallen as much in recent months as those on taxable securities such as Treasury bonds.  "It really makes sense for high-tax bracket investors to select municipals right now instead of Treasurys," says Marshall B. Front, executive vice president at Stein Roe & Farnham Inc., a Chicago-based investment-counseling firm.  Some of the highest yields now are on long-term municipal revenue bonds.  Unlike general obligation bonds, which are backed by the full faith and credit of the municipality issuing the securities, revenue bonds are backed by the revenue generated by the bridges, airports and other special facilities they are sold to finance.  The yield on a group of 25 revenue bonds compiled by the Bond Buyer, a trade publication, now stands at 7.39%.  For an investor in the 33% federal income tax bracket, 7.39% tax-free is the same as earning 11.03% on a taxable investment.  That's a taxable-equivalent yield nearly three percentage points more than the current yield on 30-year Treasury bonds.  While not all municipal bonds offer double-digit taxable-equivalent yields, they can still be very attractive compared with yields on taxable investments.  For investors in the 33% bracket, some three-year general obligation municipals now offer about one percentage point more than three-year Treasurys do, after adjusting for federal taxes, according to calculations by Stein Roe.  The one area where muni yields don't offer a clear advantage for high-bracket investors is money market mutual funds.  Returns on taxable funds beat those on tax-exempt funds after adjusting for federal income taxes.  Even with money funds, however, munis may have the edge for some investors when state and local income taxes are considered.  But investors in high-tax states, such as New York or California, may find it advantageous to keep their money in single-state municipal bond money funds, which are free from all federal, state and local income taxes for in-state investors.  Muni specialists say municipal bond yields are likely to hold steady or possibly increase slightly in coming weeks, even if Treasury bond yields drop further.  The reason is a large wave of new municipal issues that will soon hit the market.  All this new financing "should slightly raise yields, thereby increasing the attractiveness of municipal bonds," says S.E. Canaday Jr., vice president at John Nuveen & Co.  Municipal bond yields haven't fallen as fast as those on Treasurys for several reasons.  The risk that a municipal bond may be called, or redeemed, before its stated maturity is one important factor.  While most Treasury issues can't be redeemed before their final maturity date, municipals usually don't have such "call protection."  Moreover, even veteran bond traders sometimes have trouble understanding the complex provisions in municipal bond offerings that spell out the circumstances under which the bonds may be called.  This is particularly important at a time when interest rates are declining.  It is in times of falling rates that issuers call their high-yielding bonds, typically replacing them with new, lower-yielding securities as a way to reduce their borrowing costs.  The market demands a bit higher yield to compensate for this call risk.  Concern about the economy is another factor.  Signs of slower economic growth this summer sent many investors rushing to buy Treasury issues for safety and liquidity reasons.  In addition, interest on Treasury issues isn't subject to state and local income taxes.  The municipal market has been hurt by reduced purchases by property and casualty insurance companies and by an increase in the volume of new issues.  Municipal bond specialists advise investors buying munis to concentrate on high-quality issues and to stay away from lower-rated bonds.  That's because the difference in yields between high and low-quality munis is relatively small.  "So you're not getting adequately compensated for buying lower-quality paper," says Donna Avedisian, vice president at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  In addition, with the economy slowing and some forecasters even predicting a recession, "some of the weaker credits might experience some stress," says Ms. Avedisian.  "So investors should pay a lot of attention to quality."  Calculating the taxable-equivalent yield on municipal bonds is easy, once investors know their "marginal tax rate."  That's the rate that applies to a taxpayer's last dollar of income.  To find the taxable equivalent yield on a tax-exempt investment, simply divide the municipal bond yield by one minus your marginal tax rate.  For example, an investor in the 33% bracket would divide the municipal bond yield by 0.67.  Demand, in this Case,  Cuts Hospital Prices  DO SOMETHING about your charges, or we'll take our business elsewhere.  That's the warning University Hospitals of Cleveland received from local businesses and insurers who said they admired the institution's quality of care -- but were fed up with its stiff bills.  So, last month University Hospitals unveiled a program to slash costs for selected patients.  Some small ambulatory clinics have reduced room charges for simple surgery, but this appears to be the first effort of its kind in a teaching hospital, where costs are often higher because of their research and educational functions.  Known as Primary Care Units, the program offers reduced room charges for individuals who aren't severely ill and who don't need high-tech medical equipment and specialized care.  For instance, children with routine asthma and bronchitis or adults with cirrhosis would be treated in one of about 80 beds the hospital has set aside for low-risk patients.  The 80 beds represent about 10% of the hospital's total.  The daily charge for such patients in pediatrics has been cut to $400, from $700.  For medical and surgical services, the daily fee has dropped to $450, from $660.  "It's no longer sufficient for us to say that we're a leader in technology and that we provide the best quality care," says Farah M. Walters, executive vice president of University Hospitals.  "We have to do all of that plus do it in a more cost-effective way."  Will the plan work?  Stephen Adams, a spokesman for Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Ohio, says that although the insurer hasn't decided whether to participate in the program, "It's a step in the right direction."  Premium Refunds Are  A Healthy Incentive AN OHIO COMPANY is holding down medical costs with "wellness dividends."  Famous Supply Co., a building-products distributor in Akron, decided in 1984 to make its 500 employees shoulder more of the cost of their health benefits.  The insurance deductible was increased to $150 from $100, and workers, for the first time, were required to pay a monthly premium for medical coverage: $25 for individuals and $50 for families.  The problem, says Craig Raub, the company's controller, was that employees who rarely submitted claims felt they were being penalized.  The company, therefore, began offering refunds for employees who stay healthy.  Any worker who hasn't submitted a claim for a year receives back two-thirds of his or her premiums as a dividend.  A family, for instance, would get a check for $400, two-thirds of their $600 annual payment.  People who submit a small number of claims can still be eligible for a dividend.  Total dividends paid last year: $58,800.  Mr. Raub acknowledges that the program can be viewed as discouraging people to visit a doctor when they need care.  But he says the system has made employees more conscious about their medical bills and their health.  That, in turn, has enabled Famous Supply to keep increases in health-care costs below the national average of 12% to 15%.  "When there's a little bit of incentive to control costs," he says, "people get smarter about how they use" health benefits.  The Boss Says: Earn  Your Keep, Keep More  BENEFITS ARE like wages, says CRS Sirrine Inc.: Employees have to earn them.  A novel program at this Houston-based architecture and engineering firm links new employees' medical coverage to whether they do their jobs well.  A new hire at CRS pays a minimum of $40 a month for medical coverage, which includes a steep $2,500 deductible.  Benefits are available right away, but the company doesn't make any contribution.  Performance objectives are set out upon hiring, followed by a review six months later.  "If they receive a high rating, they become what we call a 'core' employee," says Norma E. Koontz, manager of employee benefits, adding that then the company contributes to benefits.  The same employee who was paying $40 a month for health benefits would no longer have to pay a penny.  In fact, he or she would receive an extra $17 a month in their paycheck.  The deductible would remain the same.  If after six months the employee still wasn't performing, the company would continue to withhold contributions.  New hires have as long as 18 months to make the grade.  If they haven't by then, the company says they are likely to quit anyway.  Mrs. Koontz says the system, which was adopted in 1987, hasn't hurt the company's recruitment efforts.  Predicting that CRS Sirrine's approach will soon become more commonplace, she says: "Companies are beginning to recognize that benefits are just a part of compensation."  Odds and Ends  NINE OUT OF 10 employers are considering restricting dependent medical coverage as a way to help control health costs, according to a survey by Northwestern National Life Insurance Co. in Minneapolis.  More than half of those surveyed said they may restrict or exclude coverage for dependent mental health or chemical-dependency illnesses. . . .  About 40% of the hospitals in the U.S. may be boarded up by the year 2000.  A study by the National Association for Hospital Development estimates that the number of hospitals will fall to 4,100 from the current 6,800 because of financial pressures.  Some of the facilities, however, may be converted to other health purposes, such as drug-abuse centers.  Larry G. Morris, 51 years old, formerly senior vice president and chief financial officer of Tiger International Inc., a unit of Federal Express Corp., was named executive vice president, chief financial officer and chief administrative officer of this direct-mail company, succeeding Gene R. Ehnen, 58, in the financial and administrative posts.  Mr. Ehnen also is retiring as vice chairman, a post that will be left vacant.  Monday, August 21, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.:8.75% 30 to 44 days; 8.625% 45 to 59 days; 8.50% 60 to 89 days; 8.25% 90 to 119 days; 8.125% 120 to 149 days; 8% 150 to 179 days; 7.625% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000:8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.25% one month; 8.15% two months; 8.10% three months; 8% six months; 7.92% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.80% one month; 8.70% three months; 8.70% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.72% 30 days; 8.60% 60 days; 8.53% 90 days; 8.45% 120 days; 8.38% 150 days; 8.30% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 7/8% six months; 8 13/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 21, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.99%, 13 weeks; 7.85%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.15%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).10.03%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.05%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.20%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Paul S. Buddenhagen, a vice president of Temple, Barker & Sloane Inc., was named a director of this fiber materials concern, filling a vacancy.  Three executives were named to new positions of this iron-ore pellet producer.  William R. Calfee, group executive vice president, was named senior executive vice president; Frank S. Forsythe, executive vice president, commercial, was named executive vice president, operations; and John S. Brinzo, senior vice president, finance, was named executive vice president, finance.  Thomas A. Croswell was elected a corporate vice president, focusing on the managed healthcare business of this insurer.  He had been vice president in Prudential's Western group operations, based in Woodland Hills, Calif.  Two summers now have brought us the death, by cancer, of an important American writer.  Raymond Carver died at 50 on Aug. 2, 1988, and Donald Barthelme died at 58 on July 23rd.  These losses diminish us all, for Carver and Barthelme were two of the best short story writers of the past 20 years.  Their work aroused strong feelings and many imitations, and seemed to sum up for our time two classic tendencies in American literature: what Philip Rahv once called (in a less racially sensitive age) paleface and redskin.  The contrast is familiar: nature vs. culture, rough vs. smooth.  Carver's characters were usually West Coast, lower-class rural people, "rednecks" if not actually redskins.  Barthelme's (paleface) characters were East Coast, upper-middle-class "urban sophisticates."  Carver's literary ancestors were Chekhov and Hemingway; Barthelme's were Joyce, the surrealists, and S.J. Perelman.  Carver's predominant literary form was the realistic tragic monologue; Barthelme's was the surrealistic comic collage.  But such dichotomies obscure these writers' common virtues -- their incorruptible literary seriousness, their courage and fecundity, and the undertone of deep erotic and family sorrow that reverberates throughout their work.  Though Carver appeared to wear his heart on his sleeve, and Barthelme to keep his hands in his pockets (or keep them busy juggling verbal dreck and diamonds), their characters struggled with feelings of futility and depression and often with alcoholism.  But in their stories both Carver and Barthelme also bore unsentimental witness to the variety and richness of contemporary American speech and culture -- high and low -- and to their profound connections with the past.  So, as we might expect in such accomplished writers, redskin and paleface tend to merge.  Despite first impressions, Barthelme's work is heartfelt and Carver's artful.  Carver's devotion to the enterprise of literature is especially evident in his last work, the recently published collection of poems entitled "A New Path to the Waterfall" (Atlantic Monthly Press, 126 pages, $15.95).  Carver had published four earlier books of poems in addition to the six volumes of stories that brought him fame (many of his best can be found in "Where I'm Calling From: New and Selected Stories").  In the words of his wife, the poet Tess Gallagher, who wrote the introduction to "A New Path," Carver never considered poetry a hobby or pastime but a "spiritual necessity."  The poems themselves are as transparent and emotionally direct as Carver's stories.  They don't avail themselves of specifically poetic techniques but calmly proceed to act as if generic barriers don't count for much.  Ms. Gallagher describes how important the example of the Nobel Prize-winning poet Czeslaw Milosz was to Carver.  In "Unattainable Earth" (1986) Mr. Milosz magnificently blended poetry and prose quotations from earlier writers, letters, notebook entries and traditional verse in an effort to achieve "a more spacious form," and in this volume Carver incorporates words not only by Mr. Milosz but also by six other Swedish, Czech, American and English poets and prose writers, and 15 quotations from stories by Chekhov set up in loose poetic measure.  The result is an extremely attractive, accessible and moving colloquy across time, space and language that complements the intense autobiographical content of most of Carver's poems themselves.  His subjects cover lots of ground: ancient Greece, Renaissance Italy, Kafka, "Star Trek," Haydn and Mozart, the FoliesBergere, El Paso, Reno, the Irish Sea, but he always returns to his brutal childhood in Yakima, Wash., his alcoholic father, his teen-age marriage and burdensome kids, the alcoholic decline that almost killed him in 1976, his love of fishing -- and finally his happy second marriage and clear-eyed early death.  His poems are monologues or narratives -- short stories -- about troubled marriages and childhoods, about "the world of Raymond Carver," as Ms. Gallagher writes, "in which a man puts his head on the executioner's block while touring a castle only to have the hand of his companion come down on his neck like an axe . . . and in which we watch as a drowned child is carried above the trees in the tongs of a helicopter."  In a wonderful phrase Ms. Gallagher notes that Carver avoided facile irony "at a time when a lesser writer might have carved out a sad, edgy little empire with it."  A clear, compassionate emotionality informs his best and most distinctive work.  His patron saint was Chekhov, but a good account of his work might well be borrowed from Edmund Wilson's 1924 review of an earlier American writer's first books: "Mr.  Hemingway's . . . prose is of the first distinction. . . .  The characteristic {of his work} is a naivete of language, often passing into the colloquialism of the character dealt with, which serves actually to convey profound emotions and complex states of mind."  Like all strong writers Raymond Carver wrote as if he had the whole of European and American culture in his bones -- to quote another old American author, T.S. Eliot.  Carver's last book is both an admirable coda and an invitation to reread his fiction.  In the end, we learn, he died a happy man.  When Ms. Gallagher told him in the hospital that she'd have to take a trip to Russia for both of them, he said, "I'll get there before you," and grinned.  "I'm traveling faster."  ---  Mr. Locke teaches English and comparative literature at Columbia University.  "A lot of people are into music just because it's somethin' to do, and they say, 'Well, I'm gonna get out of it next year, I done made enough money.' My thing is not that way.  See, music to me is my blood, it's my breathin', it's my everything.  I don't wanna ever in life do nothin' else but what I do.  Per-i-od.  "I been out here for almost 44 years," Ray Charles continues.  "I guess you could say without braggin' I'm kind of like a Coca-Cola, like a trademark or somethin'."  Indeed Ray Charles has become synonymous with soul, a style he pioneered in the '50s by fusing gospel fervor with blues funk.  And folks still appear thirsty for the real thing.  Year after year fans keep him on the road for as long as he likes, playing every place from symphony halls to airport hangars, everything from righteous Rachmaninoff to country-gone-to-meeting. (For dates on his current tour, see the listings below.)  This past week they mobbed Manhattan's 200-seat Blue Note for six nights, vying for the privilege of paying $55 to catch one of Mr. Charles's rare club appearances, his first such Big Apple gig in longer than he can remember.  As the faithful waited in the rain, hoping for a miracle that would shoehorn them into the late show, the man himself was unwinding between sets in a club office.  His signature shades were on, his shoes were off, and instead of the ivories, he was fingering chess pieces.  Pondering the last move by Al Jackson, music director of his 16-man band, Brother Ray keeps up a running commentary.  "I'm gonna accept that, yeah, I got to accept that," he says in a gravel-bottomed drawl.  "So, since I have to accept that . . . humm . . ."  He moves his rook.  "Yeah, it's a good interesting game, it causes you to think," Charles says of his longtime passion.  "Just like people go out and they do aerobics, well chess is the same thing mentally."  Right now Charles, who turns 59 next month, needs all the cerebral calisthenics he can get.  After six albums with Columbia's country-music division that performed disappointingly, he's negotiating a contract with a new label -- by himself.  "Over the years lawyers have messed up more deals for people, 'cause my lawyer got to prove how great he is, and the company's lawyer got to prove how great he is, and the next thing you know the whole damn deal goes down the drain and both of them are still gettin' paid," he harrumphs.  "After I make the deal I let the lawyers get their little buts and ifs straightened out."  So far he's done just fine.  In fact Charles's 1960 agreement with ABC-Paramount gave him a degree of control that's still extraordinary -- a production deal, profit sharing and ownership of his masters.  So today when you buy one of the collections of those ABC classics -- "Georgia on My Mind," "I Can't Stop Loving You," "Hit the Road Jack" and "Busted" among them -- some of your money is going to Ray Charles Enterprises Inc.  "It's not that I don't have people doing things for me, it's just that I control it," he is explaining.  "I'm involved in anything that has to do with Ray Charles."  Maybe this fierce independence was born of his blindness.  He decided early on to be his own kind of blind black singer.  He made his motto "no dog, no cane, no guitar," and took up the piano even though it was kept on the "white" side of the segregated Florida state school for the deaf and blind he attended.  He didn't want to be lumped with the strumming blind bluesmen of the previous generation.  Before he left the school at 15, he'd also learned clarinet, trumpet, saxophone, organ -- and how to compose music in Braille.  He started his career by shortening his name from Ray Charles Robinson to avoid confusion with the boxer Sugar Ray.  And in a more crucial decision, he disregarded the advice of record executives in the early '60s who told him that maybe country music wasn't the wisest career move.  Instead, he went and recorded the still-startling "Modern Sounds in Country and Western Music," his first million-selling album.  More recently he fought the government when it threatened to cut off funding for the Braille edition of Playboy.  "First of all, you can't even say the pictures are filthy, cause there ain't no pictures," he thunders.  "And you can't say they use a dirty word because you tell me any nine-year-old that don't know those words today.  Oh, I get mad, honey . . .  "Ok, Unit 3," Charles says, apparently out of the blue.  Then comes the crackling reply, "This is Unit 3, Base."  Charles is using a no-hands walkie-talkie.  "OK, you better give me the time now," he says.  Seconds later there's a knock on the door.  It's Unit 3, otherwise known as road manager Muhammad Abdullah.  "The time?" he says crisply.  "It's 10:35."  In addition to Abdullah, Charles's companions for the next several months include the brass-heavy Ray Charles Orchestra; his five female backup singers, the Raeletts; two stage managers; a bus driver; and David Simmons, his valet, whose duties include fetching Chinese takeout and leading him on stage.  Earlier this evening Simmons had steered Charles through the maze of tables.  The singer wore an embroidered silk jacket the color of maple syrup and bounced to the beat of his band, before taking his place at the electronic keyboard.  He felt for the mike, then eased into "Sadie's Tune."  So big, so brilliant were the horns-four trumpets, four trombones, a half-dozen saxes-that they swamped his voice, which seemed to be awaiting a wakeup call.  The crowd applauded.  Then it went wild at the opening of the second song, "Georgia."  It was a moody "Georgia," a gentle one, the voice drifting with the alto sax like that moonlight through the pines.  Lightly caressing the "tenderly," it still came up bruised.  Charles took the song slow, phrasing as if making up the words as he went along.  Whether he avoided vocal aerobatics for reasons of prudence or artistry didn't matter; he made you listen.  It was a moment I thought of later, when Charles talked about the way he wants to be remembered: "I just hope that people say, 'Well, you know what I liked about Ray, he was always a soulful person.  Any time you heard him sing, he always sounded like he meant it.'"  With a brassy blast, reverie was shattered as the band swung jauntily into "Mississippi Mud."  Charles, in surer voice, rocked left and right with the rollicking chords he played.  Every now and then a particularly high note propelled him off his bench like a jack-in-the-box.  Next, he began a sly blues, "I've Got News for You," adding on some staged byplay with the band, some rapping with the audience, and generally starting to lard the classy songs and stylish arrangements with showbiz shtik.  All that jazz didn't do much except set the stage for the Raeletts' shimmying entrance.  Vocally the women did themselves proud, particularly on the gospelly version of "I Can't Stop Loving You" and the set's moaning, call-and-response climax, Charles's own "What'd I Say."  Their main function, though, was as foils for Ray baby's billy-goat persona.  Fifty-five minutes after the lights dimmed, the show was over.  But the fans paying their checks didn't appear to be calculating it had cost them a dollar a minute.  No, they looked as though years from now they'd still be talking about one sultry night when in a shoebox-sized club they saw Ray Charles, so close he could have reached out and touched them.  A slowly eroding bond market pulled stock prices sharply lower while boosting the dollar.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average tumbled 40.97 points to 2647 in thin trading.  It was the largest decline since June 29, when the industrials dropped 46 points.  Long-term bonds were up early in yesterday's session, but steadily gave ground through the day to end with losses.  The dollar rallied against the yen, but was up only modestly against the mark.  Analysts said the bond market's deterioration was symptomatic of the continuing adjustment that investors are making to economic conditions.  Earlier in the summer, bond investors had expected a declining economy and slowing inflation to prompt the Federal Reserve to ease credit policy quickly.  But during the past two weeks, while inflation data has shown some improvement, the core rate of inflation -- excluding the volatile energy and food sectors -- has been uncomfortably high.  With continuing evidence that the economy is growing, albeit at a measured pace, the likelihood of any Fed easing is fading.  Those factors, coupled with waning demand for U.S. Treasury securities and an ample supply, are depressing bond prices.  Abby Joseph Cohen, a portfolio strategist at Drexel Burnham Lambert, said individual and foreign investors no longer have as large an appetite for Treasury bonds as they had earlier this year.  What's more, the potential supply of long-term high-quality debt securities appears enormous, given the prospective financing of the savings and loan industry bailout as well as a big supply of mortgage-backed securities in addition to regular Treasury offerings.  Ms. Cohen argues that falling bond prices and rising interest rates will take a toll on stock prices.  When the 30-year Treasury bond was yielding less than 8% a few weeks ago, the risk-reward ratio between bonds and stocks was solidly tilted toward stocks, she said.  But now that Treasury-bond yields have crept up toward 8.2%, the risk-reward ratio is about even at current stock price levels, she said.  "If you get a reasonable correction in bonds you can expect the same in stocks," she said.  She predicted that inflation will likely accelerate this year, adding further upward pressure on interest rates.  Through the end of the year she said she expects stocks to turn in a better performance than bonds, reflecting modestly rising corporate earnings.  But "the fun is over" even in stocks, she added.  "If they rise further, it won't be much."  Other analysts say though stock prices could continue easing in coming days, they don't foresee a steep downhill run.  "Obviously, there is some room to correct," said Donald Kimsey, senior market analyst at Dean Witter Reynolds, but he added that he doesn't expect a decline of more than 4% from recent post-crash highs.  That would take the industrial average to about the 2600 level from a post-crash high of 2712.63 on Aug. 10.  The average has, in intraday trading, twice surpassed the record close of 2722.42 on Aug. 25, 1987.  Currency traders, although fearful of central-bank intervention, are bullish on the dollar as U.S. interest rates rise.  Although traders said the dollar may be subject to some profit taking at current levels, the overall trend remains up.  In major market activity:  Stock prices tumbled in light trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 136.8 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were significantly ahead of gainers, 1,178 to 382.  Bond prices eased.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond fell more than a quarter of a point, or about $3 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.18%.  The dollar gained.  In late New York trading the U.S. currency was at 1.9577 marks and 143.10 yen compared with 1.9563 marks and 142.60 yen Friday.  A few months ago, millionaire Chinese entrepreneur Wan Runnan was living the good life in Beijing, basking in the attention and wealth he had earned managing China's most successful private computer company.  Then, on June 4, the tanks rolled into Beijing to crush the democracy movement.  Mr. Wan, whose Stone Group had helped bankroll the movement, fled to the West, escaping certain arrest.  Today, the 43-year-old businessman has taken on his toughest challenge: leading the oppositionin-exile to China's Communist Party.  As secretary-general of the newly formed Front for Democratic China, Mr. Wan heads a loose coalition of exiled students, intellectuals and businessmen that he contends will eventually help force a transition to a democratic government in China.  "Within six years," the brash computer whiz-kid promises, "the Li Peng regime will fall."  When that happens, the Front hopes to return to Beijing to compete in free elections against the Communists.  "If the people don't want to vote for us, that's fine, but they must be given a choice," he says.  It's a long shot, at best.  The Front, provisionally set up in Paris last month, still lacks an office.  Its headquarters in New York City consists only of a staffer's home telephone number.  Moreover, the Front is likely to have trouble attracting funding and publicity as world attention begins to shift away from China.  So Mr. Wan is eager to find help, from any source.  To finance dissident activities, the group is even accepting money from the Taiwan government, a source normally shunned by Chinese exiles because of Taipei's rivalry with Beijing.  For tactical advice, Mr. Wan is meeting with members of Solidarity, the Polish trade movement that now shares power with the Polish Communist Party.  Mr. Wan sees important parallels between the two countries.  "The Communists couldn't solve Poland's economic problems, so they needed to bring in Solidarity," he says.  "In China, too, the conservative leaders can't overcome our economic difficulties.  They will need our help."  Mr. Wan is constantly on the go, flitting back and forth between the U.S. and Europe, trying to drum up cash and support.  During a two-day stop in New York, he met with journalists at his hotel.  Mr. Wan seems uncomfortable in his new role, often preferring to talk of the business he left behind.  He still considers himself the Stone Group's president, although China said last week he had been removed from the post.  He left China with millions of dollars, apparently profits from Stone, of which he owns 50%.  Mr. Wan also is shopping for investment ideas.  He plans to put an initial $1 million in a French venture and is seeking a financial adviser "who doesn't charge too much."  Besides Mr. Wan, the Chinese opposition movement has two other leaders.  One is Yan Jiaqi, a former adviser to ousted Communist Party chief Zhao Ziyang.  Mr. Yan fled China just after the June 4 massacre.  The other is Wuerkaixi, the charismatic 21-year-old student leader who won notoriety for berating China's premier, Li Peng, in a televised meeting.  He, too, escaped just after the killings and plans to attend Harvard University in the fall.  Mr. Yan, a political strategist, comes across as a dry academic.  And Mr. Wuerkaixi is becoming something of a liability to the movement, frequently making unprovable claims about what happened in Beijing on June 4.  That leaves Mr. Wan as the most qualified organizer and communicator for the opposition group.  It will be economic, not political, problems that eventually bring down the current regime, Mr. Wan says.  Economic changes, brought about during a decade of reform, already have provoked instability by creating inflation and disparities in wealth.  Since June 4, Mr. Wan says, hardline leaders have reasserted control of the economy.  "Reforms are dead," he says, adding that the new leaders have no alternative plan to bolster the economy.  "Serious economic stagnation will inflame resistance among the people," Mr. Wan says.  "That will exacerbate the internal power struggle within the Politburo" and create opportunities for liberalization, perhaps opening the door for the exiled Front to participate in Beijing politics.  Even without a Solidarity-like rival, the Chinese Communists have seen their power diluted in recent years.  Entrepreneurs such as Mr. Wan, who aren't beholden to the party, have amassed the money and influence to sometimes challenge the party.  During the democracy movement in Beijing, for example, Stone funneled $25,000 to protesting students and donated electronic equipment for their broadcasting center on Tiananmen Square.  Now overseas, Mr. Wan is wrestling with how to remain relevant to the Chinese situation.  For now, the Front's goals seem overly broad.  The main tasks are to end dictatorship, promote human rights, reconstruct the Chinese republic and create a federal system.  Mr. Wan concedes there are disagreements on aspirations and tactics among overseas Chinese, who have long been plagued by intense factionalism.  But the Front is taking some concrete steps.  Hu Ming, a former student who Mr. Wan persuaded to take over the Front's New York office, is setting up the Voice of Chinese Students, a radio station that "will broadcast the truth about what is happening in China to the Chinese."  The station will be based in Australia but the Taiwan government will provide funding, paying for a cable link from Australia and for the costs of broadcasting to the mainland.  If playing the slot machines in Las Vegas makes you tense, here's one way to spend a more relaxing vacation: Why not shop for a car?  Within the next three years, a group of investors plans to open a resort dedicated solely to car sales.  On the outskirts of Henderson, Nev., just 13 miles south of Las Vegas, Car Country International will feature a casino hotel, a revolving automotive exhibit and, of course, car dealers.  "This just isn't a blacktop pavement auto mall" with lodgings, says Frank Ellis Jr., a Las Vegas car dealer backing the project.  "It's a destination point.  A theme park surrounded by automobiles -- something totally different in the showplace of the world]"  Besides, he says, there must be more for visitors to do than gamble all day and "see the place Wayne Newton lives."  But there are always skeptics.  "People normally don't come to Las Vegas to shop for new or used cars," observes Jim Marsh, a Las Vegas Jeep/Eagle, Volvo and Mazda dealer.  Even the backers of Car Country realize that tourists might balk at spending their vacations in showrooms and service bays.  "Car buying is a horrific experience for most," concedes a booklet on the proposed $100 million, 176-acre resort.  The developers want to give Car Country a softer, turn-of-the-century look to remind guests of a time "when people eyed the shiny black Ford Model T through the display window of the only dealer in town," the promotional material says.  Developers also plan to surround the 20-dealer showrooms lining the main promenade with movie theaters, a test-drive course, a 100-lane bowling alley and a commercial center complete with fast-food restaurants and barbershop.  Then there are the so-called safe zones: large, open car-display lots between the dealerships where guests can look at cars without feeling harassed by salespeople.  "There will be no oppression in shopping for a car here," insists Phil Neuer, an auto dealership broker trying to line up tenants for the project.  But visitors would do well not to let down their defenses too far.  A letter from Car Country's publicist predicts that the resort will deliver "prospect buyers at their consuming best -- relaxed and vulnerable."  Two very different stories of black economic progress are current in the media.  The first correctly notes that since 1960 black men and black women have gained relative to white men in terms of median income, earnings, hourly wage rates and occupational status.  These gains were largest in the 1960s and early 1970s but they were not eroded in the troubled late 1970s and 1980s.  The educational status of blacks has improved relative to that of whites and large numbers of blacks have entered high status occupations where they were previously rarely found.  Many advocates of this story point to affirmative action as a likely cause of black economic progress.  The second story correctly notes the deterioration in black family economic status over the same period, a growing gap in the difference in real incomes of black persons compared to white males over much of the past 30 years and the decline in labor force participation of black men compared to white men, even for men aged 25 to 54, the prime working age.  Black unemployment rates have remained at their historical two-to-one ratio compared with white rates and have risen above that ratio in urban areas.  Proponents of the second view have focused on the black underclass as a major social problem.  There is no contradiction between these two views of black economic progress.  Affirmative action and equal opportunity may have helped; but the federal statistics that support the first point of view collect wage data only for people who are interviewed and who are attached to the labor force.  The main source of information on annual changes in black earnings -- the U.S. Excluded from the official measures of economic progress are individuals who are out of the labor force altogether or who have only marginal attachment to the labor force.  There is considerable evidence that black attachment to the recorded labor force has declined relative to white attachment.  In 1960, the labor force participation rates of black men were very close to those of white men.  After 1960, black male labor force participation rates began to decline relative to white male rates.  This drop-out phenomenon was not confined to older persons.  Labor force participation rates decline for prime age males after 1960.  But the drop-out rate was much higher for black men.  By 1982, fully 12% of prime-age black males were not in the labor force and therefore were not counted in the statistics supporting the more optimistic account of black progress.  The comparable figure for whites is 5%.  The published wage and salary data exclude marginal workers.  As the proportion of blacks in the labor force declines and as more blacks enter the unstable marginal worker category, the official statistics on black status relative to white status become increasingly unreliable since a greater proportion of blacks than whites are entering marginal status.  Charles Brown of the University of Michigan has estimated that two-thirds of the measured gains in the relative median income of black males over the period 1965-1975 -- the period that witnessed the greatest black male progress -- was due to the omission of marginal black workers.  A more refined estimate by Wayne Vroman of the Urban Institute reduces Mr. Brown's estimate to a still sizeable 25%.  In addition to the exclusion of the earnings of marginal persons who are surveyed, there is the additional problem that some marginal persons are not surveyed at all.  The Bureau of the Census estimates that it undercounted 6% of the black population in 1980 but just 0.7% of the rest of the population.  The black undercount rate in major cities exceeded 9%.  For black males age 40 to 44, the undercount was in excess of 18%.  The undercount is concentrated in neighborhoods with low income and high crime rates.  Although the Census Bureau has improved its procedures over time and the undercount rate has fallen for all races, the percent reduction in the white rate of undercount since 1940 is twice that of the black rate. (Leading survey statisticians predict an increase in the undercount for blacks and other minorities in the 1990 census -- one reason why the bureau has agreed to do special recounts in inner cities.)  A substantial portion of the measured relative wage growth of blacks may be due to the omission of low-wage blacks from the official statistics.  Many omitted persons are probably lower wage workers, and therefore the growing rate of omission of blacks relative to whites may have led to an artificial acceleration in the measured rate of black progress.  An additional source of bias in the measured statistics is the growth of nonreported income by predominantly white higher income persons in the Current Population Surveys.  In 1947, only 2% of persons interviewed failed to report all of their income.  By 1985, 30% failed to report income.  The U.S. Census attempts to impute incomes to low income persons to compensate for this under-reporting, but its methods overstate earnings and incomes, leading to further distortions.  Nonreporting rates are highest in the high-income occupations.  The U.S. Census imputation procedures produce a downward bias in estimated income and earnings for well-paid jobs.  Because proportionally more whites than blacks are in occupations for which incomes are imputed, the observed growth in black relative economic status may also owe something to the trimming of the upper reaches of the white earnings distribution.  Of course, there are unreported factors pushing black incomes up.  Largely anecdotal evidence on the underground economy suggests that it is large and growing.  It is estimated that more than 25% of male ghetto dwellers derive their income from illegal activity.  Studies of ghetto youth reveal that illegal activities -- principally drug dealing -- constitute the greatest source of market income for young men.  Criminal activity is linked to opportunities in the mainstream economy.  We should not be surprised to find that many participants in the underground economy are making sizeable incomes -- certainly larger than they could have earned in the conventional economy.  Although the source of the growth would be disquieting, proper measurement of uncovered activity might reveal greater growth in relative earnings of minority workers than is reported in the official statistics.  It is naive to assume that all the persons in the inner city who are undercounted are poor.  As things now stand, we can only guess about the earnings and activities of uncovered persons.  Until we make more concerted efforts to discover the unmeasured, the old adage "out of sight-out of mind" applies.  We are likely to continue to neglect important social trends affecting persons of all races.  ---  Mr. Heckman is a professor of economics at Yale University.  Britain's real gross domestic product, measured by the output of goods and services, fell 0.4% in the second quarter from the first quarter and rose 1.6% from the 1988 second quarter, the Central Statistics Office said.  The output-based GDP is considered the most reliable guide to short-term movements in the economy.  Britain also calculates GDP based on expenditure and income data, and publishes an average estimate of the three GDP measures, which is considered the best guide to long-term movements in the economy.  "The Eurocentric perspective prevails and the White Anglo-Saxon Protestant (WASP) value system and norms dominate. . . ."   -- "African Americans, Asian Americans, Puerto Ricans/Latinos and Native Americans have all been victims of a cultural oppression and stereotyping that have characterized institutions -- including the educational institutions -- of the United States and the European American world for centuries. . . ."   -- {In relation to the Bill of Rights and the U.S. Constitution} There is something vulgar and revolting in glorifying a process that heaped undeserved rewards on a segment of the population while oppressing the majority."  Such is the crisis of New York's elementary and secondary schools, as seen in a report just released by the New York State Education Department.  The report, "A Curriculum of Inclusion," is the product of a task force appointed by State Education Commissioner Thomas Sobol.  It calls for a new "Special Assistant to the Commissioner for Cultural Equity" who, along with a newly created bureaucracy, would "undertake without delay a revision of all curricula and curricular materials so as to ensure that they are compatible with goals of equity and excellence for all cultures within our society."  We have nothing against diversity; indeed, we want more of it, as our support of more immigration testifies.  Learning about different cultures is imperative in this age of disappearing borders, world travel, global telecommunications and economy.  But both the above quotations and the humors of the educational elite suggest that a "curriculum of inclusion" is likely to be about much more.  A chat with a spokeswoman for the Education Department offers scant reassurance.  Asked whether it was more important for a person living in America to learn about Confucius or Burke and Locke, she says: "You don't have to have an either/or situation, though I would be less racist if I learned about Confucius."  When asked whether she would be more of a racist if she didn't learn about Confucius, she replies: "I think this was what the task force found."  She added: "I do believe what has been taught in this country over the years has been Eurocentric."  By now, of course, most of us are familiar enough with the assertion that Western Culture is majoritarian, racist and oppressive, and that it therefore should be de-emphasized in education.  The saving grace, until now, was that such pedantry was confined to the elite universities.  Students at Stanford (SATs above 600: math 86%, verbal 68%) are probably smart enough to recognize nonsense when served it, and are going to do OK in life anyway.  It's quite another thing, though, to inflict the same cultural politicking on the children of New York state.  Lay aside the whole question of whether public policy ought to encourage the Puritan Ethic even if Western Culture gave it a name.  The simple fact is that there are only so many school hours in the day and so many dollars to spend.  If schools spend their resources fretting over the worth of Western culture, it's likely that children will be more woefully unknowledgeable in the basics than they already are.  With students being graduated not knowing how to read and write or being able to name the first President of the U.S., it's a travesty that the New York State Education Department is spending its time on, and proposing to create new bureaucracies for, a program of a lesser priority than the three R's.  Improving education is much talked about these days, but little is likely to be accomplished until educators stop chasing the latest fad and get back to basics.  Groupe Assurance Generale, Belgium's second-largest insurer, is seeking to expand in Europe through acquisitions or joint ventures, and is in talks with medium-sized companies in several countries where it hopes to establish a dominant market presence, Managing Director Valere Croes said.  Mr. Croes declined to say what companies the insurer is eyeing.  But he said the company, known as AG, is seeking to expand in France, Britain and the Netherlands, where it already has a presence outside of its home market.  AG also would like to enter insurance markets in Italy and West Germany, he said.  Inventories held by British manufacturers, wholesalers and retailers rose #466 million ($729.5 million) in the second quarter, compared with a decline of #41 million in the first quarter, the Central Statistical Office said.  The rise also compares with a #603 million rise in the year-earlier quarter.  According to provisional figures, seasonally adjusted and calculated at 1985 prices, manufacturing industries increased their stocks #92 million, compared with a #337 million rise in the previous quarter and a #343 million rise a year earlier.  Wholesalers' inventories rose #93 million, following a drop of #176 million in the first quarter and a rise of #159 million a year earlier.  Retailers' stocks rose #281 million, compared with a decline of #202 million in the first quarter and a rise of #101 million a year earlier.  Wetterau Inc. said it agreed to buy 1.5 million shares, or about 6.3% of its common, held by director Raymond A. Bartolacci.  The food distributor would neither disclose terms of the repurchase, nor say why Mr. Bartolacci sold the stock.  Wetterau said Mr. Bartolacci and his family will continue to hold about 800,000 shares.  Mr. Bartolacci, who will continue to hold his board seat and his position as chief executive officer of Wetterau's Laneco unit, couldn't be reached for comment.  Union Texas Petroleum Holdings Inc. said startup of production from a new platform at the Eugene Island Block 371 in the Gulf of Mexico will boost domestic offshore natural-gas production capacity about 33% to 210 million cubic feet daily.  Union Texas, an independent oil and gas producer, is operator and has 100% interest in Eugene Island 371.  The block is 150 miles southwest of New Orleans in the central sector of the Gulf.  Now that 61-year-old Einar Greve has resigned under pressure from his $964,000-a-year job as head of Tucson Electric Power Co., the utility's directors are marveling at how little they knew of him.  They did know he was a dedicated engineer with an encyclopedic knowledge of electrical generation and transmission.  But many of them didn't know where he lived.  They knew little or nothing of his life outside the office.  They weren't even sure he was married; he is, for the third time, to a 25-year-old former topless dancer.  Mr. Greve (pronounced Greeve) wasn't eager to enlighten them.  "To say that he was an introvert is an understatement," says Thomas C. Weir, a director who knew him for eight years and who has succeeded him as the company's chief executive.  None of this might have made much difference except for the Pandora's box that has opened at the medium-sized utility since Mr. Greve's departure as chairman and chief executive officer.  In June and early July, Mr. Greve sold more than $1 million of Tucson Electric stock, most of his holdings.  "It shocked me," says Mr. Weir.  "If I had false teeth I would have lost them."  Directors began an inquiry.  Mr. Greve quit July 17.  Now the directors must deal with problems that, they say, they didn't know existed.  The company has had to issue a string of gloomy announcements: The Securities and Exchange Commission is investigating possible insider trading at Tucson Electric; losses loom in coming quarters; the dividend may be omitted, or cut sharply, at a directors' meeting today.  Not so long ago, securities analysts were praising Tucson Electric's management.  "Things have come unwound very quickly," says Alfred G. Mazzorana, a bond analyst at UBS Securities Inc. in New York.  Tucson Electric, he says, had been "one of the highfliers, one of the premier utilities."  Through his lawyer, Theodore Sonde, Mr. Greve declined to be interviewed for this article.  Mr. Sonde says his client believes "that the board was fully informed and that Mr. Greve can't recall any instance in which he withheld information from the board or in which he declined to provide information to it."  The Tucson Electric of today is for the most part the work of two men -- Mr. Greve and Theodore Welp, who ran the company from 1976 to 1985.  They steered the once-sleepy local utility into regional wholesaling of electricity and a variety of non-utility investments.  Though the two worked closely for years, their skills, interests and characters were utterly different.  The two clashed; but if it hadn't been for Mr. Welp, Mr. Greve might never have reached the top.  Mr. Welp came to Tucson Electric from Pacific Gas & Electric, where he was treasurer.  Now 55, he is a tall and powerful man with an explosive temper.  At Tucson Electric, he publicly reprimanded his own executives between sessions of a regulatory hearing.  He was a financial specialist with a knack for political hardball.  He once tried to influence an Arizona Corporations Commission member with a labor-union background by threatening to build -- and eventually building -- a major plant with non-union labor.  The threat was tape-recorded.  The introverted Mr. Greve came to Tucson Electric from Charles T. Main Inc., engineering consultants.  He had emigrated from Norway in his early 20s.  Small and sinewy, he was also remote and stubborn, only occasionally exhibiting a wry humor.  He had been a lieutenant colonel in the Army Reserve; Tucson Electric's proxy statement this year announced that the annual meeting would begin at "1430 hours."  Despite the two men's differences, they were "a team," Mr. Welp testified not long ago in one of the many lawsuits that have sprung up around Tucson Electric's dealings.  Mr. Welp, as president and chief executive officer, put the utility on its feet financially in the late 1970s and early 1980s with his innovative financing of major construction.  Mr. Greve, then executive vice president and the company's top power planner, oversaw operations.  For nearly a decade Mr. Greve had worked in Mr. Welp's shadow.  Then, in 1984, Mr. Welp proposed an audacious change that involved his own resignation: Tucson Electric would spin off interests in its two newest generating plants to a subsidiary, Alamito Co.  Its stock would be distributed to Tucson Electric shareholders.  Mr. Welp would take charge of Alamito.  It was a break for Mr. Greve, although it didn't look like one for a while.  Mr. Greve later said that Mr. Welp thought he was the wrong man for the top job at Tucson Electric, that Mr. Welp told him he wanted someone with a background in business rather than operations and engineering.  "I told him where he could stick it," Mr. Greve recalled later.  Still, the two together crafted an intricate power-supply contract with Tucson Electric that gave Alamito valuable parts of the parent's wholesale business.  At some point, Mr. Welp changed his mind about Mr. Greve and recommended him as his successor at Tucson Electric.  The board went along without debate.  Mr. Welp then went to Alamito, which eventually was sold to Osceola Energy Inc., a closely held investment group, for $379.5 million.  Mr. Welp stayed on at Alamito until recently.  Now retired, he won't discuss why he changed his mind about Mr. Greve.  At Tucson Electric, what little the employees know of Mr. Greve's life they learned by observation.  He had adopted Tucson's Western style, dressing informally in open shirt and cowboy boots.  For a while he even chewed tobacco.  Except for a slight lilt in his speech, his Norwegian accent had vanished.  Employees knew he occasionally hunted, from the racks of elk antlers that appeared at his office; he carted them off in his Jeep.  But he rarely if ever discussed his activities.  "He was just a very private person," says Roger Yohem, a public-relations official at the company.  Mr. Greve joined no clubs.  He avoided involvement in charities, unlike other utility-company executives, who usually take part in community affairs.  He seemed allergic to reporters.  He didn't grant a formal interview in five years as chief executive.  Nor did Mr. Greve spare much time for customers.  When a senior executive of the company's largest industrial customer asked for a meeting, a secretary insisted that "Mr.  Greve doesn't see customers."  Only after some negotiation was a meeting arranged.  He often seemed just as distant to insiders.  Joseph B. Wilcox, vice president of customer and corporate services, worked with Mr. Greve for a decade but says he never had lunch with him privately.  Mr. Weir for years had the vague impression that Mr. Greve was married to a teacher.  It wasn't so.  Though Mr. Greve never talked about them, he had undergone some big changes at home.  His first marriage, which lasted 22 years, had ended in divorce in 1980, five years before he became chief executive.  Mr. Greve set up house with the younger of his two sons.  Then, during the lunch hour one day, Mr. Greve married a woman who worked in Tucson Electric's customer-relations department.  Afterward, he returned to the office for an afternoon's work.  That marriage lasted barely two months, and ended in divorce in 1983.  In 1985, Mr. Greve succeeded Mr. Welp.  Tucson Electric seemed to be prospering.  Profits and dividends had risen steadily from the mid-1970s and continued to rise through last year.  But the financial statements had yet to reflect the utility's fundamental troubles.  It had more generating capacity than it needed.  The surplus threatened to grow to one-third the utility's total capacity by 1990, when a big coal-fired plant would come on line.  Meanwhile the once-burgeoning business in wholesale power was crumbling.  To generate cash Tucson Electric, starting with Mr. Welp, had over the years resorted to such means as the sale and leaseback of generating plants, the sale of an option on a plant, and the marketing of a mining royalty contract.  For all the short-term benefit, such expedients shrank future profitability -- and corporate flexibility.  And Mr. Greve was investing much of the fresh cash in risky areas having nothing to do with utility operations.  Mr. Welp, the financial whiz, had steered Tucson Electric cash into preferred stock and small power projects.  Mr. Greve, the engineer, plunged into common stocks, auto financing, venture capital, real estate and investments in thrift institutions.  Mr. Greve mostly kept mum about these moves, leaving disclosure to the footnotes in corporate filings with the SEC.  But by last Dec. 31 the investments had swollen to nearly 40% of the company's total assets.  For several years the non-utility investments added luster to the bottom line.  In the past year or so, the company's diverse gambles began going sour.  An auto-loan operation needed a big cash infusion and management change.  Three thrift institutions in which Tucson Electric had invested fell on hard times.  A major real-estate development project outside Phoenix died.  Mr. Greve proposed a way out: Tucson Electric agreed last year to merge with San Diego Gas & Electric Co. in a stock swap valued at $1.45 billion.  But the merger was called off.  San Diego Gas later agreed to be acquired by SCE Corp., Rosemead, Calif.  Also last year, another Greve romance set tongues wagging in the utility industry.  He appeared early last year at a major industry convention with a statuesque woman so striking that one executive says he rushed for a phone booth to call his company's chairman with the news.  When the couple arrived late at a formal dinner, a brief but embarrassing silence ensued.  In the largely white and conservative ranks of utility executives, the fact that Sheri Lynise Jackson is black caused at least as great a stir as the fact that she is 25 years old.  The gossip at Tucson Electric had it that Mr. Greve had visited a strip of topless Tucson bars where Ms. Jackson danced.  Dancers at two of them remember Sheri Jackson as a pleasant entertainer whose new boyfriend gave her a Mercedes-Benz roadster -- although, according to state records, Mr. Greve owns the car, which he bought three days before Ms. Jackson's birthday last September.  The couple married last Dec. 31 in Las Vegas.  Afterward, an employee asked about the marrige at a staff meeting.  Mr. Greve confirmed the marriage and then moved swiftly to the next topic.  Through his lawyer, Mr. Greve declines to respond to questions about his private life, including those about Ms. Jackson.  Tucson Electric's outside directors remained in the dark about Mr. Greve's private life, although talk around the company and in the utility industry was widespread.  "I guess I'm not much of a gossip," says Kathryn N. Dusenberry, vice president of City Van & Storage Co. in Tucson and a director of the utility since 1985.  Directors say there were important problems at Tucson Electric that they didn't understand.  The company had avoided a major rate review by the Arizona Corporation Commission, its state regulator, for eight years.  Now the commission was examining the utility's books in a review that is still in progress.  In June, in a decision that would affect only part of the utility's rate structure, the commission provisionally granted it only $3.1 million of the $70 million it was seeking in special rate adjustments.  The commission's main rate decision is expected in September.  Not until Mr. Weir began to poke into the company's problems, directors say, did they learn of their extent.  A director since 1981, Mr. Weir was brought into the company last November to manage its troubled non-utility investments.  Mr. Weir won't talk much about the troubles he discovered.  But a person close to the situation says Mr. Weir went to Mr. Greve in June and, in several meetings, urged him to provide directors with more information.  Mr. Greve finally agreed.  On June 27, at a regularly scheduled meeting, Tucson Electric's outside directors learned "very troubling" information, says outside director Peter D. Herder.  "It was the beginning of some enlightenment," adds Mr. Weir.  Directors won't say what they heard that day but suggest that the utility's overinvestment in generating resources, combined with regulators' apparently negative views, painted a bleak picture of future cash flow.  Cutting or eliminating the dividend suddenly became a likely prospect.  The Greve management, it turned out, had ordered a report from Goldman Sachs, the company's investment bankers, but hadn't provided it to outside directors.  They soon demanded it.  The board sought more information and scheduled a June 30 special meeting to review it.  Between those meetings, on June 28, Mr. Greve sold 24,000 shares of Tucson Electric stock at an average price of about $32.25 a share.  On July 6, he sold an additional 8,000 shares for $32 each, keeping a relatively small holding of 4,400 shares.  Yesterday, the shares closed at $23.50, near their 52-week low.  His lawyer, Mr. Sonde, says Mr. Greve's sales had nothing to do with his access to non-public information.  The lawyer also says that Mr. Greve had customarily sold shares acquired by option in recent years, and the June and July sales were consistent with his pattern.  However, SEC filings show that Mr. Greve's 1989 sales of stock were much larger than his sales in previous years.  The records put his sales at 9,500 shares in 1988 and 15,000 shares in 1987, and these sales had still left him with a holding much larger than the 4,400 shares he kept after his sales this year.  By July 10, mandatory insider trading reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission told investors what Mr. Weir had already been shocked to discover for himself.  Outside directors formed a special committee, and after a brief investigation concluded on July 17 that Mr. Greve should be replaced.  He resigned later that day.  A dozen shareholder suits have been filed around the country charging Mr. Greve and Tucson Electric with inside-trading violations and insufficient disclosure of negative information about the company.  But directors say they had little reason to probe earlier into the company's plight.  Profits were high.  "Things were going so well that we got very comfortable," says Mr. Weir.  Adds John P. Schaefer, an outside board member who now is chairman, no one wanted to infringe on Mr. Greve's authority and discretion.  "There is a fine line," he says, "between oversight and interfering in management."  Under Messrs.  Schaefer and Weir, Tucson Electric probably will shepherd its cash flow closely -- starting with today's anticipated dividend cut.  It plans to improve community relations neglected under Mr. Greve and to warm its icy relations with regulators.  Much of the immediate future depends on the coming rate ruling.  As to the past, there is a lesson, says Mr. Herder: "Try to know thy chairman as well as possible."  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills decreased 2.1% last week to 1,773,000 tons from 1,811,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 3.4% from the 1,836,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 79.8% of its capability last week, compared with 81.5% the previous week and 86.1% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Aug. 19 ............. 1,773,000 79.8%  @ Week to Aug. 12 ............. 1,811,000 81.5%  @ Year to date ................ 64,360,000 87.7%  @ Year earlier to date ........ 63,604,000 89.6%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  Shareholders of Pinnacle West Capital could be in for a nasty surprise.  The Phoenix, Ariz., utility holding company has been fighting to minimize the damage at its troubled MeraBank thrift unit.  But according to some bearish investors and analysts, MeraBank, a big lender during the go-go years of Arizona real estate, could turn out to be a thornier problem than is generally suspected.  Pinnacle has been hinting that it might dispose of the thrift.  A spinoff has been rumored.  But James Chanos, a short-seller who is betting that Pinnacle's share price will decline, says he doesn't think regulators would permit such a move.  "It's a matter of whether the government rolls over and plays the patsy," Mr. Chanos, head of New York-based Kynikos Associates, says.  "Why should taxpayers be on the hook," rather than Pinnacle's shareholders?  Pinnacle acquired MeraBank for $426 million in 1986.  It signed a "keep well" agreement with federal regulators, promising to maintain the thrift's capital adequacy.  But with the ensuing collapse of the Arizona real estate market, MeraBank has joined the ranks of sick savings and loans.  The thrift, which had losses of $302.5 million in the 12 months ended June 30, is under Federal Home Loan Bank Board orders to boost its capital by roughly $200 million.  Pinnacle now concedes that it could cost as much as $600 million to restore MeraBank -- assuming the thrift's reserves are adequate.  This is the equivalent of roughly $7 a share.  Deducting this figure from the value of Pinnacle's utility -- said by analysts to be worth $20 a share -- leaves a value of $13, close to Pinnacle's share price of 13 1/2 yesterday.  But Mr. Chanos contends that $600 million won't be enough to restore the thrift.  MeraBank, he claims, is "a $1 billion to $2 billion hole."  Henry B. Sargent Jr., executive vice president and chief financial officer of Pinnacle, says: "Numbers like that are just rank guesswork.  I cannot imagine it being in that order of magnitude at this time."  He adds, "If you want to speculate that the Arizona real estate market is going to be in a free fall forever, you can come up with any number you want to."  But Barry Abramson, a Prudential-Bache Securities analyst, says Arizona's decline doesn't appear to have stopped.  "Everyone we talk to about real estate and banking in Arizona says things are very bad," he says.  "The cost of continuing to own the thrift is a big unknown.  How do we know it won't cost $1 billion?"  Douglas Preiser of Kidder Peabody says continued payment of Pinnacle's $1.60-a-year dividend rate "is seriously in doubt."  He says, "MeraBank inadequately reserved for loan losses for a long time, and according to some," the reserves are still inadequate.  Mr. Sargent says that MeraBank's board isn't uncomfortable with the current level of reserves and that it believes the potential for further reserves "is not enormous."  As of Dec. 31, MeraBank had $3.9 billion in real estate loans out of a total of $4.23 billion.  The thrift recently laid off 160 employees and put a halt to new loans.  But it is burdened with a big network of branches.  Selling, general and administrative costs in the second quarter were up 12% from a year earlier.  To maintain liquidity, MeraBank has paid high rates on certificates of deposit, Mr. Sargent says; however, the thrift has dropped those rates substantially in recent weeks.  The effect of this remains unclear.  MeraBank's deposits slipped to $4.93 billion on June 30 from $5.02 billion on Dec. 31.  Pinnacle's ace card is its continuing negotiations with the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.  Pinnacle wants the Bank Board to agree that if it injects a certain amount of capital into MeraBank, Pinnacle would be freed from maintaining the thrift's reserves at required levels.  Regulators haven't commented on the talks.  When Pinnacle acquired MeraBank, Arizona was booming.  Now that the boom is bust, Pinnacle is threatening to unload the thrift unilaterally.  In its recent quarterly report, Pinnacle said it believes it has a legal right to "terminate any obligations it may have under {its keep-well agreement} by divesting itself of MeraBank."  While noting that it "has encountered regulatory opposition," Pinnacle added that it might seek resolution "in a suitable legal forum."  Arizona regulators are watching like hawks to make sure the state's citizens don't end up footing the bill in the form of higher utility rates.  This stance appears to leave two candidates: Pinnacle's shareholders or the U.S. Treasury.  "If you could decide that its problems with MeraBank are over, then the company is cheap," Prudential-Bache's Mr. Abramson says.  But if the thrift can't be unloaded, he says Pinnacle -- and its shareholders -- "could be throwing money away."  ---  @ Pinnacle West Capital  @ (NYSE; Symbol: PNW)  @ Business: Holding company  @ Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  @ Revenue: $2.09 billion  @ Net income: $4.2 million; or 5 cents a share  @ Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  @ Net loss: $11.3 million vs. net income  @ $43.6 million; or 50 cents a share  @ Average daily trading volume:  @ 393,191 shares  @ Common shares outstanding: 86.7 million  India lodged a complaint with the U.S. Agriculture Department stating that corn it received under a U.S. aid program was tainted with aflatoxin, the potent carcinogen that caused problems in the Midwest Corn Belt last year and South Texas this summer.  India's complaint could exacerbate an already touchy trade issue.  U.S. government and industry officials have been concerned for months that fears of aflatoxin in U.S. grain could damage exports.  To reassure foreign buyers, some farm state congressmen are studying legislation that would require testing of all exported corn.  India's grievance is "the kind of incident we want to avoid," said Rep. Jim Jontz, an Indiana Democrat who is sponsoring legislation to strengthen monitoring of corn for aflatoxin.  Moreover, there are other signs that aflatoxin may be more of a problem for grain exports than previously thought.  Until now, federal officials had confirmed only that grain inspectors had blocked the export of at least four million bushels of corn because of excessive levels of aflatoxin.  This occurred during the first four months of this year.  But shipping records obtained by this newspaper confirm that the amount of corn detected so far is well in excess of 24 million bushels -- the equivalent of about 24 shiploads.  It's impossible to know the exact amount because records received by this newspaper were incomplete.  The 24 million bushels were the minimum that could be accounted for in the period from October 1988 through April 1989.  Because officials aren't testing all the corn exported and because tests sometimes fail to detect aflatoxin at levels that are unfit for human consumption, questions are raised about how much contaminated corn could be slipping through the government's safety net.  It's also possible for the contaminant to appear after grain has been tested.  Aflatoxin, an exceptionally potent carcinogen, is manufactured by a fungus during hot and dry weather.  The 1988 drought in the Midwest, as well as a drought this year in South Texas, sparked outbreaks of the poison.  Federal grain inspectors don't routinely inspect exports for aflatoxin but have tested much of the corn leaving U.S. ports since last autumn upon the request of many countries.  Several nations already have expressed concern that aflatoxin was slipping into export channels despite stepped-up efforts by the U.S. to control its spread.  In April, Guatemala said that a shipment of U.S. corn slated for a school lunch program contained aflatoxin.  India's complaint may be another example of poisoned corn leaking through -- or a case of the fungus producing aflatoxin after the grain had left U.S. ports.  Because the corn was part of a U.S. aid program, it was tested before shipment overseas.  Samples saved from the shipment continue to show no aflatoxin, but tests conducted for India reportedly detected levels unsafe for human consumption.  The Indian complaint involves 100,000 metric tons of corn loaded onto ships in Seattle and the New Orleans area in June, said John Pitchford, chief of international monitoring for the Federal Grain Inspection Service.  "The government thinks it was clean corn when it left here," he said.  An Agriculture Department representative is being sent to India to investigate.  Meanwhile, U.S. inspectors were continuing to find aflatoxin in corn slated for export through this month.  According to documents obtained under the Freedom of Information Act, government inspectors detected the poison in U.S. corn as it was being prepared for export onto about 200 ships from October through April.  The destinations included Japan, Saudi Arabia and Spain.  While the amount of rejected corn is a tiny fraction of U.S. corn exports, records illustrate the limited information the federal government has on the scope of the problem.  The results of aflatoxin tests were recorded inconsistently by inspectors because the standard reporting form doesn't reserve a space for such information.  The inspection reports reviewed by this newspaper are USDA Federal Grain Inspection Service logs.  These logs are used by federal inspectors to record the condition of grain being loaded onto ships in U.S. ports.  Some countries are particularly vulnerable to the problem of contaminated grain because they depend on U.S. corn as a food staple.  Authorities in Mexico, for example, are beefing up surveillance in the wake of the recently reported outbreak of aflatoxin in South Texas, where state officials are moving to stop millions of pounds of suspect corn from being sold to food companies.  Although the USDA strengthened its testing of corn leaving U.S. ports, it largely ignored corn moving by train and truck into Mexico.  David Orr, deputy director of the Federal Grain Inspection Service, said the U.S. didn't begin screening this pipeline until Friday because the Mexican government hadn't requested it before.  Corn moving by land across the border is exempt from the regulations requiring that corn exported by ship be graded for moisture and foreign matter, among other things.  Some regulators are concerned about widespread rumors in the grain trade that contaminated corn from South Texas already has been shipped into Mexico.  Earlier this month, the Food and Drug Administration advised the Mexican government to begin requiring aflatoxin tests on all the U.S. corn it buys for human consumption.  Mexico, a buyer of Texas corn, has reason to be concerned.  Texas officials are putting under detention millions of pounds of corn stored at several grain elevators to prevent its sale to food companies.  One grain elevator in South Texas was stopped from selling corn because samples collected by state regulators contained many times the level of aflatoxin considered safe for human consumption.  State regulators are worried that at least one grain elevator where contaminated corn was found apparently wasn't conducting aflatoxin tests even though it was supplying food manufacturers.  While imitation may be the sincerest form of flattery, Anthony Maglica would appreciate fewer kudos.  Mr. Maglica, president and owner of Mag Instrument Inc., designed a line of high-priced, high-quality flashlights, known as the Mag-Lite and Mini Maglite.  With a sleek, high-tech shape and a lifetime guarantee, Mr. Maglica's products lighted up the market.  In a decade, Mag Instrument's flashlight sales have gone from zero to more than $50 million annually.  But like many an inventor, the 59-year-old Mr. Maglica has found that coming up with a good idea is easier than protecting it.  Despite having patents and trademarks on his flashlights, Mr. Maglica soon saw cheap, look-alike copies, produced in Asia, flooding the U.S. market and stealing what he estimates to be tens of millions of dollars of sales over several years.  As a result, Mr. Maglica spends as much time in litigation trying to protect his creations as he does trying to build and sell them.  Mag Instrument has filed a dozen lawsuits against U.S. distributors of alleged copycat flashlights and big U.S. retailers, including Sears, Roebuck & Co. and K mart Corp., which sell some of the disputed products.  Mag Instrument is also trying to get the federal government to help block the import tide.  In the past three years, the company's legal bills have totaled $17 million, nearly three times what it spent promoting the flashlights.  The cost and time involved in litigation have already delayed plans to build a $20 million flashlight factory here, says Mr. Maglica.  "How can you plan for tomorrow, if pirates can just come in and copy what you have made?" he asks.  That question comes up more and more as U.S. government and business leaders grapple with ways to make the nation more competitive in the world market.  A study covering 1986 and released early last year by the federal International Trade Commission estimated that U.S. companies lost $43 billion to $61 billion in sales world-wide because of patent infringements and other types of "intellectual property" theft.  "U.S. industry is really hurting because of this," says Johannes von Schilcher, executive director of the International Anti-Counterfeiting Coalition, a group of 172 companies.  With worries over the trade gap, Congress has been moving to guard the intellectual property of Americans.  Last month, for instance, House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.) and others introduced a bill to broaden protections on designs of U.S. products from copying by foreign manufacturers.  The product-piracy problem is particularly acute for small companies, which often lack the resources necessary to thoroughly monitor the market and fight expensive legal battles.  "A lot of companies just aren't in a position to pursue their rights," says William Morro, chief operating officer of the Patent Protection Institute, a fledgling San Rafael, Calif., firm which, for a fee, wants to help inventors protect their creations.  He says his firm has received dozens of inquiries from businessmen with patent, trademark and copyright problems.  Thanks to the success of his flashlights, Mr. Maglica has the money to fund his legal battles.  But for decades he was like many another struggling entrepreneur.  Born in New York, he grew up on a small island off the coast of Yugoslavia, immigrated back to the U.S. in 1950 and went to work in a machine shop.  A few years later, he plunked down his $125 in savings to buy a used lathe and opened his own business, turning his garage into a machine shop.  By the late 1970s, Mr. Maglica had built a solid, but still small, business.  One of his jobs was making parts for flashlights.  At the time, the flashlight market tended to be dominated by inexpensive products that usually died as fast as their batteries, says Gerald Ford, a market-research consultant and witness for Mag Instrument in its litigation.  But Mr. Maglica thought consumers might pay as much as $20 for a high-quality, long-lasting flashlight.  Retailers initially laughed at the idea.  Consumers didn't.  Today, Mag Instrument's facilities stretch over several acres of this town, about 50 miles east of Los Angeles, and employ 400 people.  A conference-room display case is filled with Mag flashlights, from pocket-sized minis to ones long enough to double as a policeman's billy.  On a nearby table sit a couple of dozen flashlights that look almost identical to the Mini Maglite, Mag Instrument's biggest seller.  The competitors carry such names as So-Lite, Pro-Brite and Mini-Mitelite.  Mag Instrument officials believe many come from factories in Hong Kong, South Korea and Taiwan, where knockoff designs seem to spread faster than office gossip.  Robert Weiss, a Mag Instrument attorney, estimates that 50 foreign manufacturers are turning out copies of the Mini Maglite.  Mr. Maglica, an intense, plain-spoken man who favors blue jeans and sneakers over business suits and wing tips, says he thought briefly about moving his operations overseas to reduce costs in response to the competition.  Instead, he moved to courtrooms from Los Angeles to Washington, D.C.  So far, he has had some successes, including multimillion-dollar judgments against two competitors.  But the victories were tainted: Mag Instrument has yet to see any of the money, as both competitors subsequently went into bankruptcy proceedings, says Mr. Weiss, the Mag Instrument attorney.  In settling another lawsuit, Mr. Maglica took possession of a competitor's inventory of about 250,000 flashlights and put them all through a metal crusher.  It made for satisfying footage on the local television news, he says.  Mag Instruments isn't the only one hurling accusations of improper conduct, though.  A competitor's antitrust suit is pending against it in U.S. District Court in Los Angeles, while Mag Instrument also has patent and trademark claims pending against the competitor in U.S. District Court in Dallas.  Another competitor once filed a defamation suit in the Los Angeles federal court against Mag Instrument, charging that Claire Maglica, Mr. Maglica's wife and the company's executive vice president, had called the competitor's president a "thief," throwing in a choice adjective or two, at an industry trade show.  The judge in that case ruled in Mag Instrument's favor, noting in his written opinion that while Mrs. Maglica's conduct was "rather rude and aggressive," her statements "were, essentially, correct."  Because of the difficulty in finding and trying to stop numerous small copycat companies, Mag Instrument has also turned to suing big retailers who sell the look-alikes, says Mr. Weiss.  At the moment, suits are pending against six retailers, he says.  The retailers that have responded so far have denied liability.  Mag Instrument's most important legal action has been before the International Trade Commission.  The company asked the commission to block imports of allegedly copycat products.  The commission turned that petition down, partly on the ground that an important Mag Instrument patent was unenforceable.  In February, a federal appeals court overturned that decision and remanded the matter to the ITC.  The commission says it's working on the matter.  Not good enough, says Mag Instrument, which has gone back to federal court seeking another order directing the commision to act.  In the meantime, the imports keep flowing in, says Mr. Maglica.  Profit-taking, interest rate worries and a barrage of computer-related sell programs drove stocks into the largest decline in about two months.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average took a 40.97-point fall to close at 2647.  It was the sharpest drop since June 29, when the industrials slid 46.47.  Volume, however, was an anemic 136,800,000 shares.  Despite a slightly firmer bond market yesterday morning, stocks opened lower.  Stock buyers seem to be expecting Federal Reserve officials to postpone further declines in interest rates; the Fed's policy-making committee is meeting this week.  Aside from this general outlook on interest rates, traders said profit-taking occurred in a number of takeover-related stocks.  Stock-index arbitrage sell programs, in which traders sell "expensive" underlying stocks and buy the "cheaper" futures, also contributed to the decline.  Donald Selkin, head of futures research at Prudential-Bache Securities, said that the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index is poised for another round of program selling today on the opening, barring a rise in bonds that might lift stock prices.  Among broader market averages, the S&P 500 index tumbled 5.36 to 340.67, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index declined 4.55 to 320.31 and the New York Stock Exchange composite index retreated 2.67 to 189.97.  Only one of the industry groups in the Dow Equity Market Index -- recreational products and services -- closed above Friday's level, and that gain resulted from a rally in Walt Disney, which climbed 3 1/2 to 115.  Airline stocks also fared relatively well with the help of UAL, the target of a hostile $275-a-share takeover bid from investor Marvin Davis.  The owner of United Airlines rose 2 3/4 to 273 3/4 amid indications that it may respond favorably to any overtures from British Airways, believed to be working with Morgan Stanley's leveraged buyout fund on a rival offer.  AMR, which owns American Airlines, finished unchanged at 76 1/8; Delta Air Lines gained 1/2 to 77 1/2, Alaska Air Group closed unchanged at 28 3/8 and Southwest Airlines eased 1/8 to 27 1/2.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average slipped 4.27 to 1438.12.  But HAL, the owner of Hawaiian Airlines, plunged 6 3/8 to 25 1/4 on the American Stock Exchange.  The company's board agreed to allow an investor group to make a $22-a-share tender offer for at least 51% of its stock.  Two stocks dropped sharply after the expiration of tender offers: Prime Computer, which retreated 5 1/8 to 12 7/8, and General Nutrition, which skidded 4 1/4 to 6 1/2.  J.H. Whitney & Co. agreed to purchase about 75% of Prime's common stock for $20 a share.  Thomas H. Lee Co., a Boston investment firm, concluded an $11.50-a-share offer for 91.3% of General Nutrition's shares.  Georgia Gulf tumbled 3 to 51 1/2.  The company, faced with the threat of a potential takeover attempt by investor Harold Simmons, acted to bolster its defenses by amending a shareholder rights plan.  Interpublic Group dropped 1 to 34 1/2.  The company is among several major advertising firms that say spending on ads for the second half is below their expectations and don't expect any relief until next year at the earliest.  Ferro finished unchanged at 58 1/2 and traded as high as 59 3/4.  Oppenheimer & Co. reportedly has formed a partnership that holds a 4% stake in the company and plans to launch a takeover attempt.  Whittaker, which agreed in principle to sell its chemical coatings unit to Sherwin-Williams, advanced 1/4 to 11 7/8.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Sherwin-Williams dropped 7/8 to 33 1/4.  Par Pharmaceutical gained 5/8 to 5 1/2.  The company, which halted delivery of all its generic drugs in tablet and capsule form after coming under investigation by the Food and Drug Administration, said it was reintroducing some of the products after reviewing related data.  Deltona climbed 1 3/8 to 5 3/4 in response to Sycamore Acquisitions' offer to acquire the company for about $7.01 a share on a fully diluted basis, or about $40 million.  The American Stock Exchange Index dropped 2.60 to 376.58.  Volume totaled 11,930,000 shares.  B.A.T Industries, the most active Amex issue, went up 3/16 to 13 5/16 on 2.7 million shares.  British financier Sir James Goldsmith invited Chairman Patrick Sheehy to discuss his investor group's $20.98 billion takeover offer.  Separately, B.A.T reported that pretax profit for the first half rose 20% from a year ago.  Wang Laboratories Class B finished unchanged at 5 3/4.  The company reached an agreement with its bank lenders to restructure $575 million of debt and obtain $100 million in additional borrowings.  Cruise America advanced 7/8 to 6 3/8.  Interstate Properties said it holds a 5.8% stake in the company.  Compumat fell 7/8 to 4 1/4.  The company ended talks with Levine, Tessler, Leichtman, which had offered to acquire it for $6.25 a share.  Copper futures prices continued to be buoyed by production difficulties.  The September contract ended 1.55 cents a pound higher at $1.2545 after trading as high as $1.27.  The latest development concerned the Cananea mine in Mexico.  Last week it was in the news because unions threatened to strike on Aug. 27.  Yesterday, Reuters reported that the mining company had been declared bankrupt over the weekend at the company's request because it couldn't cover domestic and foreign debts.  The report said the company had been involved in negotiations with the unions, which were requesting wage and benefit increases of 330%.  Later, the news agency reported that the unions said they didn't accept the bankruptcy and would request an investigation of the company's operations.  Production is good, and prices are high, the union said, attributing problems to waste by the previous management, according to the report.  Troops have been occupying the mine since Sunday morning, but there have been no incidents, the report said.  An executive in the U.S. copper industry speculated that the company may be attempting a pre-emptive move against the unions.  The company may try, after a suspension of operations, to resume work without a union contract, he said.  However, he added, a closing for any reason would mean a loss of production.  The national miners' strike in Peru weakened, though it remained strong at two of the country's major copper mines, according to Fred Demler, metals economist for Drexel Burnham Lambert, New York.  Peru is the world's sixth-largest copper producer.  Ted Arnold, Merrill Lynch metals specialist, writing in the firm's latest weekly futures report, describes the Peruvian miners' strike as "worth watching very closely over coming days."  If Shining Path guerrillas start shooting miners who refuse to join the strike, as they've threatened to do, "then we could see a stoppage lasting many weeks," he says.  Mr. Arnold cites a reported quote by a major union executive that the strike could last for weeks and even months if the guerrillas follow through on their threat.  The strike could last as long as last year's stoppages, which totaled almost 13 weeks if there is violence, but end "fairly quickly" if there is none, the union leader is reported to have said, according to Mr. Arnold.  The two mines in question, Toquepala and Coajone, account for about two-thirds of Peru's annual copper output of 155,000 tons, Mr. Arnold says.  No developments were reported regarding the Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea, which announced it would resume operations sooner than expected, on Sept. 1.  No developments were reported in the Highland Valley strike in British Columbia, which began July 9.  With respect to Bougainville, Merrill's Mr. Arnold commented: "Bougainville said it could restart limited production at the end of this month.  But there was a question of whether peace could be guaranteed, and the mine's management would exercise extreme caution before deciding on a restart."  London Metal Exchange stocks last week fell 875 tons to 77,300 tons.  That was less than the anticipated decline of as much as 5,000 tons, which contributed to weakness in prices in both London and in the early part of trading in New York, an analyst said.  However, the Mexican bankruptcy news later lifted New York prices.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Petroleum futures prices rose on thin trading and little news.  West Texas Intermediate crude for September delivery increased 28 cents a barrel to settle at $19.08 on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  October and November crude contracts were up 21 cents and 20 cents, respectively.  Heating oil also was stronger.  The September contract settled at 51.89 cents a gallon, up 0.89 cent.  October and November heating-oil contracts were 0.92 cent and 0.83 cent higher, respectively.  Despite generally lethargic oil markets, traders expect some pricing volatility this week as the result of two developments today -- expiration of the September crude contract on the New York Mercantile Exchange and the release, after trading closes, of the latest weekly U.S. oil statistics by the American Petroleum Institute.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Most soybean futures prices rose amid speculation that a recent dry spell in the Midwest is reducing the potential yield of the crop in states such as Iowa and Nebraska, said Richard Feltes, a vice president and director of research at Refco Inc., Chicago.  Much of the western section of the soybean-growing region of the Midwest has received less than half its normal rainfall so far this month.  The dry spell is occurring during the critical pod-filling stage of the soybean crop, in which the seeds in the pods develop.  Corn futures prices were mixed while wheat futures prices slipped.  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices ended with little change.  December delivery gold was up 60 cents an ounce at $374.50.  September silver was off 1.2 cents an ounce at $5.243.  October platinum was up $1.90 an ounce at $487.70.  One analyst said that the action was mostly technical and that the market lacked new fundamental developments.  Another analyst observed that precious metals were being beset by the worst of both worlds, low inflation and moderate economic growth.  The dollar was steady against most foreign currencies and this acted as a price depressant, he said.  On the positive side, there was some bargain hunting for bullion because of current low prices, and Asian demand continues to be healthy, he said.  However, cash market demand for precious metals is slow in both the U.S. and Europe, he said.  A group of Japanese companies has offered Iran $1.25 billion to allow its withdrawal from a long-delayed petrochemical project at Bandar Khomeini, the official Islamic Republic News Agency reported.  IRNA, in a report citing comments by Iran's ambassador to Japan in yesterday's edition of Tehran Times, said that the offer by the group led by Mitsui & Co. was rejected by Iran pending further negotiations.  Ambassador Hussein Adeli, in comments to the English-language daily, said, "The Japanese side accepted to pay $1.25 billion to Iran for the settlement of their account and to withdraw their partnership."  He added that Iran wanted to continue the partnership and to complete the plant in southern Iran.  Mr. Adeli said the Japanese agreed to pay Iran after talks over resumption of the 15-year-old joint venture between the Iranian National Petrochemical Co. and the Mitsui-led group began late last year.  It didn't indicate when the actual sum was offered.  IRNA noted that a senior Mitsui official is expected to visit Tehran shortly to "finalize talks" on the unfinished joint-venture plant, known as the Iran-Japan Petrochemical Co.  Telos Corp. said Howard H. Metcalfe, president, chief executive officer and a director, retired to pursue personal interests.  Lin Conger, Telos's co-founder and chairman, who stepped down as president and chief executive in February 1987, was re-elected president.  The technology-services company declined to say whether the retirement is tied to the announcement that fiscal first-quarter revenue was eroded by $252,000 in write-offs taken because nonexistent sales were logged.  In the quarter, ended June 30, net income was $45,000, or one cent a share, on $29.5 million in revenue.  Mr. Conger, 56 years old, wouldn't elaborate on why Mr. Metcalfe, also 56, left except to say Mr. Metcalfe thought it was "an appropriate time."  Telos named Phil Schaefer, executive vice president, to the post of chief operating officer.  Its board has formed a committee to choose a new chief executive.  Mr. Metcalfe couldn't be reached for comment.  "We've had one real screw-up, and we feel we've gotten to the bottom of it," Mr. Conger said, adding that the problem stemmed from the company's field-engineering division.  Mr. Conger said an internal review indicates Telos probably won't report any more substantial write-offs, and a special audit committee plans to bring a full review of the revenue problems to the board within a month.  "We've reviewed every single contract, and it seems to be a finite problem," Mr. Conger said.  "Our checks and balances weren't in place."  The company has also named Lorenzo Tellez, formerly with Arthur Andersen & Co., controller.  Supreme Court Justice Sandra O'Connor issued a last-minute order temporarily blocking the merger of American Stores Co.'s Lucky and Alpha Beta supermarket chains.  The order prevents American from merging the chains until the high court can consider an appeal from the state of California.  The state is trying to prevent the merger.  The full court reconvenes in October and isn't likely to act on the case before then.  If the high court decides to hear California's appeal, the stay of the merger would be continued until the justices come to a final decision.  The California state attorney general appealed to the Supreme Court after a lower federal court in San Francisco cleared the way for the Lucky-Alpha Beta merger, which was scheduled to take place yesterday.  Justice O'Connor handles emergency appeals to the Supreme Court from the ninth U.S. judicial circuit, which includes California.  American Stores, based in Irvine, Calif., acquired Lucky in 1988 for about $2.5 billion.  The Federal Trade Commission approved the acquisition, but the California attorney general filed suit, claiming that the merger would lessen competition in the state and result in $400 million a year in higher prices for shoppers.  Tandy Corp. reported that its fourth-quarter net income was $56.9 million, about the same as the $57.2 million reported a year ago.  The big electronic retailer said per-share earnings rose slightly, to 66 cents in the latest quarter ended June 30, compared with 64 cents the year earlier, because it has been repurchasing shares.  Average shares outstanding were 86.5 million for the fourth quarter, down from 89.1 million last year.  Revenue rose 10% to $897.4 million from $813.5 million the year earlier.  The results were somewhat lower than analysts' estimates.  According to Zacks Investment Research Inc., analysts were expecting the company to report net of about 72 cents a share.  Tandy's stock fell $1.25 a share on the news, closing yesterday at $44.75 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Despite the flat earnings, Tandy said it believes the sluggishness in low-end computer sales that affected sales all year may be ending.  "We think the worst of those market conditions are behind us," a spokesman said.  The impact was felt most at Tandy's Radio Shack stores, which sells Tandy's cheapest computer models.  Computer sales at Radio Shack stores dropped 9% for the year, while other consumer electronics sales grew about 6%.  As a result, Radio Shack sales grew only 3% for the year, the spokesman said.  To counter the decline, the company is beginning a marketing program for fiscal 1990 to emphasize the ease of use of its models in hopes of stimulating low-end computer sales.  Overall, the spokesman said Tandy's computer revenue grew 15% for the year, bolstered by agreements to sell computers to other vendors, such as Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. and Digital Equipment Corp.  For the year, the company had net income of $323.5 million, or $3.64 a share, up 2% from the $316.4 million, or $3.54 a share, reported in fiscal 1988.  Revenue was $4.18 billion, up 10% from $3.79 billion last year.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered its ratings on about $150 million of this retail nursery and crafts stores operator's long-term debt, including subordinated debt, which was downgraded to single-B-2 from single-B-1.  The rating concern said General Host's leverage "will remain high, and interest and fixed-charge coverage will continue to be modest over the next few years."  Debt-protection measures could weaken further if the company were to make a significant acquisition, Moody's said.  Harry W. Todd, chairman and chief executive officer of Rohr Industries Inc., said he will step down at the end of the calendar year, making way for Robert H. Goldsmith, who has been president and chief operating officer since February.  Wall Street credits Mr. Todd, 67 years old, with executing several master strokes during his tenure at Rohr that have helped annual revenue at the aerospace-equipment supplier nearly double to more than $1 billion.  Among the strategies Mr. Todd has employed since joining the company in 1980 was to have Rohr bear more of the risk in developing products for aircraft makers, as long as Rohr reaped more profit if those products were used in high volume.  Given the current surge in commercial-jetliner orders, "it was an absolutely brilliant move," said Phillip Brannon, an analyst who follows Rohr for Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, New York.  Mr. Todd also is credited with expanding Rohr's manufacturing base from its Chula Vista, Calif., home to several lower-cost, non-union plants across the country.  The company has nine facilities in the U.S. and one in Toulouse, France, where European aircraft consortium Airbus Industrie is based.  Above all, "Todd is a super salesman," said John Simon, an analyst at Seidler Amdec Securities Inc., Los Angeles.  In a statement released by his office yesterday, Mr. Todd said he had five goals when he came to Rohr from L.E. Myers Co., a Chicago electrical-transmission maker.  Those goals included improving Rohr's manufacturing focus and its financial strength.  "These objectives have been essentially achieved," Mr. Todd said.  Mr. Goldsmith, who will keep the president's post after Mr. Todd retires, is largely unknown to the financial community, although he has moved steadily up the ladder at Rohr.  The 59-year-old executive joined the company in 1984 as senior vice president of operations and was appointed to the Rohr board in June 1987.  He spent most of the early part of his career in a variety of engineering and management positions with General Electric Co.'s aircraft-engine businesses.  Analysts said Mr. Goldsmith's strong background as an operations-oriented executive is just what Rohr needs now.  With a record $2.2 billion backlog, "they sure don't need someone to sell a lot more product," said Merrill Lynch's Mr. Brannon.  "The trick is getting it out the door."  Indeed, Rohr's earnings for the past few quarters have been somewhat below expectations because of high interest expense associated with excessive work-in-progress inventories.  The company's fiscal year ended July 31.  Rohr makes a variety of airplane parts, including nacelle systems, the aerodynamic structures surrounding jet engines.  A Rohr spokesman said it was too soon to tell who might fill Mr. Goldsmith's position as chief operating officer.  In May, the company made eight vice presidential appointments.  After Jan. 1, Mr. Todd said, he will stay on as a director.  Under the company's bylaws, Mr. Todd can remain on the board until he is 72.  The Soviet Bank for Foreign Economic Affairs received formal approval to become the first foreign borrower to tap the newly liberalized Austrian capital market.  The bank, also known as Vnesheconombank, is issuing one billion Austrian schillings ($72.5 million) in bonds targeted largely at Austrian retail investors.  Creditanstalt of Vienna is lead manager for the issue, which carries an 8% coupon priced at par and a final maturity Sept. 8, 1995.  Conditions of the deal are standard for non-government borrowers in Austria.  Denomination of the bonds is 10,000 schillings, with listing on the Vienna stock exchange.  The subscription period runs from Aug. 29 to Aug. 31.  The issue is part of the Soviet Union's increasing forays into Western Europe's capital markets.  In January 1988, Vnesheconombank became the first Soviet institution to issue bonds since the Revolution of 1917 when it tapped the Swiss market.  So far this year, Vnesheconombank has issued bonds in West Germany and Italy and borrowed through a syndicated loan in Switzerland.  Austria began about six months ago to liberalize its financial markets in preparation for a possible entry into the European Community.  The liberalization includes lifting some foreign-exchange controls and easing restrictions on capital exports, and allows foreigners to issue bonds in schillings.  Vestron Inc. posted a $65 million loss for the second quarter on write-downs of motion-picture assets and a 41% drop in sales.  The film maker, citing its restructuring, warned last week that it would report a big loss for the period.  Vestron didn't specify the size of the expected loss last week.  In the year-earlier second quarter, the company had net income of $4.3 million, or 11 cents a share.  Sales in the latest quarter plunged to $52.7 million from $90.3 million a year earlier.  Vestron's restructuring was prompted by a cash shortage resulting from Security Pacific National Bank's termination of a $100 million credit line last October.  Last week, Vestron sued the bank's parent, Security Pacific Corp., in federal court in Los Angeles seeking damages and restoration of the credit agreement.  The lawsuit claims Vestron's business was seriously damaged by the bank's cancellation of credit.  Security Pacific said the suit is "without merit."  Vestron attributed the sales decline partly to "a substantial decrease" in domestic videocassette sales for films.  The company cited the closing of its theatrical-distribution business, which meant some films received less theater exposure than those released in the year-earlier period.  Closing its theatrical-distribution business resulted in a write-down of about $35 million in the value of unreleased film productions, Vestron said.  Production of feature films also was substantially reduced in the restructuring, Vestron said.  In July, Vestron said it asked its financial adviser, Merrill Lynch & Co., to explore the possibility of merging or selling all or part of the company with another concern.  Vestron said Merrill Lynch also is considering how the company might raise more investment capital, and find a buyer for its retail chain, the Video Store.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Vestron closed at $2.50, up 12.5 cents.  Georgia Gulf Corp., which learned last week that investor Harold Simmons may be interested in acquiring control or ownership of the company, strengthened its anti-takeover provisions by amending a shareholder rights plan.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Georgia Gulf closed at $51.50, down $3.00.  Mr. Simmons said he doesn't believe the plan, known as a poison pill, will be much of a deterrent.  "I don't think (the plans) have ever stopped an acquisition," he said.  Mr. Simmons said that he is attracted to Georgia Gulf because of its profit relative to its stock price and that he might make another filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission today elaborating on his interest in the company.  He wouldn't elaborate.  Georgia Gulf said it increased the exercise price of the rights to $120 from $50.  Under the change, which the company said would increase dilution in the event of an unwanted takeover attempt, each right would entitle a holder to purchase $240 of common stock in Georgia Gulf for $120.  The chemical concern said it also amended its plan to allow holders to pay all or part of the purchase price in stock rather than cash.  The company said it was considering the changes before Mr. Simmons and NL Industries Inc. and its affiliates notified the SEC of the change in the group's investment intentions.  The group had said its 9.42% stake was for investment purposes.  The government abruptly ended contract talks at Mexico's largest copper mine, declaring it bankrupt and dispatching soldiers to guard the premises.  A bankruptcy judge declared Cananea Mining Co., 25 miles south of the Arizona border, insolvent after management said it couldn't meet expenses, much less union demands.  The union had sought a 60% wage increase, a shorter work week, longer vacations and an extensive benefits package that Cananea said would have meant a 330% raise for each miner.  Cananea's 3,000 workers had threatened to strike Aug. 28 if the contract negotiations weren't resolved.  The talks began June 24.  The national development agency that owns Cananea, Nafinsa, said soldiers "intervened" to take care of hazardous materials, including 70 tons of dynamite, stored on the premises.  Cananea has a long history of labor conflict, and tensions have been particularly high since the government decided to sell the mine to private investors.  Cananea said that layoffs were to begin immediately and that the mine would reopen with a new work force when the international copper market improved.  Cananea had tried to improve efficiency and modernize in recent years, but a decline in the world-wide price of copper hurt its earnings.  BCA Securities, a new bond brokerage firm, is slashing its commission rates 50%.  The move, effective Sept. 5, will cut BCA's commission on $1 million of Treasury notes and bonds to $19.53125, BCA officials said.  As recently as the 1970s, the standard commission was $156.25 per $1 million trade.  Several bond dealers, praising the move, said they plan to use BCA as one of the brokers for some of their trades.  "The initial reaction has been excellent," said William A. Herold, one of BCA's two managing directors.  But BCA's rivals say they're not impressed.  They describe the commission cut as an effort by an upstart firm to buy its way into the business, and thus they aren't matching the reduction.  Peter H. McKay, chairman of RMJ Securities Corp., questioned whether any broker can make money at the new rate.  The new commission rate "isn't slim, it's nonexistent," he said.  "At $19, we might as well close the doors."  Bond brokers serve as intermediaries between major bond dealers.  The dealers funnel trades through the brokers because that enables them to remain anonymous and thus avoid alerting rivals to their trading strategies.  BCA, a limited partnership, opened its doors last month.  It now has 94 employees, Mr. Herold said.  More than 50 brokers and other BCA employees came from Fundamental Brokers Inc., a unit of British & Commonwealth Holdings PLC in London.  Plessey Co., a British electronics concern, published its defense document against the #2.04 billion ($3.19 billion) bid by General Electric Co. of Britain and Siemens AG of West Germany.  The core argument of the defense document is that the hostile bid of 270 pence ($4.23) a share undervalues the company.  "They (GEC and Siemens) are attempting to secure control of Plessey without paying a full and fair price," the document said.  "They are presenting a misleading account of Plessey's competitive position and a distorted analysis of its financial performance," it said.  Plessey defended its strategy of diversification and rejected criticism from GEC and Siemens of its expansion into North America.  Contrary to claims by GEC and Siemens, Plessey said its North American interests are "highly complementary, both in business focus and technological capability."  General Electric Co., also known as GEC, isn't related to General Electric Co. of the U.S.  Analysts greeted the defense document with some skepticism, and said it contained no surprises.  "There is nothing new in the document which says Plessey can thrive on its own," said Chris McFadden, electronics analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Securities in London.  He said there is concern as to whether Plessey will deliver the strong growth it has promised.  New York City said its Police Pension Fund will set aside $50 million to lend to local small businesses.  The plan is the first small-business loan program ever established by a New York City pension fund, a spokesman for Comptroller Harrison Goldin said.  Under the program, the federal Small Business Administration will guarantee as much as 85% of the amounts lent.  The Police Pension Fund will provide the funds guaranteed by the SBA, while other lending institutions provide the remaining amounts.  The new loan program is structured after existing SBA loan programs administered by banks and other financial institutions.  However, SBA lending in New York City has lagged behind that of other parts of the country, the city spokesman said.  The World Bank said it has suspended approval of any new loans to Afghanistan because the country is overdue in repaying earlier loans from a World Bank affiliate.  Currently, no new credits from the affiliate to Afghanistan are awaiting approval, though.  The affiliate, the International Development Association, provides credits to poorer developing nations.  World Bank officials said Afghanistan has fallen behind in making payments on $79.4 million in outstanding IDA credits, all of which were disbursed some time ago.  The overdue loan payments amounted to about $805,000 as of June 30.  Afghanistan is the first IDA borrower to have its outstanding credits from the World Bank affiliate put on "non-accrual" status, according to World Bank officials.  Earlier, the World Bank stopped approving other types of loans to nine countries -- Peru, Panama, Nicaragua, Honduras, Guyana, Liberia, Sierra Leone, Zambia and Syria -- because of their overdue loan repayments.  It looks like souvenir sales will be slow in Siberia this summer.  Alaska Airlines, which has been seeking permission to take tourists to the tiny town of Provideniya in Siberia, hoped to begin service soon.  The airline now says diplomatic and technical snags make it unlikely such service will begin before the summer of 1991.  A spokesman blamed the delay on Soviet bureaucracy.  He said locals in Provideniya, a coastal town with a population of 5,000, remain enthusiastic about the plan.  In addition, Alaska Air said it amended its application to the U.S. Department of Transportation, and is now also seeking to provide flights during the summer between Anchorage and the larger Soviet cities of Magadan and Khabarovsk.  Magadan, with a population of about 160,000, is a four-hour, 15-minute flight from Anchorage.  Khabarovsk, with about 600,000 residents, is an additional 2 1/2 hours.  The larger cities offer access to other parts of Soviet Union, business possibilities and a little more for potential tourists to do, the spokesman said.  Alaska Airlines, a unit of Seattle-based Alaska Air Group Inc., has flown through the Iron Curtain before.  The company provided charter service between Anchorage and Khabarovsk and Leningrad during the summers of 1970 through 1972.  In June, 1988 the company made a test trip to Provideniya -- a 45-minute flight from Nome -- checking on tourism possibilities.  In March, the company flew to Anadyr, another city in the Soviet Far East, to transport Americans participating in a joint Soviet-American sled-dog and cross-country ski expedition.  CRANE Co. declared a 3-for-2 split of its common stock and raised its quarterly dividend 12.5% to 18.75 cents a share.  As of July 31, Crane had 21.1 million shares outstanding.  Both the split and the dividend are payable Sept. 29 to stock of record Aug. 31.  Crane is a New York maker of engineered products for aerospace, construction, defense and other markets.  The Nuclear Regulatory Commission should consider questions about Public Service Co. of New Hampshire's financial condition in deciding to issue an operating license for the long-delayed Seabrook, N.H., nuclear plant, a federal agency ruled.  The decision is a procedural victory for Seabrook's opponents, who contend that PS of New Hampshire, the major owner of Seabrook with a 35.6% stake, isn't fit to operate the plant because it is in Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings.  The ruling by the Atomic Safety and Licensing Appeal Board won't necessarily affect the licensing of the plant because the NRC could decide that PS of New Hampshire's finances aren't a factor.  Moreover, the company said recently that it believes it is near fashioning a reorganization plan that would permit it to emerge from bankruptcy proceedings in less than a year.  Nonetheless, Seabrook critics hailed the ruling because it will permit them to raise the issue of PS of New Hampshire's financial qualifications.  Massachusetts Attorney General James Shannon said, "There is an obvious question as to whether a nuclear power plant whose major owner is in bankruptcy can be operated safely."  Under NRC rules, the commission considers the financial condition of utilities only when issuing a construction permit, which in the case of Seabrook occurred years ago.  The appeal board said the NRC must consider waiving that rule because of the "unique circumstances" of the utility's bankruptcy filing.  A spokesman for New Hampshire Yankee, a division of PS of New Hampshire that manages Seabrook, said, "The joint owners have demonstrated that they are financially qualified to operate the plant."  He noted that PS of New Hampshire is one of 11 owners of Seabrook.  After a long delay, Seabrook was issued a low-power test license earlier this year.  Triton Group Ltd. said it boosted its stake in Fuqua Industries Inc. to 17.8% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the SEC, Triton said it holds 3,786,398 shares of the Atlanta-based consumer products and services company, including 290,700 bought Aug. 7 to Aug. 17 for $28 to $30 each.  In early August, Triton raised its stake to 16.4%.  A spokesman for Triton, a La Jolla, Calif.-based holding company, said the company's intention continues to be to obtain voting control of Fuqua "with the near-term goal of acquiring a 25% stake."  Both Fuqua and Triton have described the relationship between the two concerns as "very friendly."  Alleco Inc. said the U.S. District Court in Minneapolis ruled Friday that the trustee of Alleco's $105 million in 9 1/2% convertible senior subordinated debentures could declare the bonds in default.  The court found that Alleco, formerly a food-service company known as Allegheny Beverage Corp., "breached a covenant" in the debentures by dissolving the conversion-to-stock provisions when the company went private last year, said Mark Garfinkle, general counsel of Alleco.  Accordingly, the court said that IBJ Schroder Bank & Trust Co., the trustee of the debentures, could declare them in default even though Servam Corp., which bought Alleco's food operations in 1987, has been steadily paying the principal and interest on the bonds since the purchase.  The court also said that Alleco is not relieved of responsibility for the debentures simply because Servam took over payments under the 1987 deal.  If Schroder declares Alleco in default on the debentures, Alleco will also be in default on about $36 million in other debentures under cross-default provisions: its 14 1/2% debentures due in 1993 and its two issues of 13 1/2% debentures due in 1995.  In addition, redemption of about $12 million of Alleco's junior 10% debentures, which had been held up by their trustee pending the decision, may never occur, said Frank Silvestro, vice president and treasurer of Alleco.  Alleco had deposited enough money with the trustee, U.S. Trust Corp. of New York, to redeem both principal and accrued interest.  Alleco says it will appeal the court's decision.  Energy specialist William J. Kimmel and two other investment bankers defected to First Boston Corp.'s natural resources group from Kidder, Peabody & Co.  Kidder, which wouldn't comment on the moves, is a unit of General Electric Co., and First Boston is owned by CS First Boston Inc., 44.5%-held by Credit Suisse.  Mr. Kimmel, 41 years old, joins First Boston as a managing director of the group.  He was also a managing director at Kidder, where he headed its natural resources group.  William M. Wicker, 39, who joins as a director, had been a senior vice president in Kidder's energy group, specializing in refining, marketing and oil field services.  Carl H. Rudnick, 34, was named a vice president.  He had been a vice president in Kidder's oil and gas area.  Separately, Steven Bragg, 36, joined the First Boston natural resources group as a vice president.  He had been with Salomon Inc.'s Salomon Brothers Inc., working with oil and gas companies.  United Technologies Corp.'s Pratt & Whitney division received an order for jet engines valued at $162 million from Northwest Airlines.  The order is for 12 PW-4000 engines, plus spares.  The engines will power six Airbus Industrie A-330 twinjets that Northwest is adding to its fleet; delivery on the jets is scheduled to begin in 1996.  The latest order brings to 16 the number of A-330s Northwest has on firm order; Northwest has options on four more of the planes.  Northwest, a unit of NWA Inc., St. Paul, Minn., also is equipping its 10 Boeing 747-400 aircraft with PW-4000 engines.  The PW-4000 generates as much as 68,000 pounds of thrust for the A-330.  The engines, which have been in commercial use for the past two years, are interchangeable among wide-body jetliners.  United Technologies, Hartford, Conn., supplies high-technology products and services to aerospace, automotive and building-systems markets.  The province of Quebec is trying to find a home for two shipments of PCB-contaminated waste that were turned away from British ports.  The shipments are at sea and nobody in Quebec wants to take them back.  The cargoes were the first of 13 shipments of contaminated debris, from a burned-out storage warehouse, that Quebec's government had planned to dispose of at a ReChem International Ltd. incineration plant in Britain.  Quebec previously sent PCB waste to the United Kingdom for destruction without incident.  But two weeks ago Liverpool dockers refused to handle any more PCB cargoes after a London tabloid reported that a separate load of PCBs was en route in a Soviet freighter and launched a crusade against the "ship of death."  That shipment was returned to its originator, Montreal-based Dominion Textiles Ltd. However, the fate of the latest PCB cargoes, which are owned by the Quebec government, has became a hot political issue because a provincial election is scheduled for Sept. 25 in Quebec.  The Quebec government wants to return the PCB waste to a temporary storage site near Baie Comeau, a small town in northern Quebec that is the hometown of Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney.  Mr. Mulroney hasn't commented, but many local residents, politicians and dockworkers are fighting the decision.  PCBs, or polychlorinated biphenyls, were commonly used as a coolant in electrical transformers and other equipment before being linked with cancer and banned.  While there is disagreement on just how dangerous PCBs are, when burned at too-low temperatures they release highly toxic dioxins into the air.  PCBs have been a sensitive topic in Quebec since fire ripped through a warehouse in the Montreal suburb of St-Basilele-Grand, a year ago today, and left 3,600 metric tons of PCB-contaminated debris.  There aren't any facilities in Quebec for destroying PCBs.  Three weeks ago, the Daily Star, a British newspaper, learned of the Dominion Textiles shipment and headlined it as a "doomsday cargo" on a "ship of death" and "ship of shame."  Other British newspapers followed suit.  The cargo was returned to Montreal and trucked back to a Dominion Textile plant.  Montreal dockworkers won't promise to unload the government's PCBs, but their willingness to unload the Dominion Textile shipment probably means Premier Robert Bourassa can at least get the government cargo onto a Montreal dock.  Getting it off the dock will be a problem.  The government has said that all waste from the warehouse fire would be stored at a hydroelectric generating station outside Baie Comeau.  Workers at the generated station were among the Baie Comeau residents who denounced the decision.  Workers, residents and others who oppose storing the waste near Baie Comeau met to plot strategy.  Only the mayor of Baie Comeau and the local chamber of commerce are supporting storage of the waste near the town.  Over the weekend the Quebec government ran information sessions in Baie Comeau and showed residents two empty containers of the type the PCB waste is shipped and stored in.  According to opposition town council members, the government also tried to soothe Baie Comeauarea politicians with promises to speed up construction of a concert hall and other benefits.  The provincial government denies it loosened its purse strings in exchange for the support of area politicians.  Getting the cargoes now at sea to Baie Comeau is just a first step.  The mayor of St-Basile has made it clear he wants the government to get the remaining 11 shipments of waste out of his town.  The PCB drama has given a boost to the opposition Parti Quebecois and its leader Jacques Parizeau, who has accused Premier Bourassa of mishandling the issue.  The focus on PCBs has kept Mr. Bourassa on the defensive and diverted attention from his favorite campaign topic, the Liberal government's economic record.  The number of acquisitions in the information-services industry fell 12% in the first half of 1989 and their value skidded 65%, according to an industry report.  The year-earlier period included 11 transactions valued at more than $100 million each, compared with only three in the latest period, the report said.  The report was prepared for Adapso, an industry association based here, by Broadview Associates, a Fort Lee, N.J., investment bank specializing in the industry.  Apart from the decline in large deals, dollar volume was about flat.  "The industry is catching its breath after the exceptional levels of activity in early 1988," said Charles Federman, a partner at Broadview.  The industry recorded 168 mergers and acquisitions in 1989's first half, compared with 190 a year earlier.  Dollar volume sank to $1.9 billion from $5.4 billion.  Four of the six biggest transactions in the latest six months involved divestitures of processing operations.  The largest transaction reported was Computer Associates International Inc.'s $320 million agreement to acquire Cullinet Software Inc.  I.C.H. Corp. said it may explore the possible sale of its 20% stake in First Executive Corp. and said it believes First Executive's recently announced rights package violates a standstill agreement between the two insurance holding concerns.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, I.C.H. said it may consider buying additional shares, but may also consider selling its stake in part because of a recent drop in First Executive's stock price.  Shares of First Executive, based in Los Angeles, fell 62.5 cents to close at $12.125 in national over-the-counter trading yesterday.  In the filing, I.C.H. said it is "taking steps" to preserve its rights under a five-year standstill agreement set in November 1987 between the two companies.  The company didn't elaborate on the alleged violation in the filing.  The rights package, which was announced in July and has been called a defensive move by some analysts, calls for First Executive shareholders to get one right for every five shares of common stock.  The right, which may be sold, would entitle the holder to buy for $15 a package of securities including one depositary share of a new convertible preferred stock and two warrants, each for the purchase of half a share of common stock.  Fred Carr, First Executive's chairman and chief executive officer, declined to comment on I.C.H.'s filing.  I.C.H. recently said it would consider the sale, restructuring or reorganization of the company.  The announcement was made immediately after the company's largest shareholder rejected a tender offer of $8.50 a share, or $408 million, for I.C.H. by Hicks, Muse & Co., a Dallas investment firm.  Goldman, Sachs & Co., a New York investment banking firm, holds 9.7% of Anchor Glass Container Corp.'s common stock outstanding, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Anchor Glass, Tampa, Fla., is the target of an unsolicited $20-a-share, or $251.4 million, tender offer from Vitro S.A. of Mexico.  Goldman Sachs said the stock was purchased "for investment purposes only."  It expects to evaluate the company continually and reserves the right to change its plans and intentions at any time.  According to the filing, Goldman Sachs holds 1,350,100 Anchor Glass common shares, all bought from Aug. 9 to Aug. 14 for a total of about $26.6 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Anchor closed at $20, unchanged.  MAI Basic Four Inc. posted a net loss of $46.2 million for the fiscal third quarter ended June 30, after taking $39.2 million of charges related to its aborted takeover attempt for Prime Computer Inc. and a recently implemented restructuring plan.  In addition to the charges, the Tustin, Calif., computer company had an operating loss of $5.5 million in the quarter.  A year earlier, MAI had net income of $6.8 million, or 45 cents a share.  Sales fell 30% to $51.8 million from $74.4 million.  Charges for the restructuring, which will result in the elimination of about 10% of MAI's world-wide work force of 4,100, amounted to $14.2 million in the quarter.  MAI said the revenue decline "is primarily the result of lost business and deferred buying decisions related to the uncertainty of the company's tender offer for Prime, the continuing mid-range computer industry slowdown, and lower U.S. dollar values of European currencies."  For the nine months, MAI had a loss of $38.4 million, compared with a profit of $18.7 million, or $1.25 a share, a year earlier.  Sales declined 9.9% to $191.4 million from $212.5 million.  Vermont American Corp., Louisville, Ky., said that a "number of parties" have expressed interest in making an acquisition proposal and that it will provide additional company information to the unspecified parties.  But Vermont American, which announced it was exploring a possible sale of the company earlier this month, cautioned that there "can be no assurance that any transaction will result from these discussions."  The maker of consumer and industrial tools earlier this month rejected proposals by Newell Co. of Freeport, Ill., to acquire a 20% to 25% stake.  Instead, directors agreed to continue investigating the possible sale of Vermont American and allow Bear, Stearns & Co., its investment broker, to solicit offers from prospective buyers.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Vermont American closed at $36.50, down 25 cents.  The chairman and chief executive officer of Live Entertainment Inc., a major distributor and retailer of video and recorded entertainment, and his wife were found shot to death in their Beverly Hills home late Sunday evening.  The bodies of Jose Enrique Menendez, 45 years old, and his wife, Kitty, 44, were discovered by the couple's two sons, who then called police.  Craig Harvey, an investigator in the Los Angeles County Coroner's office, said police investigators found the bodies on a couch with "multiple gunshots" to their heads and torsos.  "My gut feeling is it was a {professional} hit," said Mr. Harvey.  "There are seldom multiple gunshots in a burglary."  Mr. Harvey added that there "weren't any signs of a burglary," but said a motive for the apparent double homicide isn't known.  Police said it was too early to say whether the crime was in any way related to business ventures.  Just two months ago Live completed the acquisition of an audio and video retailing chain that was owned by a man the Federal Bureau of Investigation has alleged has ties to organized crime figures.  Late yesterday Peter Hoffman, president and chief executive of Carolco Pictures Inc., which holds a 49% stake in Live was named acting chairman and chief executive of Live.  Roger R. Smith, senior vice president and chief financial officer of Live, was named acting president.  Mr. Menendez was recruited by Mr. Hoffman three years ago to operate International Video Entertainment Inc., an ailing home entertainment software concern in which Carolco had a stake.  Mr. Menendez, who was Cuban born, had previously worked at RCA Corp. for 14 years and was an executive vice president in the company's Hertz Corp. unit and in its RCA/Ariola record unit.  He had also worked as an accountant at Coopers & Lybrand.  Mr. Menendez made sharp cuts in staff at International Video and returned the company to profitability.  Two years ago, the company acquired Lieberman Enterprises Inc., a Minneapolis-based distributor of recorded music, videocassettes and computer software, and the combined company was named Live Entertainment.  "He was one of the strongest, most charismatic people you could have leading a company," said Lisbeth Barron, an analyst at McKinley Allsopp Inc.  In June, Live completed its $40.5 million acquisition of BeckZack Corp. of Milford, Mass., which owns the 81-store Strawberries audio and home-video retailing chain in the Northeast.  Live purchased the company from Morris Levy.  Mr. Levy was convicted in May 1988 of conspiring to extort payments from a record wholesaler.  An FBI affidavit in that case in federal court in Camden, N.J., called Mr. Levy "a lucrative source of cash and property for leaders of the Genovese" crime family.  Mr. Levy, through his lawyer has denied any connection to organized crime.  Yesterday, his lawyer couldn't be reached for comment.  However, Mr. Smith at Live Entertainment, said, "I would urge you not to draw any connection between this bizarre incident and Mr. Levy.  There is no logical connection."  Mr. Smith said that in negotiations for the sale, Mr. Levy had appeared to be "a very happy man."  He added, that the shootings of Mr. Menendez and his wife are "in the category of meaningless, unexplained things.  We may find out {whoever did it had} the wrong house."  Under Mr. Menendez, Live Entertainment has experienced a sharp turnaround and its stock has climbed from a low of about $6 a share, after adjustment for a stock split, to a recent level of about $25 a share.  Trading in the stock was halted yesterday pending announcement of the death of Mr. Menendez.  When it resumed, the shares fell $2.50 to close at $18.50 each in national over-the-counter trading.  The stock of Carolco fell 50 cents to $9.75 each in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Early in the day Carolco reported sharply lower second-quarter earnings but said it was "looking forward to an important contribution" in the future from Live.  Carolco finances, produces and leases movies, including several Sylvester Stallone films such as "Rambo III."  Mr. Hoffman said he doesn't expect the death of Mr. Menendez to hurt the operations of either of the two companies.  "It's an awful, terrible loss, but it won't effect the company," said Mr. Hoffman.  "We'll get through it."  Mr. Smith noted that each of the three divisions of Live Entertainment has its own executive at the helm.  Magma Copper Co., San Manuel, Ariz., said it signed an agreement giving it the option to acquire Addwest Gold Inc., a unit of Addington Resources Inc., for more than $30 million.  Magma has paid Ashland, Ky.-based Addington $500,000 for the option, which allows it to buy all of the assets or stock of Addwest Gold for cash.  The final purchase price is subject to certain closing adjustments, plus a royalty interest on certain excess production from one of the Addwest mineral properties.  Magma's right to exercise the option expires Sept. 28.  The copper producer will operate Addwest through a venture with Golden, Colo.-based Canyon Resources Corp. Magma will have a 75% stake in the venture and will provide Canyon with financing for the acquisition of Addwest's assets.  Addwest's assets include a 60% ownership of the Kendall Mine near Lewistown, Mont., currently owned and operated jointly with Canyon; ownership of the Briggs property and gold deposit in the Panamint Range, Calif.; and an option to purchase a 50% interest in Western Energy Co.'s mineral properties in Montana.  Lyphomed Inc., which has been enjoying a turnaround in recent months, said Japan's Fujisawa Pharmaceutical Co. Ltd. proposed a $31-a-share buy-out of the 70% of LyphoMed's stock it doesn't currently own.  The unsolicited bid values the Rosemont, Ill., pharmaceutical maker at $929.7 million and would provide a hefty premium for a stock that earlier this year traded as low as $11.25.  Disclosure of the bid drove Lyphomed stock up $7.75 a share; it closed yesterday at $30.25 on volume of 4.2 million shares in national over-the-counter trading.  While Lyphomed said it hasn't decided whether it will accept the bid, analysts consider Fujisawa likely to prevail.  Under a standstill agreement reached in 1986, the Japanese concern can't raise its stake above 30.1% without the approval of Lyphomed's board.  Lyphomed said its board established a special panel that is "studying the proposal" with financial adviser First Boston Corp., and it warned that "no one should assume that any transaction will result."  But the company also disclosed that Chairman John N. Kapoor had reached an agreement with the Japanese concern, under which he granted Fujisawa a proxy to vote his 14% stake through year end.  Mr. Kapoor, who until recently held the additional titles of president and chief executive officer, also agreed not to sell his shares to anyone except Fujisawa during the same period.  The Kapoor block gives Fujisawa a powerful 44% voting position.  A company spokeswoman said Lyphomed had no comment on Mr. Kapoor's pact.  Fujisawa's proposal highlights just how far Lyphomed -- a onetime highflyer spurned by investors after it encountered severe problems with federal regulators over quality control -- has progressed in recent months.  After earning $21 million, or 70 cents a share, in 1987, the generic-drug maker last year reported a loss of $21.1 million, on revenue that declined 26% to $127.9 million.  Much of the collapse came from its humiliating and costly problems with the Food and Drug Administration.  Beginning in late 1987 and continuing for several months, federal officials reprimanded Lyphomed for numerous manufacturing violations, and they froze the company's applications to sell any new drugs made in its Chicago-area plants until corrective steps were taken.  A year ago, the FDA seized certain human injectable drugs made by Lyphomed because they didn't conform with "current good manufacturing practices."  Inventory that couldn't be shipped because of the quality-control problems led to big writedowns.  The company had several product recalls, and the FDA's strictures forced closure of two of the company's three plants while the deficiencies were corrected.  One of the plants remains closed, although the company is just starting up a new facility in Puerto Rico.  The problems with regulators have since been resolved, and the company shook up and augmented its management; as part of that, Mr. Kapoor was succeeded as chief executive and president by Gary E. Nei.  Montgomery Securities analyst Leonard S. Yaffe says fast-growing Lyphomed's problems arose because "they simply outgrew their internal controls."  The buy-out offer stems from "the impressive turnaround forged by Gary Nei" and his management team, he said.  In addition to the improved margins that come with a return to volume production at its plants, Mr. Yaffe said, hospital buying groups that had formerly abandoned Lyphomed's generic products are returning.  Lyphomed's sales of pentamidine, a proprietary drug that can prevent a form of pneumonia which kills 80% of all AIDS patients, "continue to increase," the analyst said.  The FDA cleared sale of pentamidine in aerosol form in May, and sales of the product, sold in injectable form since 1984-are expected to perhaps double from the $30 million the company recorded last year.  In the first six months of 1989, Lyphomed eked out $105,000 in earnings, compared with an $11.8 million year-ago loss.  The latest results include a $3.3 million charge related to settlement of shareholder litigation.  First-half sales increased 5.2% to $71.7 million, although the latest quarter showed a much greater 45% sales upturn.  A spokeswoman said Fujisawa had in the past "from time to time expressed interest in increasing their position," but that no recent talks had been held between management and the Japanese company.  Cominco Ltd. and its 61%-owned Cominco Resources International Ltd. unit said they were awarded a license by the Chilean government to develop a copper mine in northern Chile at a total cost of as much as $176 million.  Production at the Quebrada Blanca copper mine should begin by 1993, said George Tikkanen, president of Cominco Resources.  Cominco, a Vancouver, British Columbia, mining concern, and Cominco Resources said they each will own half of an 85% stake in the mine, with an additional 10% to be held by Empresa Nacional de Mineria, a Chilean government agency.  The other 5% will be held by Chilean copper producer Sociedad Minera Pudahuel Ltda. y Cia.  C.P.A.  The Canadian companies plan to spend between $135 million and $150 million to develop the mine, Mr. Tikkanen said.  An initial payment of $5 million also will be made to the Chilean agency for the license, with an additional $21 million to be paid in stages beginning in 1993.  Mr. Tikkanen said early exploration indicated the mine's richest zone could produce 40,000 metric tons of copper metal annually for more than 15 years.  Moses Marx, a New York securities and commodities broker, said he raised his stake in Cooper Development Co., Mountain View, Calif., to 9.4% of the biotechnology research firm's shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Marx reported that he holds 306,301 Cooper common shares, including 70,635 bought July 10 to Aug. 9 for $4.87 to $7 each.  He also reported that he may buy or sell shares, depending on market conditions.  "We feel this is a positive sign," said a spokeswoman for Cooper.  "It reflects his continued confidence in our company."  South Korea's apparent intention to devalue its currency is reviving concern here about whether Seoul will continue to reduce its trade surplus with the U.S.  South Korean Trade and Industry Minister Han Sung soo said Seoul should lower the won's exchange rate against the dollar 3% to 5%.  Such a move would be a setback to the U.S., which has been pressing South Korea and other developing Asian nations to raise the value of their currencies, which Washington insists have been kept artificially low.  "The newly industrialized countries, particularly South Korea and Taiwan, have come a long way, and they now should shoulder more of the burden {of trade adjustments} rather than push if off to other countries," a Treasury spokesman said.  In response to U.S. pressure, Seoul raised the won's value against the dollar 15.8% in 1988 and 2.5% so far this year.  That made South Korean exports relatively more expensive, and U.S. exports relatively cheaper, thus helping to bring down the South Korean trade surplus with the U.S.  Mr. Han's statement on the won, coupled with a call by South Korean President Roh Tae woo for a new export push, appeared to signal the start of a retreat from that accommodative position, but U.S. reaction was somewhat muted.  Bush administration officials recognize that President Roh is under severe domestic pressures to recast his economic thinking.  Seoul's overall trade surplus for the first seven months of this year has shrunk to $166 million from $3.79 billion the year before, and South Korean opposition leaders are blaming the country's skidding trade performance on Mr. Roh's concessions to the U.S.  At the same time, South Korean industries are demanding more incentives to sell overseas.  Weaker exports and higher consumer demand in South Korea combined to reduce the country's trade surplus with the U.S. to $2.4 billion in the first six months of this year from $5.8 billion in the equivalent period in 1988.  The U.S. wouldn't necessarily object to a resurgence of Korean exports, but it would be concerned if that wasn't accompanied by a progressive elimination of barriers to U.S. products, a State Department spokesman warned.  U.S. trade analysts said the proposed 3% to 5% devaluation wouldn't completely offset the substantial rise in the value of the won against the dollar over the past two years.  South Korea's earlier concessions on the won were believed to have been a factor in the Bush administration's decision against including it on a list of countries to be investigated under the socalled Super 301 provision of the 1988 trade act.  However, Seoul may come under intense U.S. trade pressures if it reverses its exchange-rate policy.  Minister Han, for his part, cited a study by the Korean Development Institute, a government research group, that said the won is now overvalued 4% to 10% against the dollar and other major currencies.  U.S. officials, however, believe the won is still undervalued.  Traditional Industries Inc. said all the commissioners of the Federal Trade Commission approved a previously announced settlement of its dispute with the marketer of photographic products and services.  Under the agreement, which has been filed in federal court, Traditional, Agoura Hills, Calif., won't pay a fine but will set up a $250,000 trust fund to provide refunds to certain customers.  Arland D. Dunn, Traditional's chairman and chief executive officer, said the settlement will have no material impact on the company's operations.  Traditional said the FTC investigation focused on the idea that the company was allegedly billing certain photographic services as "custom," which the government disputed.  The government also felt Traditional was failing to provide a three-day "cooling off" period in which customers could back out of a purchase.  Perhaps it's the summer humidity, plus the spectacle of Rudy Giuliani as a mayoral candidate; suddenly we are no longer alone in recognizing the problem of prosecutorial abuse.  The venerable and courageous Murray Kempton has gone so far as to leap to the defense of Bob Wallach and Ed Meese.  "Clod though he may otherwise be, Edwin Meese is a man of honor," Mr. Kempton, now resident at Newsday, wrote after Mr. Giuliani bragged about bagging "the best friend of the attorney general of the U.S."  The columnist's point was that Mr. Meese gained nothing in testifying on behalf of Mr. Wallach, convicted of RICO for sending legal bills.  Mr. Kempton concluded, "The true offense of those liberals who have tolerated and even exalted Giuliani's excesses is that they have permitted their admiration for his ends to overcome the alarm they would more properly feel about his means."  A Newsday colleague, columnist Robert Reno, also had choice words when prosecutors got a one-count guilty plea from Robert Freeman and dropped charges against Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor.  "They could never find anything on the guy they handcuffed, but not to be left looking entirely like a bunch of loutish brownshirts, federal prosecutors scratched around for two years, combed the details of Freeman's existence, and found a wholly unrelated charge to which it was conveniently arranged for him to plead guilty."  Of Mr. Freeman, Mr. Reno added, "who of us, looking at the squalid details of this prosecution, cannot but have the impulse to grant him all charity and to believe on its face his contention that he pleaded to save his family the unspeakable pain and suffering of his being Leona Helmsleyed by the U.S. Attorney's office."  The newsmagazine-cover Helmsley trial is another production of Mr. Giuliani's office, as was the unsuccessful prosecution of Ed Koch's pal Bess Myerson.  New Yorkers, meanwhile, are learning of another unsuccessful prosecution, of one Simon Berger, a Long Island lock maker a 1986 jury speedily acquitted of bribing housing officials.  The New York Post has been headlining court papers on the case.  Mr. Berger, now 62, is a survivor of the concentration camps, where his mother and several siblings died.  After he was arrested in his home at 7 a.m., handcuffed and delivered to the U.S. Attorney's office, he found himself in front of a blackboard on which was written "Arbeit Macht Frei."  These words, which translate "Work Shall Set You Free," are notorious as the legend inscribed over the entrance to Auschwitz.  No one disputes the account; there are photographs of the blackboard.  How the phrase came to be written on a blackboard before an Auschwitz survivor in the offices of the U.S. Attorney for Manhattan has never been explained, though a federal judge decided there was "no evidence" that it had been done to intimidate the suspect.  The Simon case was lost by former assistant U.S. attorney David Zornow -- who later went on to work for Lawrence Walsh prosecuting Ollie North.  Across the continent, meanwhile, the liberal Los Angeles Times has come out foursquare for the repeal of RICO.  The American Civil Liberties Union, for that matter, has opposed the statute from the start.  In short, public sentiment has moved considerably against prosecutors, most notably liberal opinion -- which must wonder how it came to side with aggressive prosecutors against individuals in the first place.  What remains is a similar recognition by the establishment/conservative administration currently responsible for the federal justice system.  So far, Attorney General Thornburgh has responded by rallying around the troops.  Mr. Giuliani was even allowed to name his own "interim" successor, Benito Romano, to clean up loose ends like Freeman-Wigton-Tabor.  The rumor in New York legal circles -- understandable if not substantiated -- is that Mr. Thornburgh is keeping Mr. Romano in office until the mayoral election, though Otto Obermaier was picked as Mr. Giuliani's permanent successor in January.  It seems to us that the Justice Department ought to pound some desks to find out conclusively whether a U.S. official intentionally taunted an Auschwitz survivor.  More broadly, it should launch a complete review of all U.S. Attorney RICO cases -- from Mr. Giuliani's first RICO-expanding case against Marc Rich in 1984 through the current allegations against Chicago pit traders and Michael Milken.  The meaning of the tide turning against unfettered prosecutors is clear.  For the first time in the history of this country, federal prosecutors are in danger of losing their credibility.  If the Bush administration is serious about truly enforcing the law against drug criminals and the rest, it needs to start by dispelling any basis for comparisons with Nazi law enforcement.  B.A.T Industries PLC launched short-range and long-range assaults on the hostile #l3.4 billion ($20.98 billion) takeover bid for the company by an investor group headed by Sir James Goldsmith.  Seeking to placate shareholders, B.A.T announced record first-half earnings and a 22% increase -- to 9.3 pence (14.6 cents) a share -- in its interim dividend, while defending the company's performance under Chairman Patrick Sheehy.  And, in a step that could have longer-term significance, B.A.T indicated that it is becoming increasingly sensitive to pressure from institutional holders to do something to lock in recent share-price gains uncorked by the Goldsmith bid.  B.A.T offered no specifics on how it would try to enhance shareholder value.  But it did say that it had ruled out two courses: "unbundling" its four major units into separate, publicly held issues, and upwardly revaluing fixed assets such as real estate.  Persons close to B.A.T said that no definite course had been fixed but that a recapitalization was a possibility.  "We're fighting one enemy at a time," said a B.A.T adviser, explaining that the first task was to defeat the hostile takeover attempt.  B.A.T shares edged up about 2% on the day.  In late trading on London's stock exchange, they were quoted at 833 pence, up 20 pence, with most of the gain attributed by analysts to the company's statements on enhancing share value.  Said Robert Gibson, of Robert Fleming & Co.: "The earnings were helpful, but much more to the point, the company is saying that even if Goldsmith is forced to go away, the questions put into the ring (about share value) won't go away.  That's the most important thing."  Sir James has alleged that B.A.T has been mismanaged and should be broken up.  His Hoylake Investments Ltd., which has launched a highly leveraged, all-paper bid for B.A.T, would sell off all B.A.T assets save the company's tobacco business.  Hoylake sought to minimize B.A.T's announced 20% increase in first-half pretax earnings, to #811 million, or 32.07 pence a share.  Hoylake said B.A.T "fails to address the key issues: the stark failure of the core tobacco business, which has lost market share in the U.S. and world-wide; the strategic blunders in the retailing diversifications; the lack of organic growth in (sales), which has been masked by profits provided by successive acquisitions; and the fundamental flaws in the conglomerate structure."  The occasion for the earnings announcement, which was advanced from Sept. 6, was the release of B.A.T's takeover-defense document to shareholders.  In the document, Mr. Sheehy conceded:  "We have, of course, been concerned for some time about the value of your shares . . . compared with the underlying value of the businesses.  We have never taken a short-term view . . . but we appreciate that planning for the future remains a problem while this gap in value remains.  We have, for some time, been considering ways in which this gap can be eliminated; clearly this task is now more urgent."  Mr. Sheehy told a news conference that he has met recently with major institutional holders.  "They have indicated that they wouldn't like the share price to fall back to the undervalued situation" before the Hoylake bid.  The bid, unveiled last month, has pushed up B.A.T's share price almost #2.  Standard Life Assurance Co., Postel Investment Management and Legal & General all said that they have met recently with B.A.T officials and that they and other institutions would do the same later this week.  The institutions indicated that they would be reasonably patient with any B.A.T plans to enhance share value.  "One wouldn't want to undertake such a radical restructuring within the time frame of a takeover bid -- less haste, more speed," said Andrew Threadgold, Postel's chief executive officer.  "But one would want to see management coming forward with proposals."  The increased dividend is payable Nov. 21 to stock of record Sept. 28.  B.A.T said revenue increased 23% from a year earlier to #10.02 billion.  Among B.A.T's major areas, tobacco products provided #404 million pretax profit, up 12% from the 1988 first half.  Financial services, aided by a #132 million contribution from recently acquired Farmers insurance group, had an 80% rise, to #398 million.  Paper products edged up 3%, to #114 million, while the troubled retailing operations earned #30 million pretax, up from #19 million.  Earnings attributable to shareholders totaled #489 million, up 21% from #404 million a year earlier.  The following is a Los Angeles Times editorial published last Wednesday.  A related Journal editorial appears today.  From the moment of its passage, civil libertarians and legal scholars have warned that the federal government's Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act -- the so-called RICO statute -- is an open invitation to prosecutorial abuse.  Now, as a recent story by Times Staff Writer Scot J. Paltrow reported, many of those scholars, some of them former prosecutors, believe their anxieties have been realized.  They argue that RICO's widening application in an astonishing array of cases makes it imperative that Congress erase this law from the books.  We agree.  A good law has several essential attributes: It is clear; it addresses itself to a specific and clearly defined form of illicit conduct; it prescribes a remedy or punishment proportionate to the damage done by the offense.  Statutes that fail to meet these tests are enacted not in the cause of justice, but for the convenience of the state.  RICO, in fact, is one of the latter.  Any law whose language can be construed, as RICO's has, to cover the conduct of Mafia loansharks, Wall Street financiers, Chicago commodity traders and Los Angeles slumlords is vague and overly broad.  Equally important, its harsh forfeiture penalties and lengthy prison sentences are, in most cases, disproportionately severe and cruelly coercive.  RICO orginally was directed against the conspiratorial activities of so-called mob families.  However, the law is so loosely worded that any two instances of illegal conduct within a 10-year period -- even if relatively trivial -- can, if they involve use of the mail or telephone, be prosecuted as a "pattern of racketeering activity."  Each such racketeering count is punishable by 20 years in prison and the forfeiture of the defendant's entire interest in the "racketeering enterprise," even if but a tiny fraction of the money derived from an illegal activity.  Worse, RICO allows the government to freeze the accuseds' assets before trial, thereby depriving them not only of their livelihood, but also of the ability to mount a vigorous defense against the charges.  RICO affronts our system's sense of fairness because it is a particularly telling example of the problems inherent in all conspiracy laws.  The way to deal with stock manipulators is to prosecute them for violating the securities regulations; the way to deal with hoodlums is prosecute them for committing crimes, not talking about them.  ---  (Reprinted by permission.)  Sherwin-Williams Co. said it reached an agreement in principle to acquire the Chemical Coating Group of Los Angeles-based Whittaker Corp. Terms weren't disclosed.  The Cleveland-based paints and coatings producer said the acquisition would "significantly increase sales" in the company's chemical coating segment, which had revenue of about $680 million last year.  The company said the transaction is expected to be completed by fall.  The Whittaker coatings group, which produces industrial coatings, comprises eight operating divisions, 10 manufacturing facilities in nine states and two research laboratories.  The coatings group sale is part of Whittaker's previously announced divestiture plan, which has already included the sale of Whittaker's Heico Chemicals division and agreements to sell its Ram Chemicals division and Whittaker Plastics division.  Michael Olsher, who sold a metals company bearing his name to Andal Corp. earlier this decade, bought back a controlling interest in the business for cash and debt valued at $6.7 million.  Andal, a maker of metal-coating systems, said it sold a 75% share of its Olsher Metals Corp. unit to Mr. Olsher, who became chief executive officer of the unit and an Andal director, after selling the business to Andal.  As part of the transaction, Andal said it received a $3 million dividend in cash and notes, $2.4 million par value of redeemable preferred stock, and a $1.3 million subordinated note for intercompany indebtedness.  In New York, Andal said it won't recognize any material gain or loss on the sale.  Olsher Metals had $57.1 million in revenue last year, representing 55% of Andal's revenue, an Andal spokesman said.  Olsher Metals earned $457,000 in 1988, he said.  Mr. Olsher sold Andal an 80% stake in Olsher Metals in 1982 and the rest of the company's stock in 1986.  A Canadian affiliate of CPC International Inc., a food company, said it agreed to buy the Bovril Canada Inc. unit of SmithKline Beecham Co. Terms weren't disclosed.  Bovril makes liquid and powdered bouillon products.  SmithKline said that in Canada it plans to focus on its pharmaceutical and over-the-counter drug businesses, adding that it is retaining the larger Bovril business in the United Kingdom and other parts of the world.  Dick Levy really believes in his clients.  He'd better: two of them are paying his new agency, Dick Levy & Associates, largely with equity instead of cash.  Mr. Levy is taking a major gamble that the two clients, both tiny start-up companies, will grow and prosper, or at the very least survive.  In the process, he is rushing headlong into a controversial method of payment that other small agencies are looking at carefully, if with some skepticism.  "I think it's wholly worthwhile under the right circumstances," says Amil Gargano, chairman of ad agency Ally & Gargano.  "It makes the agency a partner, and that is very attractive."  But he warns that it doesn't work for every client: "To get no revenue at all and to have everything based on the future, particularly with something that doesn't look like it has a bright future, isn't the kind of thing I'd feel particularly good about."  For Mr. Levy, the risks are certainly big.  The two clients paying him partly with equity are untested companies in difficult fields.  His fledgling New York agency has only five clients in total, making their contribution that much more important.  The two clients are Aqua Buoy Corp., which makes a wristwatch-sized gadget that inflates to become a flotation device; and Canadian Mountain Springs, a bottled water company that will have to tackle Evian and Perrier, among others, to be successful.  Both companies have given Mr. Levy's agency a small piece of their businesses -- 1% in one case, slightly more in the other.  They also cover costs for creating and placing ads, and pay what he calls a "partial fee."  Says Mr. Levy: "Instead of a sure thing in my pocket, I'm betting on myself and on the company, that it's going to be successful.  If the clients get rich . . .  I'll make a lot of money, much more than 15%," the normal agency commission.  Problems can arise, however.  Ad agency Messner Vetere Berger Carey Schmetterer several years ago took on the Atari computer account in return for Atari stock options as well as a fee that only covered expenses.  Messner Vetere worked for almost a year on a campaign to launch a new computer, but the product was never introduced, and the agency resigned the account.  "We didn't lose money, but we weren't making any money, and it was so labor- and time-intensive.  It just wasn't working out as well as we had hoped," says Wally Carey, one of the agency's principals.  Still, Mr. Carey says he hasn't soured on the concept altogether.  He estimates that about 40% of his agency's clients make payments based on the performance of their products.  And he says that he would be happy to consider an equity arrangement with some other client: "At the right time, with the right company and the right product, it can be very attractive."  Agency executives say the problem with most clients willing to give away equity is that equity is all they want to pay.  Mr. Gargano, for example, says his agency turned down a client that wanted to pay only in stock, which he calls "unreasonable."  Industry executives note that companies willing to pay in equity are usually the ones ad agencies want to avoid -- the ones in the riskiest businesses.  But Mr. Gargano says Ally & Gargano would still like the chance to be given equity as part of payment, and says he has approached "one or two clients over time," to no avail.  He notes that his agency took on both the Federal Express and MCI accounts when those businesses were tiny start-ups.  An equity stake in either, he points out wistfully, would have been worth a small fortune today.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ASSIGNMENT: General Motors' Oldsmobile division awarded the ad assignment for its Owner Loyalty Direct Marketing program to Leo Burnett Co., Chicago.  Billings are estimated at $15 million.  The account had been handled by Grey Advertising's direct marketing subsidiary.  Cetus Corp., a biotechnology firm, said the U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved its bid to market a generic form of the anti-cancer drug cytarabine.  The approval is a boost for Cetus, which has had heavy losses while developing new drugs.  But the U.S. market for cytarabine is tiny, about $11 million a year, estimates Denise Gilbert, an analyst with Montgomery Securities, San Francisco.  Cetus, Emeryville, Calif., developed the drug with Ben Venue Laboratories Inc., Bedford, Ohio.  Saxon Oil Co. said it changed its name to Hallwood Energy Corp. to reflect better its relationship with Hallwood Group Inc., a New York and Cleveland merchant bank.  Hallwood Group owns 30% of Saxon Oil and has two seats on Saxon's four-member board.  Saxon also said that its 67%-owned Saxon Oil Development Partners Limited Partnership changed its name to Hallwood Energy Partners L.P.  Stocks on the Nasdaq over-the-counter market, caught in the selling spree that toppled New York Stock Exchange issues, posted their largest one-day decline since late June.  But takeover target Lyphomed jumped 34%.  The Nasdaq Composite index fell 0.8%, or 3.64, to 458.33, primarily in response to the pressure of heavy program-selling on the New York Stock Exchange.  The Big Board Composite dropped 1.39%, by comparison.  Volume totaled a skimpy 108.6 million shares.  The OTC market's winners trailed losers, 716 to 1,214.  Traders said that aside from the influence of computer-driven program selling on the Big Board, there were few trends in the OTC market.  Technology stocks, which form the core of the unlisted stock market, continued softening, while financial stocks weakened further on fears that the decline in interest rates has ended for now.  A string of economic reports in recent weeks has led many investors and analysts to conclude that the economy isn't slowing as sharply as believed earlier this summer.  Such conditions would end further easing by the Federal Reserve, analysts said.  Joseph A. Loftus, vice president of institutional trading on the OTC desk at Shearson Lehman Hutton, said he didn't see buyers rushing to pick up cheap stocks at the close.  That could mean more weakness this morning, Mr. Loftus said.  But he sees the selling as healthy.  "The market should have a correction before it goes to new highs," he contended.  Jim Tarrantino, head of OTC trading at Hambrecht & Quist in San Francisco, said activity among Nasdaq issues market was abysmally slow, typical of a late-summer Monday.  He said it was the lack of buyers available to soak up sell orders that caused the steep decline when program selling battered the markets.  Investors can expect to see more of the same, he added.  "The closer we get to Labor Day, the slower it's going to get," he said.  Lyphomed was the big winner on Nasdaq.  The drug company's stock jumped 7 3/4 to 30 1/4 and topped the most active list with more than 4.2 million shares traded.  Japan's Fujisawa Pharmaceutical sent the stock soaring when it proposed buying the remaining Lyphomed shares that it doesn't already own for $31 each, or a total of about $649 million.  Fujisawa already holds about 30% of Lyphomed's shares.  Lyphomed said a special committee of its board is studying the proposal.  Separately, Lyphomed said it got approval from the Food and Drug Administration for its new manufacturing facility in Canovanas, Puerto Rico.  Live Entertainment lost 12%, or 2 1/2, to 18 1/2 on news that the company's chairman and chief executive officer, Jose E. Menendez, and his wife were found fatally shot at their home in Beverly Hills, Calif.  No suspects have been taken into custody in connection with the shooting.  First Executive tumbled 5/8 to 12 1/8.  ICH, which holds a 20.02% stake in the company, said it may consider selling its shares.  Also making a rare appearance on the most active list, Summa Medical dropped 7/8 to 3 5/8 on volume of more than 950,000 shares.  The company said it knows of no reason for the trading activity.  Summa's stock peaked at 6 1/8 in July but has dwindled since then.  Two stocks mentioned in Barron's articles were actively traded.  Carrington Laboratories fell 3 3/4 to 31 1/2 on 141,600 shares.  An article in Barron's said the Irvin, Texas, drug maker is the target of a lawsuit by Research Biogenics that "levels some very ugly charges against the company."  Barron's said the charges relate to Carrington's efforts to gain FDA approval for its Carrisyn drug, derived from the aloe vera plant, for treating acquired immune deficiency syndrome and other afflictions.  Tom Marquez, Carrington's chairman, called the Barron's story "misleading" and denied the allegations in the lawsuit, which he characterized as "frivolous."  Hibernia added 1 to 22 on 404,000 shares.  Barron's said the Louisiana banking concern's conservative lending and acquisition policies have worked well.  Among other advancing issues, North West Telecommunications rose 1 1/2 to 33 1/4.  The stock has risen steadily since the company announced last week that it had spurned unsolicited interest by a party that wasn't identified and had hired Morgan Stanley to help it evaluate "strategic alternatives."  Dreyer's Grand Ice Cream added 1 1/8 to 30 7/8, a new 52-week high for the stock.  The company said it knows of no reason for the price rise.  The stock rose steadily last week, posting a cumulative three-point gain.  Some analysts have been bullish on the stock since the company estimated in June that it would have 25% annual earnings growth over the next several years.  Gechem S.A., the chemical subsidiary of Societe Generale de Belgique, said it agreed in principle to sell its Omnichem S.A. fine-chemical unit to Ajinomoto Co. of Japan for 3.78 billion Belgian francs ($92.4 million).  Societe Generale is a holding company controlled by Cie.  Financiere de Suez of France.  Gechem, which has been shedding assets as part of a restructuring program, said it will examine the possible sale of its 40% stake in Nobel Explosifs Belgium S.A., an industrial-explosives joint venture with Societe Nationale des Poudres & Explosifs, a French state-owned munitions maker.  Ajinomoto, a food-product, seasoning and chemical maker that has been marketing its products in Europe since the 1960s, intends to use Omnichem to "establish a platform for its expansion in Europe," Gechem said.  Ajinomoto officials couldn't be reached for comment.  A final agreement is expected by midSeptember.  Omnichem, which had 1988 revenue of 1.6 billion francs, makes intermediate chemical products for the pharmaceutical and food industries, and has 350 employees at three facilities in Belgium.  Deutsche Bank AG, West Germany's largest bank, will begin selling its own life insurance products at its 1,300 domestic branches on Sept. 1.  The move reflects the nation's banking-sector diversification into other financial services, largely a response to a growing sophistication among investors and new challenges from foreign competitors looking for part of the lucrative life insurance market, which generates more than one trillion West German marks ($500 billion) in premiums annually.  Yesterday, Winterthur Insurance Co. of Switzerland said it acquired two small West German insurers, Allgemeine Versicherungs AG and Telcon Versicherings AG, from ITT Corp. of the U.S. for an undisclosed sum.  Recent financial-services alliances were made by the West German private bank Sal Oppenheim & Cie. and Groupe Victoire of France; Allianz AG, West Germany's largest insurer, and Dresdner Bank AG, the No. 2 bank; Allianz and Bayerische Hypotheken & Wechsel Bank AG; and Commerzbank AG, the No. 3 commercial bank, and the state-owned insurance group DBV & Partner Versicherung.  An American Telephone & Telegraph Co. unit said it will develop high-speed static random access memory, or SRAM, chips with Paradigm Technology Inc. of San Jose, Calif.  The New York-based telecommunications giant's AT&T Micro-electronics unit said it will provide Paradigm with equity and financing under a five-year agreement.  It wasn't more specific.  In return, AT&T Micro-electronics said it would be getting quick access to the SRAM market, which has become attractive because SRAMs operate faster than the more commonly used dynamic random access memory chips, known as DRAMs.  The initial products will be a family of 256-kilobit SRAM devices with target access times of less than 20 nanoseconds, or billionths of a second.  Samples are to be available in the fourth quarter.  Union Carbide Chemicals & Plastics Co., a unit of Union Carbide Corp., and Sekisui America Corp. said they are establishing a joint venture to manufacture resins for toners used in copying machines and laser printers.  The venture, Hexatec Polymers, will provide custom styrene-acrylic resins for North American and South American markets.  Both Union Carbide, Danbury, Conn., and Sekisui America's parent company, the Japan-based Sekisui Chemical Co., are major resin manufacturers.  Until the production plants are in line, Hexatec will import toner resins from Japan, the companies said.  In a separate announcement, Union Carbide Industrial Gases Inc. said it will nearly double the capacity of an air separation plant in Inver Grove Heights, Minn., at a cost of $8 million.  The plant, part of Union Carbide's Linde division, can produce up to 530 tons of liquid nitrogen, oxygen and argon a day.  After the expansion, the capacity will be 1,000 tons.  The Quebec Superior Court dismissed Oxdon Investments Inc.'s request for an injunction to block a rival bid for Steinberg Inc., a large food retailing and real estate concern based here.  Oxdon immediately filed an appeal but failed in two last-minute attempts to obtain, pending the appeal, temporary restraining orders that would have frozen the rival bid, a 1.33 billion Canadian dollar (US$1.13 billion) tender offer by Socanav Inc., that expires today at 4:30 p.m. local time.  A Quebec Court of Appeal ruling might take several months, leaving the way clear for Socanav to close its bid today.  Socanav, a small Montreal-based shipping concern, is assured of acquiring at least voting control of Steinberg under an exclusive option agreement with a Steinberg family group that allows Socanav to acquire the family group's 52% voting stake.  Oxdon's almost identical tender offer expired at 1 a.m. today.  But as previously reported, Oxdon effectively replaced that bid Friday with a merger proposal valuing Steinberg at C$1.47 billion.  However, Steinberg's board said last night it couldn't consider the Oxdon merger proposal, because Socanav refused to extend its bid.  Oxdon had said its merger proposal was conditioned on Socanav's delaying the expiration of its bid and not taking up and paying for any Steinberg shares until after holders voted on the merger proposal.  Socanav declined to do so, the Steinberg board said.  The Steinberg board also said "it would be prudent" for holders to tender to Socanav, in view of the court decision dismissing Oxdon's injunction request.  Under Oxdon's proposal, it would buy all of Steinberg's common and Class A stock at C$80 for each common share and C$60 for each Class A share.  Under its tender offer, Oxdon was offering C$75 a common share and C$53 a Class A share.  Socanav is offering C$75 a common share and C$51 a Class A share.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Steinberg Class A shares closed at C$51, down C$1.50.  Steinberg common shares aren't publicly traded.  Oxdon is owned equally by Kingsbridge Capital Corp., a merchant bank affiliate of Unicorp Canada Corp.; Oxford Development Group Inc., a closely held real estate developer; and Gordon Investment Corp.  All three concerns are based in Toronto.  POLISH COMMUNISTS TRADED barbs with Solidarity over a new government.  The party's Central Committee accused Solidarity and its two smaller partners of breaking agreements reached earlier this year by refusing to participate in a government Solidarity didn't lead and giving the Communists only two ministries, defense and interior.  As a result, the party said, it won't vote on supporting Prime Minister-designate Mazowiecki until he presents his program and a full list of cabinet members.  Solidarity leader Walesa called the statement "blackmail."  Despite the threats, Mazowiecki is expected to be confirmed tomorrow or Thursday as Eastern Europe's first non-Communist premier in over 40 years.  ---  Colombian police raided the estates of drug lords, seizing planes, cars and cattle and raising the number of arrests since Friday to over 11,000.  One of those arrested was believed to be a finance chief in the Medellin cartel.  The seizures were carried out under emergency decrees issued last week after a presidential candidate was murdered.  ---  Bush will propose spending $7.5 billion to $8 billion to fight drugs, including more aid for other nations, his chief of staff said.  But Sununu played down the possibility of using U.S. troops to help Colombia deal with the drug cartels.  Bush is scheduled to unveil his drug strategy in a major address Sept. 5.  ---  Recent high court decisions have derailed numerous job-discrimination cases and made lawyers reluctant to bring new suits, civil-rights lawyers say.  Many of the cases were dismissed by lower courts after the Supreme Court ruled last term that an 1866 civil rights law doesn't cover racial harassment on the job.  ---  Turkey announced it was closing its border with Bulgaria to curb an influx of ethnic Turks and pressure Sofia to negotiate an agreement about their future.  Some 310,000 ethnic Turks, saying they faced a Bulgarian campaign of religious and cultural assimilation, have fled to Turkey since it waived visa obligations for them in June.  ---  Voyager 2 fired its thrusters in a delicate maneuver to bring it closer to Neptune's mysterious moon Triton.  Voyager is scheduled to complete its 12-year odyssey through the outer solar system Thursday by passing within 3,000 miles of Neptune's cloud tops.  ---  India has complained that corn it received under a U.S. aid program was tainted with aflatoxin, a potent carcinogen.  The complaint could exacerbate an already touchy trade issue.  ---  Black activists went into hiding in South Africa as police continued to crack down on a campaign to defy apartheid laws and emergency restrictions.  At three Natal province universities, students clashed with police after rallies were held to declare that banned groups would operate openly.  ---  Riot police in Prague beat dozens of protesters as they chanted demands for freedom on the 21st anniversary of the Soviet-led invasion of Czechoslovakia.  Dozens of others were arrested from a crowd of 4,000 that defied a ban on protests and marched through the center of the old city.  ---  Lebanon's Christian commander offered to talk peace, but there was no response from Syria.  In an interview with an Arab magazine, Gen. Aoun didn't mention his previous condition that Syria would have to withdraw its 40,000 soldiers before any talks.  Druse leader Jumblatt called the offer a trick to give Aoun time to re-arm.  ---  Jim Bakker's trial opened in Charlotte, N.C., with the selection of a jury to hear charges that the TV evangelist cheated his PTL ministry out of $4 million.  His wife stayed behind in Orlando, Fla., to continue the couple's daily live broadcast.  ---  Gunmen ambushed and killed British conservationist George Adamson, 83, in Kenya as he drove from his homestead to a nearby airstrip.  Adamson's late ex-wife Joy described the couple's release of captured lions in the wild in "Born Free."  She was killed by a servant in Kenya in 1980.  ---  A package bomb exploded as it was being opened at the NAACP's regional headquarters in Atlanta.  Fifteen people were injured.  The package contained a military cannister of caustic gas that spewed into surrounding offices through air-conditioning ducts.  ---  Died: William F. Bolger, 66, former postmaster general, in Arlington, Va., after a heart attack.  Cie.  Financiere de Suez said it received final approval for its record 23.7 billion French franc ($3.59 billion) takeover bid for Cie.  Industrielle and its parent, Groupe Victoire.  An official of the French financial holding company said the approval for the prospectus was obtained late yesterday.  Details of the prospectus weren't immediately available.  Suez is bidding 13,000 francs a share for all the Cie.  Industrielle stock it doesn't already own.  The group is also bidding 2,000 francs each for Groupe Victoire's common shares and 1,000 francs a share for its nonvoting stock.  The bid is by far the largest ever launched on the French market.  Jean-Marc Vernes, Cie.  Industrielle president, said he plans to fight the Suez bid, but has declined to give details until he announces them at a board meeting today.  The regulatory approval for the Suez bid had been widely expected.  Par Pharmaceutical Inc. said it resumed shipment of some of its generic drugs in pill and capsule form.  But the company said it laid off about 150 employees because of a manufacturing slowdown caused by a federal investigation of the company.  Last week an official of the company, which is under investigation by the Food and Drug Administration, said Par had voluntarily stopped shipping almost all of its 150 oral solid products.  Barbara Manners, a company lawyer, said Par would introduce products "on a batch-by-batch basis" as its reviews verified that they met specifications and conformed to approved formulations.  Par said results of its reviews and the products involved were forwarded to the FDA.  "We had discussed our plan with the FDA and advised them what we planned to do," Ms. Manners said.  However, the FDA's chief spokesman, Jeffrey Nesbit, expressed surprise that Par was reintroducing some products.  He said FDA officials involved with the Par investigation hadn't approved a request by the company to resume distribution.  But Mr. Nesbit said that FDA officials set forth "substantial guidelines" for ensuring that Par's products comply with FDA requirements.  "We will be monitoring the company's efforts to comply with these guidelines," he added.  The FDA had cited manufacturing problems in recently revoking approval for Par's version of a muscle relaxant.  Par also is prevented from obtaining other drug approvals during the FDA probe.  Par has said it expects substantially reduced levels of sales of solid oral products for at least the next quarter because of the FDA probe.  Shipments of the company's injectable products, made by its Quad Pharmaceutical unit, haven't been affected by the FDA probe, Ms. Manners said.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Par shares closed at $5.50, up 62.5 cents.  Coastal Corp. of Houston said it reached an agreement with Southern California Gas Co., ending the utility's opposition to the building of a pipeline system, and granting the utility natural gas transportation rights.  Under the settlement, Southern California Gas withdrew its opposition to the proposed 1,000-mile Wy-Cal pipeline system that would stretch from Wyoming to the heavy-oil fields of Kern County, Calif., in exchange for rights to transport as much as 75 million cubic feet of natural gas a day through the system for 20 years.  If it exercises that option, the utility has the additional option of acquiring, after 20 years, all or portions of the Wy-Cal system that are within the state of California.  Southern California Gas is a unit of Pacific Lighting Corp. of Los Angeles.  The Wy-Cal system is expected to have the capacity to transport 650 million cubic feet of natural gas a day.  Construction of the $665 million gas transmission system is slated to begin in mid-1990, Coastal, a natural gas concern, said.  Carolco Pictures Inc. said Co-Chairman Mario Kassar is negotiating the sale of his 36% stake in the company to Andrew Vajna, the company's other co-chairman.  The stake has a market value of roughly $110 million.  The two men founded the company together, and Mr. Vajna also holds a 36% stake.  An official of Carolco said Mr. Kassar is negotiating the sale because "he would prefer to have a bag of cash instead of the pressure and stress in building a large public company."  Mr. Kassar declined to comment on the possible sale of his stake.  A person close to the company said Mr. Kassar, who was Hungarian born, separated from his wife five months ago and wants to spend more time in Hungary.  The Carolco official said another party has expressed an interest in the stake but declined to identify the party.  Together, Messrs.  Kassar and Vajna hold 22.4 million shares.  Carolco has almost 30 million shares outstanding.  Separately, Carolco posted a 78% drop in second-quarter profit.  The company said that it released two major action movies in the year-ago period, including "Rambo III" and "Red Heat."  The company didn't release any movies in the 1989 second quarter.  The company said the results, therefore, were fully in line with expectations and should pick up in the current half.  In the second quarter, net income fell to $2.6 million, or nine cents a share, from $11.9 million, or 38 cents a share.  Revenue slumped 53% to $34.2 million from $72.8 million.  Messrs.  Kassar and Vajna have co-produced many of the company's pictures and have been involved primarily in the production side of the business.  Peter Hoffman, president and chief executive officer, runs the company on a day-to-day basis.  Carolco said three films are set for release in the third and fourth quarters: "Johnny Handsome," "Music Box," and "Mountains of the Moon."  Carolco also has the world-wide distribution rights to "Lock Up," which stars Sylvester Stallone and opened in August.  A spokesman said the company's first-quarter release, "Deep Star Six," which did meagerly at the box office, has only recently been released on videocassette.  The company said it also is anticipating "an important contribution" from Live Entertainment, a home-video company in which it holds a 49% stake.  In composite trading in the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Carolco shares closed at $9.75, down 50 cents.  Bio-Technology General Corp., New York, started a clinical study using the company's recombinant hepatitis-B vaccine in Singapore.  Scitech Medical Products Pte., Bio-Technology's licensee in Asia, will coordinate the study, which will cover development and distribution of the vaccine in all Pacific-rim nations except Japan and China.  Bio-Technology develops and manufactures genetically engineered health-care products.  Color photocopiers, until now a big-ticket item, are about to move into a much broader market.  Though the technology has been slow to come, color copiers are starting to get fast enough and inexpensive enough to prove useful in many offices.  Industry officials and analysts say the color-copier market, which amounted to $259 million in sales last year, is on the verge of rapid growth.  By 1993, the number of such copiers in U.S. offices will increase as much as 10 times, with sales rising to between $700 million and $1 billion, according to Dataquest, a research group in San Jose, Calif.  "Color is beginning to take off," says David Nelson, an imaging-technology analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. "People are becoming much more sensitive to the quality of presentation."  With color already creeping into many offices via computers and laser printers, the notion is spreading that a little color can drive home the message of a typically drab memo, chart or graph.  Color can increase readership of a memo by 41% over black and white, according to Eastman Kodak Co., citing research by McGraw-Hill Inc.  It can increase retention by 18%, raise a buyer's tendency to act by 26% and create "a more positive feeling toward products or services," according to Kodak.  Color copiers, which are much faster than laser printers, should vastly expand the paper rainbow.  Rita McCallon, systems manager for Invesco Capital Management in Atlanta, says the firm's color copier, designed by Colorocs Corp. of Norcross, Ga., makes financial presentations "much more pleasing and exciting to the eye."  Ms. McCallon used to rely on laser printers for the firm's color copying, but churning out the originals tied up the printers too long, she says.  With the new copier, she says, she's able to use color graphics more extensively.  Though prices are dropping, they remain higher than black-and-white machines, ranging from less than $10,000 for very slow machines to $60,000 for faster models.  By contrast, typical black-and-white copiers for offices cost less than $5,000 and can print at three times the speed of the fastest color machines now available.  So far, Canon Inc.'s Canon U.S.A. unit, with a $39,000 color laser copier, holds more than two-thirds of the fledgling color-copier market in terms of the number of machines in use, according to Dataquest.  But Colorocs hopes to dent that.  The company recently began selling a machine that costs only $17,000.  Made by Sharp Corp. of Japan from Colorocs's designs and patents, the model can duplicate 7 1/2 color copies a minute, compared with five copies a minute by Canon's machine.  Both copiers are plain-paper models aimed at corporate offices, but the Colorocs model is smaller and cheaper than Canon's.  Most color-copier technology has been driven by advancements in electrophotography, which involves projecting an image onto a photoconductive surface that has been sensitized by an electric charge.  The image is then formed in a pattern of charges that attracts the charged color toners.  Colorocs's machine is faster than most other color copiers because it allows the three toner colors -- cyan, yellow and magenta -- to adhere to the image in just one pass through the copying apparatus.  Other machines use multiple passes.  The company says it has a patent on the technlogy and won't say how the advantage is achieved.  Hajime Hirai, a Canon U.S.A. vice president, says the Canon copier offers higher quality because it also uses black toner, which enhances definition.  "I believe we can justify our price," Mr. Hirai says.  In June, the first month that the Colorocs-designed machines were available, the company had $600,000 of revenue on some 50 machines sold in the U.S., says Charles Muench, Colorocs's chairman.  In the first eight days of August, Savin Corp., which, like Sharp, distributes the copiers in the U.S., says it booked orders for half of its entire August allotment of 150 copiers.  Colorocs owns 30% of Savin, which it bought to have a guaranteed distribution channel.  Savin markets the Colorocs-designed machines under its own name in the U.S. and Canada; Sharp sells the machines under its name in the U.S. and Asia.  Gestetner Corp., London, is the marketer for Europe.  Mark Morris, an analyst with Hanifen Imhoff Inc. in Denver, says he expects demand for Colorocs's copiers to make the company profitable in the fourth quarter, after years of losses.  Of course, the company's outlook could change if its competitors match its low prices.  But that, too, would fuel the market's growth.  "Color copying has always been popular, but no one ever introduced anything inexpensive enough for the average-size {corporate} department to purchase," says Mr. Morris.  Eventually, Colorocs, as with other makers of inexpensive color copiers, is expected to earn most of its profits on sales of so-called consumables: toners, belts and other supplies.  In 1993, according to Dataquest, sales of color-copier supplies will total $1.33 billion; sales of the machines themselves, $906 million.  Mead Corp.'s Imaging unit, whose Cycolor technology is the basis of low-end color copiers offered by several Japanese companies and aimed mainly at individual buyers, stands to profit handsomely from consumable sales.  Unlike most color copiers, the Cycolor technology uses simple machines and depends on Mead's special paper to create the color.  "The technology is really in the consumables," says Paul Nezi, Mead Imaging's vice president for sales and marketing.  Cycolor machines, the least expensive type on the market, cost from $6,000 to $8,500, but with the special paper, the cost to produce a single Cycolor copy is about 65 cents, says Mr. Nezi.  That compares with about 15 cents for copies made on electrophotographic machines such as those from Canon and Colorocs.  But the gap quickly shrinks, Mr. Nezi insists, when amortization and servicing costs are added in.  "At 500 to 800 copies a month, Cycolor is cost-competitive," he says.  Still, the Cycolor machines will be a tough sell to corporate customers because they can make only two copies a minute and because users have grown accustomed to plain-paper technology.  Still, Canon's Mr. Hirai says his company is watching the Cycolor machines "very carefully."  Xerox Corp., which ranks third in the overall copier market, is only a small part of the color market so far, according to Dataquest.  The company, which for several years has offered a $39,000 model that makes five copies a minute, says it is now dedicating "significant resources" to its color program.  "We're going to be there in force as those customers' requirements mature," a spokesman says.  At the high end of the market, Kodak's ColorEdge machines are by far the fastest color copiers on the market, capable of producing some 24 duplications a minute.  But at $60,000 a copier, the machines are targeted at corporate copying centers and commercial shops.  Donald McLeland, president of PX Paperworx Inc. of Minneapolis, a copy-shop chain, says the market could bear a price of $2.75 a copy for color duplicates from his Kodak machines, but he charges roughly $1 to spur demand.  He expects the price to drop to 50 cents a page in a year, with his cost sinking to 23 cents a page.  "That's a 20% higher profit margin than black and white," he says.  "And the exciting part about it is we're one step ahead of the Japanese, for a change."  ---  @ Sizing Up the Color-Copier Market  @ A sampling of the color-copier market, with costs and speed for the main entry from each of four companies:  @ COST  @COMPANY SPEED PRICE PER COPY*  @Mead (with Seiko, 2 copies/ $ 6,000 65 cents**  @ Brother and others) min.  @Canon 5 copies/ 39,000 14 cents#  @ min.  @Colorocs (Savin and 7.5 copies/ 17,000 11 cents#  @ Sharp) min.  @Eastman Kodak 24 copies/ 60,000 11 cents#  @ min.  @ *Doesn't include amortization or service costs  @ **Based on 500 copies per month  @ #Based on 3,000 copies per month  @ Source: Companies and Dataquest  SECRETARIES SEEK more authority, with some success.  With more women working, and staying in the work force longer, secretaries see more models for advancement.  Automation gives them more time for new duties, says Pat Wilson, Northrop's industrial relations director.  Some take contract-negotiation, budget or engineering-related jobs.  More firms train secretaries as high-level assistants, paraprofessionals or even managers, says Carol Moseley Hennebach, a Chicago training-services expert.  Secretarial skills are broadening.  At Quanex Corp. in Houston, many secretaries take on marketing or personnel responsibilities.  But the job has lost popularity and the supply of new secretaries lags far behind the demand, complain firms like Shawmut National and Polaroid.  A new job could be a comedown.  The secretary to a group president "is pretty much at the top," Quanex says.  SURVIVING FAMILIES are often told little after a workplace death.  So concludes a survey by the National Safe Workplace Institute, a Chicago group headed by Joseph Kinney, whose brother was killed in a construction accident.  Fully 49% of 200 responding families said they never saw the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration's citation or investigation report, 37% didn't know they could see it, and 17% of those who saw a report had to pay for it.  In the survey, 95% believe OSHA should tell families its procedures, 86% said they should be able to meet with OSHA before a citation and over 80% felt that if they had more contact with OSHA, it would have given the employer a stiffer fine.  Nearly all said they should be able to attend an OSHA-employer meeting.  Fully 70% had no idea what OSHA was doing on the case.  NEW RESTRICTIONS on 401(k) loans will likely roil employers.  The Labor Department rules for the savings-for-retirement funds require that loans to participants from their funds be at market-interest rates, not cut rates.  Employers are "aghast," says Hewitt Associates, benefits consultant; most current loans are pegged at lower prime or benefit-related rates.  More frequent loan-rate changes seem certain, says Buck Consultants.  A mandate that employers treat former workers and beneficiaries the same as employees puts the employer "at risk" in collecting loan repayments, Hewitt says.  Also, no more than half of the value of a borrower's vested benefit can be used to secure a loan; most plans lend up to $10,000, with no 50% limit.  But the new rules take effect on Oct. 18 of this year, instead of being retroactive to 1975, as proposed.  BABY BELL CONTRACTS with communications and electrical-worker unions create "preferred-provider" plans to trim doctor and hospital charges, like the earlier AT&T pact.  Bell Atlantic, US West and Pacific Telesis provide for joint "managed care" schemes; Bell South expands from hospital to doctor and outpatient charges.  WOMEN WILL CATCH UP with men by 1995 in helping fired employees find new jobs, says the Association of Outplacement Consulting Firms.  Only 25% of current placement professionals are women, but their ranks will double in five years, the group says.  Women show particular counseling talent, it adds.  FERVENT OPPOSITION builds by unions to Sir James Goldsmith's $21.66 billion bid for B.A.T Industries, with big U.S. holdings.  The AFL-CIO and international food unions protest; the Bakery, Confectionery and Tobacco Workers says Goldsmith's leveraged buy-outs, even a failed bid for Goodyear, mean lost jobs.  CONTRACT BARGAINING last year spawned a successful program to give 24 individual Louisville-area schools, their teachers and principals more say in policy decisions, the Jefferson County Teachers Association and school board officials say.  So teachers voted to add 24 more schools to the program this fall.  FINANCIAL COUNSELING for managers spreads around, down and out.  Fully 73% of over 300 large firms surveyed recently by Hewitt Associates provide tax, estate or other financial planning help to executives, and the aid has burgeoned in recent years.  While some firms such as SL Industries, Centex and American General shun it, AT&T and Potomac Electric Power have it.  The Acacia Group, a financial services firm, has offered it to all its employees for three years.  Carol Caruthers, a Price Waterhouse official, says counseling has become "a hot perk" for middle managers.  American Express makes it available to more employees than before.  Lee Hecht Harrison, a placement firm, now provides financial counseling for job-hunting senior executives.  Hadson Corp., an Oklahoma City energy firm, is busy with a health plan, but may consider financial planning.  THE CHECKOFF: Say what?  "In the early 1980s, AT&T implemented a companywide sexual harassment policy as a step toward ensuring a nondiscriminatory workplace," says Catalyst, a women-at-work research group. . . .  The New Jersey labor department says unemployment insurance claimants may file appeals by facsimile machine. . . .  Dual duty: A sign held by a Communications Workers of America picketer against Pacific Bell read "CWA on Strike" on one side, and "Jesus is Lord" on the other.  E.W. Scripps Co. said it ended plans to acquire nine cable-television systems in east Tennessee, including the Knoxville area, for about $100 million.  The reasons weren't disclosed.  The broadcasting company had reached an agreement in principle earlier this month with Intermedia Partners, which has an agreement to purchase these systems, along with others, from Jack Kent Cooke.  James River Corp., Gruppo Ferruzzi of Italy and Buhrmann Tetterode N.V. of the Netherlands said they expect to reach agreement on the sale of Buhrmann-Tetterode's soft-tissue operations to the two other companies.  A price wasn't disclosed.  Buhrmann-Tetterode's tissue units, which do business in the Benelux countries and Britain, generated revenue of about $100 million in 1988.  Buhrmann-Tetterode said it is selling the units, Celtona B.V. and Invercon Papermills Ltd., to concentrate on its core businesses, which include packing material, office supplies and graphic equipment.  The proposed acquisition is part of a strategy by James River, a paper-products concern, to expand its share of the global tissue market, particularly in Europe.  A group including New York-based Steinhardt Partners L.P. said it now holds a 6.9% stake in Eastern Airlines's $3.12 cumulative junior preferred shares outstanding.  Miami-based Eastern Airlines is a separately traded unit of Texas Air Corp.  In an SEC filing, the group said it holds 159,761 shares, including net purchases of 42,000 shares from July 27 to Aug. 2 for $10.80 to $11 a share.  The group also received 9,761 shares representing stock dividends issued by the company.  The group didn't give a reason for raising its Eastern Airlines holdings.  Patricia Diaz Dennis said she plans to leave the Federal Communications Commission Sept. 30 to become a partner and chairwoman of the communications section at Jones, Day, Reavis & Pogue, a Cleveland law firm.  Ms. Dennis, a Democrat, has been a member of the commission since 1986.  Before that, she was a member of the National Labor Relations Board.  Her term at the FCC expired June 30, but she earlier expressed the hope she would be reappointed.  Members may stay on the commission for a period after their terms expire, pending their reappointment or the naming of successors.  Aside from the vacancy being created by Commissioner Dennis's departure, there aren't any openings on the five-member commission.  Last Friday, Alfred Sikes, former head of the Commerce Department's National Telecommunications and Information Administration, was sworn in as FCC chairman.  Two new commissioners, Sherrie Marshall, a Washington lawyer, and Andrew Barrett, an Illinois regulator, were confirmed earlier this month.  Sir James Goldsmith wonders how his $21 billion bid for British American Tobacco Co. (B.A.T) in early July became an issue with the U.S. Congress.  It is, after all, a British firm trying to gain control of another British firm.  Yet over 200 Congresspersons signed a letter asking Secretary of State Baker to communicate their "concerns" to the British government.  Sir James fears that the U.S. political involvement could delay and thus jeopardize his takeover effort, which he is undertaking jointly with financiers Jacob Rothschild and Kerry Packer.  His lawyers advised him initially not to talk to American reporters on grounds that this might attract further interest from U.S. authorities, particularly the Securties and Exchange Commission.  But a few days ago, he agreed to a New York-London telephone conversation, in part to express his exasperation with Congress.  "They've allowed themselves to become a poison pill to protect a British tobacco group from being acquired by another company that wants to deconglomerate it," says Sir James.  "I couldn't believe it when I heard it."  Sir James's aides have little doubt that lobbyists working for BATUS Inc., a B.A.T U.S. subsidiary, engineered the letter.  It came out of the offices of the two senators from Kentucky, a tobacco state where BATUS is headquartered.  Some of the lawmakers who signed probably thought Sir James was after a U.S. company, as indeed he was in 1986 when he unsuccessfully attempted a takeover of Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co.  That attempt also became politicized, in part, Sir James believes, because the Boesky affair had broken about that time and focused public attention on takeovers.  At any rate, the successful effort mounted against him may have done him a big favor.  After the defeat, he sold all of his U.S. holdings with the exception of his forest products enterprise, Crown Zellerbach Corp.  That was just before the 1987 stock crash.  The thing that Sir James finds anomalous about the congressional letter is that his takeover and bust-up of B.A.T could easily result in returning many of its U.S. holdings to U.S. ownership.  He thinks it is highly likely that the retailing holdings, which include Saks Fifth Avenue and Marshall Field, would be picked up by American investors.  Farmers Group, an insurance firm, will be put immediately into the hands of three American trustees and offered for sale.  He says that because of the urgency of that sale it will go to whatever bidder gets to the post first, but that bidder also could turn out to be an American.  About 27% of B.A.T revenues come from its North American holdings.  "They attack us for wanting to buy U.S. assets," says Sir James.  "I'm surprised that it's a crime to want to buy U.S. assets.  But in this particular instance, we are saying B.A.T should deconglomerate.  We are saying these assets should be sold so as to refocus the business.  Obviously among the bidders will be American companies."  This is not the first time Congress has taken an interest in Sir James.  He was called before congressional committees in both 1982 and 1987 to answer questions about his efforts to take over American companies.  At the 1982 hearing, Senator Proxmire asked him if it was not true that he has busted up some of the companies he has taken over.  "I said that is absolutely correct, sir.  And then I gave him all the results and in every example except one the results were sharply higher growth, sharply higher investment, sharply higher employment and sharply higher productivity.  When I gave them that record, Proxmire stopped questioning me."  But he also defends his record as an operator.  He notes that he was involved with the Grand Union supermarket chain for 17 years before selling it in a management buyout two years ago.  "Grand Union is doing fantastically well.  It was a dull, oldline supermarket chain.  We took a major risk nine years ago and started something totally different, putting in fresh fish counters, butchers and the like.  We created a new type of food retailing, which other chains have followed.  Grand Union employment went up sharply.  Management wanted to cash in on that."  Indeed, Sir James believes that conglomeration, not deconglomeration, has been the bane of American industry.  "In the '50s and '60s people who wanted to grow had to aim at diversification because the monopoly laws of the time in your country and elsewhere did not allow integrated acquisitions," he says.  "There was also the financial engineering of the time.  People with high-multiple paper {high stock prices relative to earnings} could buy low-multiple companies and benefit.  So all these conglomerates were created.  Then you had the dull 1970s and by the early '80s, people could see quite clearly that conglomerates had failed.  They could measure the constituent parts of conglomerates with companies in the same industries that were focused companies.  The result was that conglomerates went out of fashion and the result of that was that people came in to bust them up, except for those that had the intelligence to refocus themselves, Paramount being a prime example.  "We have all the academic evidence you could possibly want showing first that the conglomerates failed and second that the pieces that were sold, floated through management buyouts and the rest, have had greater productivity, greater capital investment, greater research and development and greater growth in profit and of course in employment.  The U.S. economy has had high employment, the highest capital investment it has ever had and a good surge in productivity over the last five years.  You had that after the greatest wave of deconglomeration."  Indeed, he argues that in the Goodyear case, the company largely adopted his bust-up plan even though he failed to win control.  "The only thing they didn't do was to sell that ridiculous pipeline they built and they haven't sold that because they never could get the price they kept on saying they could get."  The counterargument offered by corporate managers to all of this is that if a raider can walk away with $93 million in clear profit from a raid or attempted raid, as Sir James did when he sold his Goodyear stock, it surely can't be good for the company.  In some cases that may be true.  Major surgery can work miracles or endanger the life of the patient.  A lot depends on the skill of the surgeon.  Sir James argues that B.A.T, a huge global conglomerate, is badly in need of a bust-up.  Obviously B.A.T management doesn't agree, but that is what B.A.T shareholders will have to decide, assuming that regulatory interventions don't deny them that opportunity.  Which comes back to the congressional letter.  An estimated 4% of B.A.T shares are U.S. held.  "Probably more than 4% of Time Inc. shares are held in Europe but if the Europeans tried to thwart the merger of Time and Warner I could imagine the U.S. outcry."  Britain may react similarly, he believes.  "The British, just like any self-respecting country, believe in their sovereignty.  The British government in my view believes you leave to the marketplace matters that belong in the marketplace."  And maybe especially if it's someone else's marketplace?  Dean Foods Co. said it agreed to acquire closely held Charles F. Cates & Sons Inc. for 865,000 Dean common shares.  The Franklin Park, Ill., food and dairy concern said Cates, a pickle processor based in Faison, N.C., had sales of $84 million in its latest fiscal year and has "excellent brand recognition in the East and Southeast," where Dean's brands currently "are not strong."  Dean's sales for the year ended May 28 totaled $1.68 billion; its pickle operations, which last year had sales of $104 million, will nearly double with the acquisition.  As of Feb. 26, Dean had 26.3 million common shares outstanding.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, the company's stock slipped 25 cents to $34.  At that price, the acquisition would be valued at $29.4 million.  A shareholder group, which holds a 5.1% stake in Indiana Federal Corp., said it plans to explore strategies for obtaining control of the company.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group said it might also seek to influence Indiana Federal's board in formulating policy to maximize shareholder value.  The group includes Alexander Hasenfeld, owner of New York-based Alexander Hasenfeld Inc.; David and Moric Bistricer, both private New York investors; Nachum Stein, vice president of Hasenfeld, Stein Inc.; and Ernest and Thomas Nagy, both Elkhart, Ind., businessmen.  According to the filing, the group holds 139,000 shares of Indiana Federal and may buy or sell additional shares in the open market, in private transaction or otherwise.  Indiana Federal, based in Valparaiso, Ind., is a holding company for Indiana Federal Savings & Loan Association.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Indiana Federal closed at $12, up 25 cents.  Treasury bond prices fell yesterday as investors braced for a large supply of new notes and bills to be auctioned this week by the government.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond, which was up as much as 5/8 point in early trading, ended more than 1/4 point lower, or down more than $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield rose to 8.18% from 8.15%.  Corporate, municipal and mortgage-backed bonds ended unchanged to as much as 3/8 point lower.  Today, the Treasury will sell $9.5 billion of two-year notes, followed by $7.75 billion of five-year notes tomorrow and $9.25 billion of one-year Treasury bills on Thursday.  The Treasury sold $14.4 billion of three-month and six-month bills yesterday at its regular weekly auction.  In when-issued trading yesterday, the new two-year notes were quoted at a price to yield 8.28%, and the five-year notes were quoted at 8.20%.  In addition to the prospects of added supply, traders said Treasury bonds were hurt by rumors that Gibraltar Savings sold nearly $900 million of mortgage-backed securities.  The California-based thrift, which was seized by regulators in late March, has been liquidating its mortgage portfolio all summer.  So far, it has sold more than $3 billion of its $4 billion-plus portfolio.  In addition to Gibraltar, there were rumors that several other thrifts were selling as much as $1 billion of mortgage securities.  One seller mentioned by traders was New West Federal Savings & Loan Association, a so-called bad bank that was established to hold the troubled assets of American Savings & Loan Association.  Before its liquidation program began about a month ago, New West's mortgage portfolio was estimated at $13 billion and was considered the largest in the thrift industry.  In early trading, bond prices were bolstered by strong buying overseas, especially in Japan.  But later in the day, prices tumbled as news spread that a thrift was "entering the market as a major seller of mortgage-backed paper," said William Sullivan, director of money market research at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  The activity in the mortgage market had a big impact on Treasurys largely because of the lack of participants.  Trading was very light ahead of yesterday's auction as many money managers, concerned about the economy and the future of interest rates, steered clear of the market.  Michael Moran, manager of government trading at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., said yesterday's trading activity "was among the lightest we've seen this year."  The month of August is often a slow period for trading because many investors are away on vacation.  But Mr. Moran said trading in the past few weeks has been weighed down by new supply and recent doubts about the economy.  In the past two weeks, for example, the government has auctioned about $70 billion of new bills, notes and bonds, a portion of which went to finance the savings and loan bailout.  "Investors are uncertain about the immediate course of interest rates and don't want to commit new money before they get more information" about where the economy is heading, said Mr. Moran.  Among other things, investors are waiting to see what the Federal Reserve has in store.  Although most economists contend that the Fed's Federal Open Market Committee will vote to hold monetary policy steady when it meets today, in the long-term many economists remain convinced that rates will slowly move lower.  Other investors will closely scrutinize government economic reports.  Today, the Department of Commerce will release the durable goods report for July.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, that orders for durable goods in July remained at their $124.19 billion June level.  The forecasts of the 13 economists surveyed range from two calls for a 1.5% drop in new orders to one estimate of a 1% rise.  In June, durable goods orders increased 0.4% after sinking 4.4% in May.  Treasury Securities  Treasury prices, which were up as much as 5/8 point in early trading, ended between 1/32 and 10/32 lower.  The price of the benchmark 30-year was quoted late at a price of 99 9/32, compared with 99 19/32 Friday.  Among shorter-term issues, the latest 10-year notes were quoted at 98 20/32 to yield 8.185%, compared with 98 27/32 to yield 8.153%  Short-term interest rates were mixed at the government's weekly Treasury bill auction yesterday, compared with last week's auction.  The average discount rate on new three-month Treasury bills fell to 7.99% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.27%, compared with last week's average rate of 8.01% to yield 8.29%.  The average discount rate on new six-month Treasury bills rose to 7.85% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.29%, compared with an average rate of 7.83% and yield of 8.26% last week.  The average rate on three-month bills was the lowest since 7.94% at the auction on Aug. 7, and the six-month bill's rate was the highest since the average of 8.08% at the auction on June 19.  Here are auction details:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon-equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @Applications ............ $21,693,695,000 $24,020,385,000  @Accepted bids ........... $7,202,095,000 $7,208,935,000  @Accepted at low price.... 98% 86%  @Accepted noncompet'ly ... $1,161,290,000 $1,151,040,000  @Average price (Rate) .... 97.958 (7.99%) 96.031 (7.85%)  @High price (Rate) ....... 97.973 (7.93%) 96.042 (7.83%)  @Low price (Rate) ........ 97.956 (8.00%) 96.026 (7.86%)  @Coupon equivalent ....... 8.27% 8.29%  Both issues are dated Aug. 24.  The 13-week bills mature Nov. 24, and the 26-week bills mature Feb. 22, 1990.  Foreign Bonds  Credit Lyonnais Securities became the eighth firm to halt market-making in British government bonds recently, and the second to do so in less than a week.  Despite the pullback, analysts say the British bond market remains plagued by too many market makers, too few investors and a lack of new issuance.  Instead of issuing new bonds, the government is using its large budget surplus to buy back bonds outstanding.  Traders say that limits price movements, discourages trading and deprives market makers of a key source of revenue.  Last week, Merrill Lynch & Co. announced it would no longer make a market in gilts.  Credit Lyonnais's announcement didn't affect trading much yesterday.  Britain's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 1/32 to 116 5/32 to yield 9.57%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 2/32 to 100 5/32 to yield 11.56%.  In the Eurobond market yesterday, the Soviet Bank for Foreign Economic Affairs received formal approval to become the first foreign borrower to tap the newly liberalized Austrian capital market.  The Soviet bank, known as Vnesheconombank, will issue one billion Austrian schillings ($72.6 million) in bonds targeted largely at Austrian retail investors.  Creditanstalt of Vienna is lead manager for the issue, which was priced to yield 8%.  Comanagers include several foreign and Austrian banks including Chase Manhattan Bank (Austria) and Citibank (Austria).  The issue is part of the Soviet Union's increasing forays into Western Europe's capital markets.  In January 1988, Vnesheconombank became the first Soviet institution to issue bonds since the 1917 Russian Revolution when it tapped the Swiss market.  So far this year, it has issued bonds in West Germany and Italy and borrowed through a syndicated loan in Switzerland.  West German government bond prices ended little changed from Friday.  Bonn's 6 3/4% bonds due June 1999 ended at a price of 99.90, unchanged, to yield 6.79%.  The 6 3/4% notes due 1994 were 0.03 point lower to close at 99.78 to yield 6.80%.  Japanese government bond prices ended a bit firmer despite dipping in the afternoon as the market grew leery as the yield on the benchmark bond approached 5%.  The No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended at a price of 97.37 to yield 5.30%.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were unchanged to 3/8 point lower.  Traders said there was little impact from the news that Washington Public Power Supply System's proposed $450 million refunding has been postponed.  The issue was scheduled to be priced today through a group led by Goldman, Sachs & Co. WPPSS said it will announce today when the sale will occur.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was quoted at 97 5/8, down 3/8 point for the day and off an early peak of 98 1/4 bid.  The bonds were yielding about 7.38%, up slightly from Friday.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended the day about 1/4 to 3/8 point lower.  Among new issues, Sonat Inc., an energy and energy-services holding company, offered investors $100 million of 10-year debentures priced to yield 9.57%.  Wang Laboratories Inc.'s convertible subordinated debentures ended the session higher despite a rating downgrade by Moody's Investors Service Inc.  The 7 3/4% convertibles due 2008 closed two points higher, or up $20 for each $1,000 face amount, after pulling back from a three-point gain earlier in the day.  The closing price was about 51.  The 9% convertibles due 2009 closed at 58, a gain of 1 1/2 point.  This issue had been 1 3/4 point higher on the day prior to the rating downgrade.  Traders say the Wang issues gained because the rating downgrade was overshadowed by news early in the session that Wang had been able to negotiate a new credit agreement with its banks and obtain $100 million in new financing.  Last Wednesday, the bonds tumbled more than four points on news that Wang was unable to meet interest payments on nearly $1 billion of bank debt.  Since Wang announced a loss of more than $400 million for the year ended June 30, traders said its bonds have fallen about 15 points.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities ended 5/32 lower after giving up gains of as much as 1/4 point after the rumored Gibraltar sale.  Market sources said Gibraltar sold nearly $900 million of Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities.  Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. was the rumored winner of the securities, but officials at the firm refused to comment.  The market view that Prudential-Bache won the Gibraltar block was bolstered when the firm underwrote a $500 million Freddie Mac real estate mortgage investment conduit offering late in the afternoon.  Market talk was that Gibraltar got a good price.  The price for Freddie Mac 9% securities was 96 7/32 at the time of the sale, but the winning bid is rumored to have been as high as 96 13/32.  Freddie Mac 9% securities finished at 95 30/32, down 5/32, and Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities also ended at 95 30/32, down 5/32.  In the derivative market, the Veterans Administration sold $365 million of "Vendee" mortgages in a three-tiered Remic trust through Goldman Sachs and First Boston Corp. Vendee loans are made by the VA to new buyers of homes taken by the VA after foreclosures on VA-backed loans.  ART  Museum of the City of New York: "Window on Wonder City: New York in the World's Fair Era" -- Drawings, watercolors, oils and portrait sculpture offer a visual overview of New York City history from the stock market crash of 1929 through the end of World War II. Artists include Ben Shahn, Reginald Marsh and John Sloan.  Fifth Avenue at 103rd Street, Manhattan, Aug. 29-Jan. 14.  Chrysler Museum, Norfolk, Va.: "Thomas Hart Benton: Paintings in the Collection of the U.S. Navy" -- Twenty-five paintings and works on paper, on loan from the Navy Art Collection of the Naval Historical Center in Washington, commemorate the 100th anniversary of the birth of the artist.  They include the depiction of various phases of ship construction and life at sea aboard the submarine U.S.S. Dorado shortly before it and its crew were lost at sea in 1943.  Olney Road & Mowbray Arch, through Sept. 3.  Walters Art Gallery, Baltimore: "Cartier Masterworks From the George and Frayda Lindemann Collection" -- More than 70 objects -- jewelry, clocks, picture frames, handbags and other objets d'art -- many from the golden era (circa 1919-1939) of the famous firm. 600 North Charles St., Aug. 27-Oct. 15.  Indianapolis Museum of Art: "African Improvisation: Textiles From the Collection" -- Almost 30 fabrics -- mostly traditional dress items -- from West, Central and North Africa, incorporating a variety of loom, embroidery and dyeing techniques. 1200 West 38th St., Sept. 3-Nov. 12.  DANCE  New York City Ballet tours Europe for four weeks beginning Aug. 29.  The troupe will perform 19 ballets in repertory, including five never before danced on the Continent -- "Antique Epigraphs," "Beethoven Romance," "Ecstatic Orange," "Sophisticated Lady" and "The Waltz Project."  Venues are: Copenhagen, Tivoli Koncert Hall, Aug. 29-Sept. 3; Glasgow, Theatre Royal, Sept. 6-Sept. 10; the Hague, the Netherlands Dance Theater (as part of the Holland Dance Festival), Sept. 13-17; and Paris, Theatre des Champs-Elysees (as part of the Festival International de Danse), Sept. 19-24.  MUSIC  New York Philharmonic, under the direction of music director Zubin Mehta, kicks off a 15-concert tour of eight Asian cities with an outdoor public concert in Singapore, followed by a concert in that city's Victoria Hall.  The group then heads to Bangkok, where it will be the first major orchestra to perform in the new Thailand Cultural Center (proceeds from this concert will go to the Thai Red Cross).  The tour -- sponsored by Citicorp/Citibank -- continues with performances at Hong Kong's Shatin Town Hall; Tokyo's Suntory Hall; Taipei's National Theatre; and the new Seoul Arts Center, part of the complex built for the 1988 Olympic Games.  Ray Charles: When Brother Ray hits the road Jack, he really hits it.  His crowded calendar includes: Louisville (Kentucky State Fair), Aug. 23; Waterville, N.H. (Waterville Valley Amphitheater), Aug. 26; Lewiston, Me. (Lakeside Center), Aug. 27; Lenox, Mass. (Tanglewood), Sept. 1; Mansfield, Mass. (Great Woods), Sept. 2; Catskill, N.Y. (The Palace Theater), Sept. 3; Cleveland, Ohio (North Coast Harbor), Sept. 9; Minneapolis, Minn. (Orpheum Theatre), Sept. 15; Madison, Wis. (Civic Center), Sept. 16; Atlantic City, N.J. (TropWorld Showroom), Sept. 21; Thermal, Calif. (Thermal Airport Hangar), Sept. 28; Huntsville, Ala. (Von Braun Civic Center), Oct. 4; Miami (Gusman Cultural Center), Oct. 14; Orlando, Fla. (Marriott Orlando World Center), Oct. 15; Stamford, Ct. (Palace Theater), Oct. 26; Washington, D.C. (Constitution Hall), Oct. 28; Manhattan (Marriott Marquis), Oct. 29; San Francisco (Masonic Auditorium), Dec. 15; Los Angeles (Dorothy Chandler Pavilion), Feb. 10, 1990.  Rolling Stones: Mick, Keith and the gang kick off their first tour since '81.  At press time, tickets were still available for the following shows -- Pittsburgh (Three Rivers Stadium), Sept. 6; East Troy, Wis. (Alpine Valley), Sept. 8, 11; St. Louis (Busch Stadium), Sept. 17; Louisville, Ky. (Cardinal Stadium), Sept. 19; Syracuse, N.Y. (Carrier Dome), Sept. 21; Washington, D.C. (R.F.K.  Stadium), Sept. 24, 25; Cleveland (Municipal Stadium), Sept. 27; Jacksonville, Fla. (Gator Bowl), Nov. 25.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Sonat Inc. -- $100 million of 9 1/2% debentures due Aug. 15, 1999, priced at 99.55 to yield 9.57%.  Rated Baa-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue was sold through underwriters led by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  The issue is all sold.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 11 classes by Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  For classes on which details are available from the underwriter, yields range from 9.10%, a spread of 90 basis points over three-year Treasurys, to 10.43%, a spread of 220 basis points over 20-year Treasurys.  The offering, Series 86, is backed by Freddie Mac 9% securities.  Separately, $400 million of Remic mortgage securities was offered in 10 classes by Bear, Stearns & Co.  The offering, Series 85, is backed by Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities.  Yields range from 9.12%, a spread of 95 basis points over four-year Treasury securities, to 10.51%, a spread of 235 basis points over 30-year Treasurys.  Veterans Administration -- nearly $365 million of "Vendee" mortgages in a three-tiered trust through Goldman Sachs and First Boston Corp. Vendee loans are made by the VA to buyers of homes on which the VA has taken possession after foreclosures on VA-backed loans.  The VA loan program is designed to facilitate the sale of foreclosed houses owned by the VA.  Many of the VA Vendee loans are in depressed economic areas.  There are three classes of securities.  There is a senior class, intermediate class and subordinated class.  The subordinated class, totaling $117 million, or 32% of the deal, supports both the senior and intermediate classes.  The senior class has triple-A ratings from both Moody's and S&P.  Yields on the senior class range from 9.59%, a spread of 135 basis points over two-year Treasurys, to 10.11%, a spread of 195 basis points over 10-year Treasurys.  The intermediate class, which is subordinate to the senior class, but is supported by the subordinated class, totals $72.9 million, and was priced with a 9.55% coupon at 88.2568 to yield 11.22%, 295 basis points above the Treasury 20-year bond.  The intermediate class has an estimated average life of 19.3 years and a final possible maturity date of Sept. 25, 2020.  This class has ratings of single-A-3 from Moody's and single-A-minus from S&P.  The subordinated class is being retained by the VA.  The offering uses a Remic structure.  @ EUROBONDS  National Westminster Bank PLC (U.K.) -- $300 million of undated, subordinated variable-rate notes paying an initial margin of four-month London interbank offered rate plus 0.35 and priced at par, via Salomon Brothers International.  Puttable when the spread is reset every three months, unless the issuer and the lead manager fail to agree on a new margin, in which case there is a fall-back rate of three-month Libor plus 0.80 for the first 10 years, and Libor plus 1.20 thereafter.  Fees undisclosed.  Abbey National Second Capital BV (U.K. parent) -- 100 million New Zealand dollars of zero-coupon bonds due Oct. 4, 1996, priced at 45.20 to yield 12.5% less full fees, via Westpac Banking Corp. Guaranteed by Abbey National PLC. Fees 1 3/8.  South Australia Government Financing Authority -- 75 million Australian dollars of 14 1/2% bonds due Sept. 21, 1994, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 14.61% after full fees, via Hambros Bank Ltd. Fees 2.  Kansallis-Osake-Pankki (Finland) -- 300 million Swedish kroner of 11 1/8% bonds due Aug. 31, 1994, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 11.26% less full fees, via Kansallis-Osake-Pankki.  Fees 1 7/8.  Queensland Treasury Corp. (Australia) -- 15 billion yen of 5.3% bonds due Sept. 14, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 5.3% less full fees, via IBJ International.  Guaranteed by the treasurer on behalf of the government of Queensland.  Fees 1 7/8.  Toyo Menka Finance B.V. (Japanese parent) -- $50 million of zero-coupon bonds due Aug. 31, 1993, priced at 73.25 to yield 8.09% before fees, via Nikko Securities Co. (Europe).  Guaranteed by Mitsui Trust.  Finnair, the national airline of Finland, converted three options on McDonnell Douglas Corp. MD-80 jets to firm orders, valued at about $92 million, and added three more options earlier this month.  Finnair's orders and commitments now total seven firm orders and three options, and the airline now operates 10 MD-80s.  The first jet is scheduled to be delivered in September 1991.  "Nothing in this world is certain but death and taxes" was true when Benjamin Franklin said it 200 years ago.  But for too many businesses these days, one more certainly exists: If they are involved in any kind of dispute, even one involving tax claims, they may be labeled "racketeers" and dragged into federal court like career criminals to defend themselves and their reputations.  As a former prosecuting attorney, I welcomed the latitude Congress gave federal prosecutors in 1970 through the criminal provisions of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act (RICO) to go after white-collar criminals and organized crime.  But three years ago I discovered that this same law had revolutionized civil litigation and, in so doing, created a dangerous situation for legitimate businessmen and women.  I had become involved as a defending attorney in the case of a family-owned marina in western Michigan.  The state of Michigan prosecuted the marina and four of its salesmen for failing to collect sales taxes, over a three-year period, on eight expensive boats that allegedly were misreported as "sales for resale" or "interstate commerce" -- sales on which buyers are not required to pay state sales taxes.  The Michigan attorney general's office contended that the salesmen misrepresented the type of sales to gain a price advantage over competitors.  A jury determined that all of the salesmen were not guilty, but it convicted the corporation on five counts, and the maximum fine of $25,000 was imposed.  The case shocked the owners of the marina, the second largest in Michigan.  Since its founding more than 30 years ago by a husband-wife team, the marina had enjoyed an excellent reputation.  The husband and wife still owned part of the stock in the marina; the remainder was owned by their two sons.  Then came an even more devastating blow.  No sooner had the dust settled, when the Michigan Department of Revenue accused the owners and salesmen of being racketeers, as defined under the civil provisions of RICO.  They were charged with filing false sales tax returns and dragged into federal court, where the state demanded that RICO's treble damages and attorneys' fees be assessed against them.  Such a suit seemed impossible to me.  Then I read the case of Department of Revenue v.  Phillips, in which the federal Seventh Circuit Court of Appeals had reluctantly reinstated the state of Illinois's civil RICO case against the defendant, who was charged with filing false monthly sales tax returns.  The court took "solace in the fact that the Illinois Department of Revenue promised in oral argument that such tax collection cases will be few."  However, the judges were skeptical.  They added, "We doubt, once the cause of action is established, that this will be true."  The Seventh Circuit went on to make a fervent plea to federal lawmakers, similar to that offered by the U.S. Supreme Court in its recent decision, H.J., Inc. v.  Northwestern Bell Telephone Co.  The court of appeals wrote, "We can only hope that this decision appears to Congress as the distress flag that it is, and that Congress will act to limit, as only it is empowered to, the statute's application to cases such as the one before us now."  Thus far Congress has ignored such entreaties.  Fortunately for my clients, however, the state of Michigan voluntarily dismissed its RICO action against the marina after determining that it could not prove the case.  Because the individual employees had been acquitted and only the marina had been convicted of any wrongdoing, the state could not, under case law, obtain judgment against the enterprise.  Nonetheless, the marina owners suffered considerable public embarrassment and humiliation at being linked in the reporting media to organized crime, as was charged in the RICO complaint.  They are still struggling to recover their good name.  Next, Michigan's Revenue Division tried the same tactic against a service station operator and his two stations.  This time, a federal judge, Robert E. DeMascio, ruled that the state was improperly trying to use the federal courts to collect taxes and obtain a penalty far greater than anything authorized by the legislature.  Judge DeMascio wisely determined that RICO should not be stretched "so far as to encompass a sovereign's attempt to prosecute its own citizens in a federal forum for state sales tax violations."  He also noted that the Illinois district court (whose decision was overturned reluctantly by the Seventh Circuit), had refused to allow officials in that state to bring a civil RICO action against an alleged sales tax violator.  The lower court had reasoned that "RICO should not become a vehicle for federal jurisdiction and damages in state sales tax cases."  Judge DeMascio predicted that if state revenue departments are allowed to pursue such tactics, "federal courts would be barraged with state agencies' vindictive civil RICO actions against tax cheaters" and would seek sanctions that state laws do not allow.  In other words, if the duly elected lawmakers in Michigan or any other state do not think it necessary or wise automatically to triple the recovery of unpaid taxes or enact a state version of civil RICO, why should they be allowed to seek such remedies in the overcrowded federal courts?  The federal courts never were designed to act as collection agencies for state and local taxes, yet, unless changes are made in the existing civil provisions of RICO, that is exactly what they will become.  In fact, not only state governments but local entities as well are lining up to recover trebled local taxes that allegedly have been reduced because of bribes and gratuities to local officials.  Meanwhile, civil RICO continues to attract plaintiffs who want to turn general business disputes that belong in state courts into federal offenses.  For example, a small consortium of contractors who consulted me had submitted the low bid for a large marina to be constructed on Lake Michigan.  The second-lowest bidder recently filed a civil RICO action, claiming that misrepresentations were made by the successful bidders using the telephone, thereby committing federal wire fraud.  No matter what the determination of the suit, the low bidders already have felt the sting of such poisonous words as "racketeer."  Congress cannot undo the devastation that too many legitimate businessmen and women already have suffered from RICO.  But it can prevent the unjust labeling of honest, reputable companies -- by state and local governments as well as by their private competitors -- if it finally limits the vast sweep of civil RICO.  The time to reform the law is now.  ---  Mr. Sawyer was a member of the House Judiciary Committee until leaving Congress in 1985.  He practices law in Grand Rapids, Mich.  The Philadelphia and American stock exchanges are shutting down trading -- perhaps permanently -- in their new stock "basket" products.  Stung by a federal appeals court ruling that has broad implications, the exchanges were forced to disallow any new trading in the products.  Investors have at least until Sept. 8 to liquidate their current positions.  The appeals court in Chicago ruled that the Securities and Exchange Commission shouldn't have approved the products of the Philadelphia and American exchanges, as well as of the Chicago Board Options Exchange.  That's because, the court said, the products by law are properly regulated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.  Important issues are at stake for the stock and futures markets.  The new products themselves -- "index participations" that enable an investor to trade a broad cross-section of the stock market -- haven't been blockbusters in their short three months of existence.  But they have stirred plenty of controversy as to whether the products should be treated as stocks, futures or something else.  This has led to a bitter turf battle between the SEC, which in March approved the products, and the CFTC, which argues that the products should come under its jurisdiction.  The Philadelphia exchange vowed it will resurrect its product if it can, possibly after appealing to the U.S. Supreme Court.  But traders and brokerage firm executives said, after conversations with American Stock Exchange officials, that it appears the Amex's product most likely will be discontinued.  "We are viewing it as 'on hold' at this point," said Kenneth Liebler, Amex president. a  The court ruling didn't have a direct impact on the Chicago Board Options Exchange.  The SEC approved that exchange's new basket product along with those of the other two exchanges in March.  But the CBOE isn't yet trading the product and "won't be until the lawsuits are resolved," said Alger "Duke" Chapman, CBOE chairman.  Also, the ruling shouldn't hamper the New York Stock Exchange's proposed Exchange Stock Portfolio basket product, which is awaiting SEC approval.  The Chicago Board of Trade and other futures-industry officials who brought the case against the Philadelphia and American exchanges say they have no problem with the Big Board's product because it's clearly not a futures instrument.  "We don't anticipate {the appeals-court ruling} impacting our product," said a Big Board spokeswoman.  Investors in the Philadelphia and American exchanges' products are able to trade such broad indexes as Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, taking profits or losses in cash based on the overall performance of the index while never actually owning the underlying stocks.  In contrast, the Big Board's products calls for ownership of the actual S&P 500 stocks.  Nicholas Giordano, Philadelphia exchange president, has been a vocal champion of index participations, even accusing the American exchange of stealing his exchange's idea for the product.  Yesterday, Mr. Giordano didn't mask his bitterness.  "Something is drastically wrong with the laws in this country that affect securities and commodity trading," he said.  "If products like this automatically default to commodities regulators, then this is an unfortunate scenario for our entire industry."  Wayne Luthringshausen, chairman and chief executive officer of Options Clearing Corp. in Chicago, which is in charge of clearing transactions in the Philadelphia and American exchange products and has been at the forefront of the legal battle to support them, called the appeals ruling "outrageous."  "I think all the securities markets have to be concerned about the prospects of creating any type of product that isn't a plain vanilla security," said Mr. Luthringshausen.  "If it smacks of being a future, that means it is CFTC-regulated," he complained.  SEC officials say they still think the new products are securities, rather than futures products.  SEC Commissioner Joseph Grundfest said the appeals-court decision has implications for "innovation and progress in America's financial markets."  Other SEC officials warned privately of dire consequences if the futures industry gets a monopoly on regulating any new product with futures-like characteristics.  A spokesman for the House finance subcommittee, headed by Rep. Edward J. Markey (D., Mass.), said the court decision "illuminates the problems" of having regulators battling over turf.  "The arcane system of dual regulation does not reflect the realities of the modern market," he said.  Rep. Markey thinks the SEC should regulate index participations.  As the CFTC and the Chicago futures exchanges see it, they're simply trying to protect a right to run their own industry.  A CFTC spokeswoman said the Philadelphia and American exchanges can simply ask her agency rather than the SEC for approval, and the CFTC would be "pleased" to issue a ruling.  Not surprisingly, the Board of Trade's chairman, Karsten Mahlmann, praised the appeals-court ruling as reaffirming the "exclusive jurisdiction of our regulator, the CFTC," over futures-like products.  Supporters of the SEC and the stock exchanges say the issue either will be decided in the Supreme Court, or in Congress.  The appeals court in Chicago, while siding with the futures industry, conceded that its interpretation of current law "gives the futures markets the opportunity to block competition from an innovative financial product."  Said Michael Schwartz, a top options official at Oppenheimer & Co. who has worked with the Amex on its product: "The CFTC won (in the court ruling), but the public lost."  ---  @ 'Basket' Products  The four major exchanges that have devised index-participation, or basket products.  New York Stock Exchange  Exchange Stock Portfolios would allow investors to buy and sell, in $5 million blocks, all the stocks in the S&P 500 index (including the 38 S&P stocks not traded on the Big Board).  Awaiting SEC approval.  Philadelphia Stock Exchange  Cash Index Participations on S&P 500 stocks in the S&P 500 stocks began trading May 12.  Exchange yesterday suspended trading, except to liquidate current positions.  American Stock Exchange  Equity Index Participations, similar to the Philadelphia exchange's CIPs on the S&P 500, also began trading May 12.  Exchange has suspended trading, except to liquidate current positions, and isn't expected to resume.  Chicago Board Options Exchange  Value of Index Participations, or VIPs, approved by SEC in March, but never began trading.  The Supreme Court's recent decisions making it tougher for plaintiffs to win job-discrimination claims have already derailed numerous pending cases and made lawyers reluctant to bring new suits, according to top civil-rights lawyers.  About 80 of the nation's leading civil-rights attorneys and constitutional scholars huddled last week for a private two-day strategy session at the New York headquarters of the NAACP Legal Defense and Educational Fund Inc.  They shared a bleak assessment of the court's recent string of cases rewriting civil-rights law covering job suits.  Barbara Arnwine, executive director of the Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights, reported that her computer search had turned up 13 recent federal cases in which plaintiffs claimed that they had been targets of racial harassment by their employers.  Next to each case, there was a single word: Dismissed.  The cases had all been dismissed by lower courts, she said, after the Supreme Court held last term, in Patterson vs.  McLean Credit Union, that an 1866 civil rights law granting blacks equal rights to make and enforce contracts doesn't cover racial harassment on the job.  Racial harassment involves verbal abuse and other overt mistreatment.  Ms. Arnwine contends the 13 dismissed cases are proof that the Supreme Court's ruling has already taken a heavy toll on plaintiffs alleging racial harassment on the job.  While plaintiffs can still bring harassment claims under Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act, they can't win punitive damages for such claims, she noted.  The result, she said, is a much more profound impact on civil-rights litigation than supporters of the Patterson decision had predicted.  "There are a number of cases that provide a remedy under Title VII for race harassment," said Catherine Hagen, a labor partner at the Los Angeles law firm of O'Melveny & Myers, which represents employers.  "But there are time limits in which you have to file.  You are not allowed punitive damages, but you are allowed to get back pay and an injunction.  From the employers' standpoint, that is a very helpful decision."  The civil rights litigators also criticized Supreme Court decisions that make it more difficult to bring suits based on statistical evidence of racial discrimination and that ease the way for reverse-discrimination suits by whites.  Regarding reverse discrimination claims, said Eric Schnapper, the legal defense fund's assistant counsel, "Now employers face a Hobson's choice: If they decide not to settle (the initial discrimination claim) and lose, they pay; If they settle, they're still opened to years of litigation brought by white employees."  Agreeing, Ms. Hagen said: "That is a problem for employers.  Many employers will be much more reluctant to enter consent decrees now that threat is out there."  As a result of the decisions, civil-rights lawyers are turning away clients because many job-discrimination claims are viewed as too costly to litigate and almost impossible to win, the lawyers said.  Some of the lawyers predicted that these decisions -- combined with the increased difficulty of getting courts to require defendants to pay attorney's fees and the tendency of some judges to dismiss novel claims as frivolous -- will lead to a thinning of the ranks of civil-rights lawyers.  Under the new Supreme Court rulings, "It's difficult to bring a case; far more difficult to settle a case; difficult to decide to settle a case," said Mr. Schnapper.  "It's hard to think of an aspect of civil rights practice that is not in turmoil."  Among the legal heavyweights at the session were William T. Coleman Jr., former Secretary of Transportation under President Gerald Ford, Harvard Law School professor Laurence Tribe, and Julius Chambers, the legal defense fund's executive counsel.  Lawyers who attended the meeting said no specific strategy was developed during the conference.  But a consensus was reached that the civil-rights lawyers and scholars must wage a battle on three fronts: in Congress, in the lower courts, and in the public's mind.  They also pointed out that laws in an estimated 20 states may provide more favorable alternatives for plaintiffs than federal statutes.  Richard Seymour, director of the Lawyers' Committee's employment-discrimination project, said many are banking on legislation filed by Senator Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio), the Fair Employment Reinstatement Act, to reverse the impact of the court's decision that shifted the burden of proof from the employer to the employee and required plaintiffs to show the cause and effect of each specific allegation of job discrimination.  The lawyers also hope that Congress will pass legislation to restore the contract rights the Patterson decision took away.  "Everyone would say racial harassment is bad . . . and there should be damages," Yale Law School professor Paul Gewitz said.  "That's a principle that's easy to support."  The impact of the Patterson decision goes beyond the elimination of monetary damages for plaintiffs alleging racial harassment on the job, the lawyers said.  Early this month, the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of Texas ruled that job termination isn't covered by the federal law protecting blacks' contract rights, Ms. Arnwine said.  And, she pointed out, the Supreme Court failed to clarify whether federal law covers demotions and dismissals in retaliation for the filing of discrimination suits.  Ms. Arnwine said she anticipates she'll be battling in the lower courts to settle those issues.  Japan became the world's richest nation on paper in 1987, surpassing the U.S. for the first time with $43.7 trillion in national assets, an economic newspaper reported.  The value of Japan's assets jumped sharply from $28.3 trillion in 1986, said the Nihon Keizai Shimbun, quoting figures from Japan's Economic Planning Agency.  In 1985, Japan's assets were $19.6 trillion, $11 trillion behind those of the U.S., the paper reported.  According to U.S. Federal Reserve Board figures, the U.S. had some $30.6 trillion in assets at the end of 1985, $34 trillion in 1986 and $36.2 trillion in 1987, the newspaper said.  The newspaper said the statistics at the end of 1987 were the latest available from the two countries.  National assets are the total value of financial assets such as stocks and deposits and insurance, and actual assets such as production facilities, housing, land and inventories.  Tokyo stocks closed firmer in thin trading, with the Nikkei 225-stock average moving up to another record close.  In London, share prices overall ended slightly weaker despite continued gains by drug company Wellcome on the strength of last week's U.S. medical report that its AZT drug is safer and more effective against acquired immune deficiency syndrome than previously thought.  The Nikkei index gained 77.69 to 35140.83, putting it more than 50 points above the old record set Thursday.  The index slipped 26.97 points Friday.  In early trading Tuesday, there was little buying activity and the Nikkei index was down 31.27 points at 35109.56.  On Monday, volume on the First Section was estimated at 450 million shares, compared with 456 million Friday.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 491-383, while 226 issues were unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 0.46 points Friday, was up 6.58, or 0.25%, at 2659.08.  Sony ended lower in heavy trading after touching a record high, in what traders said was a demonstration of the market's continued interest in high-priced smaller issues.  Investors tended to stay away from large-capitalization stocks, which require large amounts of buying to push up share prices, traders said.  Sony reached a high of 9,000 yen ($63.11) a share in the morning but fell back to end at 8,800, down 90, as investors took profits.  Sony was being sought in anticipation of strong fiscal-year results due Thursday, traders said.  In addition, a market analyst for Yamaichi Securities said, many expect Sony to reach 10,000 yen a share, and anticipation of this goal helped generate buying.  Yesterday's market gain was partly due to index-related buying and doesn't necessarily mean the market is headed for substantial gains, some traders said.  But Takamori Matsuda, a senior manager of research at Dresdner-ABD Securities, said the inflow of investment trust fund money suggests the market environment is strong.  He said the relative stability in currency markets is also helpful.  "Over the weekend, market participants had been anticipating a further slide for the yen against the dollar," he said, "so when they saw the dollar stayed at the 143 yen level Monday morning, they were relieved."  These external factors have been helping the market edge up, Mr. Matsuda said, despite its lack of energy as demonstrated by the low volume of recent sessions.  Traders said they expect to see an end to the doldrums and better volume soon with the return of many investors from their summer holidays.  High-priced stocks were strong yesterday morning but gave up some of their gains toward the close on profit-taking.  Orix gained 110 to 5,300, Seven-Eleven was up 110 at 7,700, Pioneer ended at 4,390, up 20, and Kyocera rose 30 to 6,490.  Monday's gainers included petroleum products.  Nippon Oil was up 10 at 1,480, Showa Shell gained 50 to 1,440, and Mitsubishi Oil was up 20 to 1,180.  One trader said a major brokerage firm bought housing-related issues to try to establish them as a "pillar of the market" but said the effort failed to win support from other investors or brokers.  Financial issues were firmer.  Mitsubishi Bank was up 30 at 3,300, Sumitomo Bank gained 40 to 3,890, and Nomura Securities rose 30 to 3,370.  Pharmaceuticals ended mixed, and transportation issues generally eased.  In London, the market started out stronger, but an early round of futures-led selling and a weak opening on Wall Street soon put it into reverse.  Low volume meant that trading between market makers had an exaggerated impact, dealers said.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed 0.4 points weaker at 2374.7 after reaching an intraday high of 2383.8.  The Financial Times 30-share index fell 10.0 to 1969.0.  Volume fell to 349.7 million shares from 378.4 million Friday.  "There is a stalemate between buyers and sellers at the moment," one trader said.  "The market's looking for fresh inspiration to move decisively one way or the other."  Prices were again supported by Wellcome, which rose 56 pence to close at 729 pence ($11.42) a share on 7.8 million shares.  The stock was driven both by the AIDS report and by rumors that ICI is considering a bid for the company.  B.A.T rallied 20 to 833 after reporting a 20% gain in interim pretax profit and issuing a fierce defense against Hoylake Investment's hostile #13.4 billion bid for the company.  Traders said B.A.T was also buoyed by weekend news reports that the company will split up its tobacco and insurance interests even if the Hoylake bid fails.  The market gained strength from news early in the day of a #484 million bid by Norton Opax for rival U.K. specialty printing concern De La Rue.  De La Rue gained 28 to 366, while Norton Opax fell 4 to 155.  Midland Bank rallied 11 to 373 as players compared its performance and potential.  "It has underperformed the market over the last three months and is now catching up," one dealer said.  The pharmaceutical sector was buoyed by news that Japan's Fujisawa Pharmaceutical launched a $31-a-share billion bid for the portion of Lyphomed it doesn't already own.  Fisons firmed 11 to 356, Glaxo rose 6 to #15.33, and ICI climbed 18 to #12.87.  Plessey also released its defense document against a #2.04 billion by General Electric of Britain and Siemens.  Plessey repeated its argument that the offer is too low and that its growth prospects remain strong.  Plessey ended unchanged at 266, while GEC shed 1 to 266.  In Belgium, steel maker Cockerill Sambre led the Brussels stock market to its 13th consecutive record as its share price soared 20% in hectic trading.  The stock closed at 510 Belgian francs ($12.47) a share, up 84, even though the 98.2% state-owned company plans to issue 35 million shares at an indicated price of only 210 francs a share.  The Brussels stock index rose 49.92 to 6483.89.  In other European markets, prices closed higher in Frankfurt, Zurich and Milan, lower in Paris and Stockholm and mixed in Amsterdam.  In South Africa, gold stocks closed higher.  In other Asian and Pacific markets, shares closed higher in Sydney, Seoul, Taipei, Singapore and Wellington, were mixed in Manila and fell in Hong Kong.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 18 Aug 17 Year  @ U.S. ................... 318.8 317.4 +24.5  @ Britain ................ 714.0 712.2 +30.7  @ Canada ................. 432.7 434.5 +17.9  @ Japan .................. 1569.4 1570.3 +10.5  @ France ................. 523.1 526.0 +18.2  @ Germany ................ 247.9 247.9 +19.2  @ Hong Kong .............. 1930.8 1957.3 - 4.9  @ Switzerland ............ 235.1 235.3 +35.9  @ Australia .............. 343.7 346.3 +18.4  @ World index ............ 538.2 536.3 + 8.9  ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ ISSUE (COUNTRY) CLOSE % CHG  @ WINNING ISSUES  @Renouf (N.  Zealand) .................... 0.07 +75.0  @Bell Resources (Australia) ............. 1.02 +39.7  @Wellcome (Britain) ..................... 6.71 +28.3  @Bank New Zealand (N.  Zealand) .......... 1.30 +23.8  @Wearne (Singapore) ..................... 7.05 +19.5  @Wilson Neil (N.  Zealand) ............... 0.78 +18.2  @Petrie Stores (U.S) .................... 24.25 +14.8  @Wormald International (Australia) ...... 2.65 +14.7  @United Engineers (Singapore) ........... 2.55 +14.3  @Uni Charm (Japan) ...................... 2470.00 +13.3  @ LOSING ISSUES  @Canada Nthwst Energy (Canada) .......... 5.25 -34.4  @Reading & Bates Offshore (U.S) ......... 0.50 -27.3  @Imperial Corp. (U.S.) .................. 4.125 -17.5  @Wang Laboratories B (U.S.) ............. 5.625 -15.1  @Euroc A (Sweden) ....................... 240.00 -11.1  @LAC Minerals (Canada) .................. 11.875 -10.4  @North Flinders Mines (Australia) ....... 2.30 -10.2  @Pharmacia B Fria (Sweden) .............. 185.00 -10.2  @North Kalgurli Mines (Australia) ....... 0.27 -10.0  @Bond Media (Australia) ................. 0.28 - 9.7  Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  STOCKS DROPPED sharply amid growing belief that the Fed won't lower interest rates.  The Dow Jones industrials tumbled 40.97 points to 2647.00, their largest decline since June 29.  Bond prices also fell.  The dollar rallied against the yen and rose modestly against the mark.  ---  Lyphomed received a $31-a-share buy-out bid from Fujisawa Pharmaceutical that values the U.S. drug maker at $929.7 million.  Lyphomed's shares jumped $7.75 to $30.25.  ---  WPPSS's planned $2.8 billion refinancing was abruptly postponed after Chemical Bank vowed to seek some of the offering's proceeds on behalf of holders of bonds that the power system defaulted on in 1983.  ---  Wang Labs reached a debt-restructuring agreement with its banks, which should allow the computer company to start dealing with its personnel and market-share problems.  ---  The Philadelphia and American stock exchanges are halting trading in their new stock "basket" products following an adverse court ruling.  ---  The Fed declined to bar four Japanese firms as primary dealers of Treasury bonds.  But the agency signaled it expects further opening of Japan's government-issue market.  ---  Budget director Darman expressed some optimism that Congress won't trigger automatic spending cuts under the deficit-reduction law.  ---  HAL Inc. agreed to support a bid by an investor group including Peter Ueberroth to buy a 51% stake for $22 a share, or $21.9 million.  The airline firm's stock sank $6.375 to $25.25.  ---  Prime Computer will name former Gould Inc. Chairman James McDonald as chief executive after Prime is acquired by J.H. Whitney & Co.  ---  B.A.T posted record first-half profit, boosted its dividend and hinted it will try to lock in share-price gains caused by Goldsmith's hostile bid.  --- Short interest for the month ended Aug. 15 rose 14.3% on the Big Board and 6.4%, to a record, on the Amex.  ---  Live Entertainment's chairman and his wife were shot to death in their home.  The company, 49%-owned by Carolco Pictures, sells video and other recorded entertainment.  ---  Carolco said Mario Kassar is negotiating the sale of his 36% stake to Andrew Vajna, the firm's other co-chairman.  An unidentified party has expressed an interest in the stake.  ---  South Korea plans an export drive and apparently a currency devaluation, reviving concerns in Washington about whether Seoul will keep narrowing its trade surplus with the U.S.  ---  The CFTC faces growing pressure to take action against Ferruzzi for allegedly trying to corner the soybean market.  But a public-relations effort is winning the firm some sympathy.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 136,800,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2647.00, off 40.97; transportation 1438.12, off 4.27; utilities 213.91, off 3.02.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3285.93, off 3.61.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.44, up 0.47; spot index 128.87, off 0.47.  Dollar: 143.10 yen, up 0.50; 1.9577 marks, up 0.0014.  The dollar was mostly higher in mild range trading as the market eased into a week that is expected to yield little excitement.  A moderate early rally in Tokyo that propelled the U.S. currency to intraday highs of 143.40 yen and 1.9660 marks gave way to profit-taking in Europe, followed by seesaw activity in New York.  Last minute bargain hunting boosted the dollar again, but the rise stalled above 143 yen and near 1.9580 marks.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9577 marks, up from 1.9563 marks, and at 143.10 yen, up from 142.60 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5725 up from $1.5660.  In midmorning trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the dollar was quoted at 142.85 yen, down from 143.35 yen at Monday's close there.  Steve Stekly, assistant chief dealer at Bank of Boston, said yesterday sterling was in demand, as traders covered short, or oversold, positions in anticipation of a bullish British current account report to be released tomorrow.  The current account is expected to have narrowed to #1.3 billion ($2.04 billion) in July from #1.5 billion in June, while the merchandise trade gap is seen shrinking to #1.7 billion from #1.9 billion.  In cross trading against its West German counterpart, the pound was at 3.0785 marks, up from about 3.0636 marks late Friday in New York.  "When the action hit a lull, we directed our energies toward the pound.  The rise against the mark was a bit more than we expected, however, and it may drop off a bit Tuesday," said Mr. Stekly.  Traders in Tokyo said persistant rumors of intervention by the Bank of Japan held the dollar's early rally in check, and by the time Europe opened for business, the dollar lost its momentum.  The only confirmed central-bank intervention came from the Bank of Italy, which bought 30 million marks and $56.5 million at the Milan foreign-exchange fixing.  "We had strictly holiday action Monday, with no discernable trend," said a New York trader.  "I think this is the shape of things to come until the end of the month."  The calendar of U.S. economic indicators is almost blank through Friday, with only the durable-goods report today to break the monotony.  As a result, traders say the U.S. currency will continue its sideways pattern, with perhaps a slight rise, until fresh news shakes the market.  The dollar is seen floating between 1.9400 and 1.9650 marks during late-August.  Supporting the dollar, traders say, is evidence of continued strength in the U.S. economy and the unexpectedly narrow $8.17 billion U.S. merchandise trade deficit in June.  However, on the negative side, "the trade figure didn't get the market going.  It seems people were keying in more on the {consumer price index}, and it wasn't too impressive" for the interest-rate outlook, said Mr. Stekly.  It was reported Friday that the CPI rose a moderate 0.2% in July, identical to June's gain.  The report prompted profit-taking on the dollar in New York.  Traders say the dollar isn't likely to be affected by today's release of U.S. July durable-goods orders, which are expected to have remained flat, following a 0.4% increase in June and a 4.4% drop in May.  One possible wild card this week is today's meeting of the Federal Open Market Committee, the policy-making arm of the U.S. Federal Reserve, which may choose to nudge interest rates lower to ensure slow but steady U.S. economic growth.  Traders will keep their eyes glued on the federal funds rate, currently at 8 7/8%, for indications of an easing.  Federal funds are overnight loans of reserves among Fed member banks.  But most market participants don't expect the Fed to force interest rates down at a time when current policy appears to be working, with a "soft-landing" for the U.S. economy in sight.  David W. Rolley, senior economist at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., said that "in the near-term, the fed funds rate is 'steady as she goes.'" He said the possibility of a U.S. recession faded during the past couple of months, while recent inflation numbers, such as the CPI, have been "very low.  So the best the Fed can do is just hold tight.  There's not a lot of pressure for early easing."  The Fed has taken three easing steps since June, forcing the fed funds rate down by about 75 basis points.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $368.40 an ounce, up 30 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 1.1 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at $366.30 an ounce.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ NEGATIVE  @Consol Stores $ .00 ... $ .04 (5) 100.00  Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  ROYAL "ROY" LITTLE, Textron's chairman, finally won respect in 1958 for a corporate structure called "conglomerate," a word he personally detested.  Soon these companies became all the rage.  In that recession year, Textron's earnings rose 24% despite a 4% sales decline.  About 75% of the earnings were from non-textile companies the once all-textile company had acquired since 1952.  Wall Streeters, who had been calling conglomerates "mismatched mishmashes," took notice.  Little, a wily Rhode Islander, preferred "unrelated diversification" to describe Textron's purchase of 50 companies in 1953-1960 in what he lightly called his "acquisition of the month club."  Reducing Textron's exposure to textile industry cycles was his goal.  He bought companies making everything from eyeglasses to chain saws.  Only six were lemons.  His major foray started after he won control of American Woolen in 1955 after a bitter proxy fight lasting more than a year.  Textron used American's $70 million of cash and tax losses to help finance its continuing buying binge.  Before Little retired June 29, 1960, many free-wheeling conglomerates -- such as Charles Bluhdorn's Gulf & Western, James Ling's Ling-Temco-Vought, Harold S. Geneen's IT&T and Roy Ash's Litton Industries -- were starting to gobble up diverse companies.  The "father of conglomerates" died Jan. 12, 1989, at a time many former conglomerates were breaking up or selling off their assorted subsidiaries.  Joseph A. Van Bourgondien was named to the new post of vice president, operations services of this food company.  The company said Mr. Van Bourgondien, formerly director of operational services, will be responsible for corporate engineering, purchasing and transportation.  Reading John Updike's Aug. 10 editorial-page article, "Modern Art: Always Offensive to Orthodoxy," which attempts to exonerate the National Endowment for the Arts from any criticism for its promotion of the "Piss Christ" and Mapplethorpe exhibits, amused me, for it continues to contribute to and defend a fundamental flaw in American art culture: the inability to discern good artistic expression from poor artistic expression.  Although I am appalled and offended by the controversial exhibits, I will agree that they are artistic expressions.  The question is, are they the best examples of artistic expression?  Do they really reflect a high caliber of talent, creativity and originality?  Any fool can urinate in a jar or take nude photos.  But what does it take to paint like Rockwell, or to do a sculpture like Michelangelo's?  It takes outstanding talent, creativity and originality, coupled with time.  It is unfortunate that "civilized" men and women, with the great artistic legacy of the medieval and Renaissance periods to reflect on, have lost the ability to discern profound from profane art.  It's like encountering a florist who cannot distinguish the difference between a rose and a milkweed when he puts together an arrangement to advertise his craft.  I challenge those who love art, either professionally or as spectators, to use common sense in your field or hobby.  Use your time and money to promote paintings and sculptures that reflect exquisite talent, not the drivel that the lowest amateur can produce.  Consult a good book on art history and pore over the magnificent talent of bygone centuries, and then look at the "art" that has caused so much controversy.  If you are honest and really have an eye for art, you will awaken to the horror of the NEA's gradual decline in discerning and promoting the best that America's and the world's artists have to offer.  Stephen Rost  Dallas  ---  I agree that an artist's ultimate duty must be to truth as he knows it.  But to compare Salman Rushdie's persecution for writing "Satanic Verses" with Serrano's lack of public popularity for "Piss Christ" misses a major point at the heart of artistic freedom: What is art?  Those who defend Mr. Rushdie generally admit no surprise that Moslems find his writing highly offensive, but they contend that the book is a work of literature, of art.  And the artist, who was not working with government grants, had the right to tell his story, offensive though it would be to some, without expecting to die for it.  Instead, were Mr. Rushdie to have merely submerged a copy of the Koran in a vat of urine, his defenders would have been few, since it would have been an act that took neither talent, skill nor insight, only a desire to insult.  There is no art to defend.  It is only the fact that NEA funds financed "Piss Christ" that even suggests there is any art involved.  Incidentally, perhaps the popular British slang term "piss artist" should be updated to "School of Serrano."  Henry C. Parke  Van Nuys, Calif.  W. Brown Morton Jr.'s introspective July 10 letter to the editor, "Re-Examining Terms of Conservatism," contained one definition that, unless misprinted or misinterpreted, calls for an explanation.  It was, "Opposites of 'radical' certainly are superficial, shallow and rootless."  Notwithstanding his quote marks around radical, the "certainly" evokes a challenge.  Not being young, an activist, Democrat or liberal, 99% of those with whom I have always associated are not radicals in today's sense.  Nor are 100% of my nonradicals superficial, shallow and rootless, as Mr. Morton states.  It would be interesting to know on what he bases his judgment.  Robert Wiedenmayer  Novato, Calif.  West Germany scheduled the privatization of 48% of Deutsche Siedlungsund Landesrentenbank, or DSL Bank, for late autumn, the bank said.  As a first step, the state-owned mortgage and wholesale bank will set up DSL Holding AG to take 48% of DSL Bank's capital.  The remaining 52% will stay with the federal government and with several regional states that jointly own 1%.  DSL Holding is expected to place 2,460,000 shares in an initial public offering.  No price has been set, but press speculation of a price of about 160 marks ($81.50) a share would result in a market value of about 400 million marks ($204 million).  DSL Bank is likely to become the largest privatization in West Germany since May 1988, when the government sold its remaining 60% stake in Viag AG, an energy, aluminum and chemical concern.  Your July 27 editorial criticism of Jim Wright, "Wright's Drapes," ought to be saved and recycled by the editors when next they decide to critically review similar abuses by recent presidents.  Where were the editorials when Richard Nixon was forgiven what was reported to be greater than $1 million in owed income taxes and penalties?  When Ronald and Nancy Reagan were granted an annual stipend of $12 million so, in part, Mrs. Reagan could fly to New York from the California ranch to see her publisher, with her Secret Service men in tow?  When pirates' bounties were given to construct presidential libraries, each one more garish than the last?  When there was a threefold increase in the executive-office staff after Mr. Reagan's inauguration?  One day we peasants shall rise up, but for now it would be nice if the Journal would tack some of the same principled criticism to Republican presidents who are just as deft at clipping the furniture.  John P. McDonald  Vancouver, Wash.  N.V. DSM, a partly private Heerlen, Netherlands, chemical group that began trading on the Amsterdam Stock Exchange early this year, said first-half profit more than doubled to 640 million guilders ($289.1 million), or 18.20 guilders a share, from 317 million guilders, or 9.10 guilders a share, a year earlier.  The company, 66%-owned by the Dutch government, proposed an interim dividend of 1.60 guilders a share.  DSM's earnings, described by analysts as in line with expectations, were buoyed by an extraordinary gain of 85 million guilders from the sale of part of its stake in the Dutch truck maker DAF late in the first half.  The 1988 first-half earnings were depressed by an extraordinary loss of 74 million guilders.  Before allowing for these items, pretax operating profit rose 20% to 781 million guilders from 651 million guilders.  Net sales increased 13% to 5.74 billion guilders from 5.07 billion guilders.  The figures were released about a month ahead of the Sept. 20 pricing of a second tranche of DSM shares to be floated on the Amsterdam exchange.  The new issue will reduce the government's stake to 33%.  In his Aug. 1 review of Ian Buruma's latest book, "God's Dust," Lee Lescaze writes of "Lee Kuan Yew's increasingly totalitarian Singapore," and of Singapore and China as "the two most heavyhanded (leaving aside Vietnam) regimes in Asia."  Does the Journal no longer preserve the distinction between authoritarian and totalitarian?  If so, you might consider discussing the question with Jeane Kirkpatrick.  As for the second assertion, you really should encourage Mr. Lescaze to explain at length how Singapore is more "heavyhanded" than, for example, North Korea, Iran, Cambodia and the Soviet Union.  Such a piece would be a collector's item.  Owen Harries  Editor  The National Interest  Washington  Hoesch AG said group pretax profit surged 48% to 325 million marks ($165.4 million) in the first six months of 1989 from 219 million marks a year earlier.  The Frankfurt, West Germany, steel and engineering concern also said group sales climbed 11% to 4.51 billion marks from 4.08 billion, while order inflow climbed 7.5% to 5.96 billion marks from 5.55 billion.  "The current order inflow signals that a continuation into the second half of the positive sales and earnings developments can be expected," Hoesch said in an interim report.  "Nearly all units will have plenty of business until well into the second half.  We expect the year 1989 to have another good result."  In 1988, the company had group net income of 58 million marks on sales of 8.34 billion marks.  Sales of steel products rose 6.8% in the first half to 1.98 billion marks from 1.86 billion.  Hoesch said its steel output is near the limit of its capacity.  Sales of industrial technology climbed 21% to 1.81 billion marks from 1.5 billion.  In his tribute to Herbert von Karajan (Leisure & Arts, July 31), B.L. Scherer said that the conductor, having been a member of the Nazi party, was "cleansed of the Nazi taint" after World War II.  Karajan was immensely wealthy, yet there is no record that he ever spent a penny to aid victims of Nazism.  Nor is there evidence that he used his acclaim to denounce the atrocities committed by the Nazis.  In fact, he occasionally threatened to cancel tours if his Nazi past was mentioned.  His brilliance as an artist deserves admiration and reverence.  But let's not dismiss his reprehensible past as a mere "taint" that can be cleansed simply because party membership no longer served his careerism.  David M. Freedman  Madison, Wis.  FIRST AMERICAN BANK & TRUST Co. (North Palm Beach, Fla.) -- Leonard Relin of Rochester, N.Y., and John L. Ricciardelli of North Miami Beach, Fla., were named to the board of this bank, increasing the number of directors to 10.  Regarding your Aug. 7 editorial "Gentrification's Flying Wedge": Not all rehab projects end up as high-priced saltboxes, plush corporate headquarters or quaint little shops for yuppies.  We who are struggling to keep small towns alive in rural America depend upon rehabilitation to preserve what's left of our communities.  We depend upon property owners to maintain their buildings so we can keep retail and services in our downtowns.  If the owners get a tax credit in the process, so be it.  The alternative can be seen in far too many towns: crumbling, vacant buildings lining deserted main streets.  Rehabilitation is only one part of our overall economic-development strategy, but it has been proved that physical improvements to buildings do have a positive impact on retail sales.  In our neck of the woods, preservation is not a matter of gentrification.  It's a matter of survival.  Nancy D'Ambrosio  Executive Director  Mainstreet Aberdeen  Aberdeen, S.D.  ---  Your editorial tars tax-act rehabilitation of historic buildings with a pejorative term it doesn't deserve.  Gentrification is defined as turning low-cost housing into high-cost.  That's not what is going on.  For example, in the Hartford area the old Royal Typewriter factory of more than a half-million square feet is being turned into 400 apartments, half of them "affordable" as defined by government programs.  Several years ago, in the Clemens Place project, dozens of rundown, vacant small apartment houses were rehabilitated, with the units renting at market rates of $600 to $800, which is reasonable for Hartford.  In the Clay Hill Project, 25 multifamily homes were rehabilitated for low-income families.  The single-room-occupancy Arrawani Hotel was rehabilitated for continued use as single occupancy.  The list of current rehabilitations that are converting vacant or underutilized industrial and commercial space into reasonably priced housing is long, but in no case is low-priced housing being turned into high-priced housing.  Gentrification is a bum rap.  The high-priced historic properties listed for sale in the Preservation News classified ads have nothing to do with the 1986 Tax Reform Act.  They are totally irrelevant.  The person who wrote the editorial did not do his homework.  David F. Ransom  Architectural Historian  West Hartford, Conn.  The chairman's son has left Winnebago Industries Inc. to strike out on his own -- again.  The Forest City, Iowa, maker of motor homes said John V. Hanson, 47, resigned as deputy chairman and a director to "pursue other business interests."  That puts new life into the guessing on who will succeed founder and chairman John K. Hanson, who is 76 years old and controls about 45% of the company's stock.  Winnebago watchers have speculated for the past few years about what would happen to that holding -- and the company -- when he is no longer around.  "The old man refuses to admit that could happen," says Frank P. Rolfes, an analyst who follows the company for Dain Bosworth Inc. in Minneapolis.  In an interview last fall, the chairman noted that his mother was 102 years old, and added, "I think I can keep up with what's his name at Occidental Petroleum." (What's his name is Armand Hammer, Occidental's 91-year-old chairman).  Mr. Rolfes and other followers of the company believe that Winnebago could become the target of one or more raiders after John K. Hanson is no longer in control.  Neither John K. nor John V. Hanson could be reached for comment, and a Winnebago spokesman didn't return phone calls.  John V.'s first tour with the company lasted from the 1960s to 1979, and included a two-year stint as chief executive.  The company ousted him from that post in 1977 in favor of an outsider.  "My father ran that company whenever it suited his fancy," the younger Hanson complained in an interview after he left the company the first time.  In his second tour, he was named a director in 1985 and deputy chairman a year later.  But analysts and former company officials say the jobs didn't carry much responsibility.  When Winnebago named a seven-member management council to run the company last year, the younger Mr. Hanson wasn't included.  John K. Hanson, the chairman, isn't inclined to tip his hand on his successor.  When asked in the interview last fall if John V. was a candidate, he replied, "Some people think his younger brother" will run the company some day.  The younger brother is Paul Hanson, who remains at Winnebago, where he has advised the company on investments for its portfolio.  He made headlines earlier this year after suing his bank trustee and lawyer for allowing him to spend and lose his personal $4 million fortune in less than five years.  Succeeding John V. as deputy chairman is Richard D. Conner, chief executive of Winnebago's Cycle Sat unit, which distributes television commercials to TV stations by satellite.  Fred G. Dhormann, Winnebago's vice president, corporate real estate, was named to succeed John V. as a director.  Amid a spate of mergers in the pharmaceutical industry, Robert Cawthorn would like to repeat: Rorer Group Inc. isn't for sale.  "We're not on the block," Mr. Cawthorn, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Rorer, said in an interview.  "We want to acquire, not be acquired."  He added, though, that Rorer continues to look for more alliances with other companies to bolster its efforts in marketing and research and development.  And, he said, the company would consider a merger, but only one in which it held the upper hand.  "If we could find a way to get together with another company as Beecham did with SmithKline, and we would end up running it, and it would be good for shareholders, we would do it," he said.  He was referring to the recently completed merger of Beecham Group PLC, of London, and SmithKline Beckman Corp., of Philadelphia.  Holders in the two predecessor companies equally divide ownership in the merged entity, SmithKline Beecham PLC, but it is based in London and its chief executive is the former chief executive of Beecham Group, Robert Bauman.  Rorer has been the subject of takeover talk for years, but Mr. Cawthorn said the speculation has intensified of late.  "I want to be sure that people who seek to be Rorer shareholders aren't drawn in by sheer speculation," he said.  Last month, Rorer reached one marketing pact with Upjohn Co., of Kalamazoo, Mich., for joint U.S. marketing of a Rorer beta blocker and another with Bolar Pharmaceutical Co., of Copiague, N.Y., for developing and marketing a calcium channel blocker.  Both products would be used in treating high blood pressure.  The agreement with Upjohn also provides for joint marketing of its Ansaid tablets for rheumatoid arthritis and osteoarthritis.  Upjohn's is one of the many names of possible acquirers that have surfaced in the speculation about Rorer over the years.  But Mr. Cawthorn said, "The only arrangement we have with Upjohn is a marketing alliance.  We may extend the marketing alliance to other territories, other products.  That's all."  He said Rorer continues to look for alliances that would help the company bring to market what it sees as promising compounds in its research and development pipeline.  He said the company's R&D budget, about $125 million this year, may have to be doubled in a few years as more drug candidates move into expensive clinical tests.  Thus Rorer could consider R&D partnerships or pacts whereby another company would gain certain marketing rights to a drug after having helped to finance its developement, he said.  Mr. Cawthorn said he believes four other products already on the market or close to it each could eventually generate annual sales of $200 million in several years.  They are the beta blocker, called celiprolol, to be marketed in the U.S. with Upjohn and already on the market in Europe; the calcium channel blocker, called diltiazem, to be developed with Bolar; a blood factor named Monoclate that is on the market, plus related blood products to follow; and an oral form of calcitonin, now given by injection to women with osteoporosis, that is still in development.  Mr. Cawthorn repeated Rorer's goal of achieving 15% to 20% annual earnings growth in the "short term."  And the new products, if they fulfill Rorer's expectations, should then have a "disproportionate impact" on the earnings of a company of Rorer's relatively modest size, he said.  The latest court ruling to benefit the news media was drawn from state laws governing liability for personal injury rather than the First Amendment.  The ruling, from the Fifth U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in New Orleans, overturned a lower court's judgment that Soldier of Fortune magazine was liable in the death of a Texas woman because the gunman who killed her was hired through an advertisement in the magazine.  The gunman who killed Sandra Kay Black of Bryan, Texas, in February 1985 was hired by her husband.  Both men were convicted.  The appeals court, in its ruling last week, said newspapers and magazines can't be required to adhere to state standards that require manufacturers and other business to recognize and alleviate the potential harm of their products or actions.  "The court is implicitly saying that {publishers} don't have to look beyond the ad to see if something could possibly happen," said E. Barrett Prettyman, a Washington, D.C., lawyer who handled the appeal for Soldier of Fortune and its holding company, Omega Group Ltd. of Boulder, Colo.  The appeals court did say that news media have a duty to exercise "reasonable care" in accepting advertisments but said Soldier of Fortune met that duty because the gunman's advertisement, which offered his availability for "high-risk assignments," was too ambiguous to be recognized as a solicitation of criminal employment.  "Given the pervasiveness of advertising in our society and the important role it plays, we decline to impose on publishers the obligation to reject all ambigous advertisements for products or services that might pose a threat of harm," the appeals court said in its decision.  The case was unusual because most lawsuits seeking to hold news media liable for the contents of advertisements have been dismissed before reaching trial.  This case, brought by the mother and son of the dead woman, went to trial and led to a $9.4 million judgment against Soldier of Fortune in March 1988.  In its opinion, the federal appeals court quoted heavily from the trial transcript, including testimony from witnesses who said as many as nine previous ads in Soldier of Fortune had been linked to crimes.  Jim George, a lawyer in Austin, Texas, who specializes in news media defense, said the appeals court's emphasis on the facts of this case strengthens its usefulness in similar cases.  "It's kind of hard to come up with worse facts than that," Mr. George said.  "If those facts won't support a judgment {against a publisher}, then there aren't any cases that will."  The attorneys for the woman's family, from the Houston law firm of Hill, Parker, Franklin, Cardwell & Jones, were out of town last week and couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Prettyman, the appellate attorney for Soldier of Fortune, said a further appeal is unlikely because the federal appeals court applied state law in its decision and pointedly refused to consider First Amendment questions.  The U.S. Supreme Court, he said, rarely agrees to hear cases decided under state law.  Highway Handwork  The roads  May stretch  Like ribbons  Just as  Surveyors plotted.  They forgot  To factor in  That traffic  Would be knotted.  -- Marilyn P. Donnelly.  ---  Cash Foe  "Make your money work for you]"  The idea's far from crazy --  But mine just either says adieu  Or admits it's lazy.  -- Bert H. Kruse.  ---  Daffynition  Hammock: yawn and garden furniture.  -- Antoni Tabak.  Ropart Partners Limited Partnership, a Greenwich, Conn., investment partnership, said it raised its stake in Control Resource Industries Inc. to 12.7% of the common outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Ropart said it holds 670,000 Control Resource shares, including 165,000 bought from July 6 to Wednesday for $4.437 to $5 each.  In an earlier filing, Ropart said it bought its stock for investment purposes but planned to take a more active role in the management and operations of the company.  Officials of Control Resource, a Michigan City, Ind., maker of air-filtration systems, couldn't be reached for comment.  U.S. BANCORP., Portland, Ore., declared a 20% stock dividend, payable Sept. 15 to stock of record Aug. 28.  The dividend will increase the common stock outstanding to 49.4 million shares.  The company also declared the usual quarterly cash dividend of 25 cents, payable Oct. 2 to stock of record on Sept. 15, and it will be paid on the shares issued in the stock dividend.  Maintaining the 25-cent payout after the stock dividend is an effective increase of 20%, the bank-holding company noted.  HUFFY Corp., Dayton, Ohio, said it began offering $30 million of 7 1/4% convertible subordinated debentures for $1,000 a debenture.  The debentures, due Aug. 15, 2014, will pay interest semi-annually and are convertible into common stock at a price of $22.80 a share.  Net proceeds from the sale, underwritten by Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., will be used for future acquisitions and general corporate purposes.  Huffy makes bikes and other sports products.  MCN Corp., Detroit, said its Michigan Consolidated Gas Co. unit has completed an offering of $60 million of secured medium-term notes.  Goldman, Sachs & Co. acted as agent for the notes, which are secured by Michigan Consolidated First Mortgage Bond Indenture.  The offering resulted in the sale of $5 million in 30-year notes at 9 1/2% and $55 million in 15-year notes at 9 1/8%.  The natural-gas-distribution company said it used the net proceeds from the notes to repurchase or refund outstanding securities.  CONSOLIDATED FREIGHTWAYS Inc. announced a public offering of $150 million principal amount of 9 1/8% notes due Aug. 15, 1999.  The Menlo Park, Calif., trucking and air freight company said net proceeds will be used to refinance bank borrowings, and to repay commercial paper outstanding.  The offering is being made through First Boston Corp.  BizMart Inc. said it offered 3.4 million common shares at $10 each.  The Arlington, Texas, discount office-products retailer said it is selling 2,750,000 shares and holders are selling 650,000 shares.  BizMart said it will use the proceeds for expansion.  Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. is the lead underwriter.  James O. Norwine, 48 years old, was elected vice president, personnel and administration, of Chrysler Financial Corp., a subsidiary.  He succeeds Robert J. Pear, 65, who retired.  Mr. Norwine was formerly senior vice president, human resources, for Chrysler First, a Chrysler Financial subsidiary.  Central Vermont Public Service Corp. said it asked the Vermont Public Service Board to approve a 14.4% electric-rate increase.  The utility said the increase probably wouldn't take effect until mid-1990 and would be offset by the removal of a 3.9% surcharge it has been adding to electric bills since 1987 to cover costs associated with its withdrawal from the Seabrook, N.H., nuclear project.  Central Vermont, which has about 125,000 customers, said the increase is needed to meet rising costs of buying electric power from other utilities.  The company added that it buys 90% of the electricity it sells, and that its costs of buying power have risen 16.5% since January 1987.  Continental Health Affiliates Inc. said it sold 428,000 Healthdyne Inc. common shares, reducing its holding to 666,800 shares, or 4.48%.  The Englewood Cliffs, N.J., nursing and health care services concern sold the stock between Aug. 4 and Thursday at $6.25 to $6.4375 a share, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Continental Health said it continuously reviews its investment and may dispose of some or all of its remaining shares.  However, it didn't rule out acquiring additional shares, making a new proposal to acquire Healthdyne or attempting to gain board representation, according to the filing.  Healthdyne is a health care services and electronic medical equipment concern based in Marietta, Ga.  Continental Health made an unsuccessful bid for Healthdyne last year, offering as much as $7 a share, or $105 million, for the company.  Healthdyne rebuffed the advance and restructured the company.  Healthdyne officials couldn't be reached for comment on Continental Health's sale of shares.  Riser Foods Inc. said it expects to report a charge of $5.4 million, or 67 cents a share, for the fourth quarter ended July 1 as a result of a litigation settlement.  The company doesn't have comparable year-earlier figures because it began operations June 9, 1988, with the combination of Fisher Foods Inc., Rini supermarkets, Rego supermarkets and American Seaway Foods Inc.  The supermarket chain said the settlement resolves litigation brought against its Fisher Foods subsidiary and others by May Department Store Co. in 1981, prior to Fisher's merger into Riser Foods.  Although the total amount of the settlement was not disclosed, Riser said that after insurance payments, it will pay $1 million in scheduled payments over four years.  It has already paid $4.4 million through Fisher Foods and other Riser subsidiaries.  The company said a "substantial portion" of the settlement was insurable.  Cecil W. Sewell, executive vice president, corporate services group, was named president of this bank holding company.  William H. Wilkerson, the holding company's executive vice president, was named president of its Peoples Bank & Trust Co.  They succeed J. Marshall Tetterton, who resigned as president of the holding company and Peoples Bank to become president of Bailey Management Group, a local investment concern.  Joseph W. Marshall, 51-year-old executive vice president of this utility, was named its chairman and chief executive officer.  He succeeds Robert J. O'Conner, 61, who resigned Friday because of health problems after a 37-year career with the utility.  Cumberland Associates, a New York partnership in the business of managing securities accounts, said it has acquired a 10.6% stake in Seven Oaks International Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Cumberland said it bought 680,000 Seven Oaks shares Aug. 10 and Aug. 11 for $6.125 to $6.25 a share.  The stock was acquired "solely for investment," the filing said.  Seven Oaks is based in Memphis, Tenn.  A Seven Oaks spokesman said Cumberland has bought and sold stock in the company before, adding he doesn't believe the partnership will attempt a takeover.  "They're money managers," he said.  "That's not their style."  Jeffrey S. Hall, 37 years old, was named to the new position of president of the San Fernando Valley edition of the Los Angeles Times, the flagship newspaper of this publishing, broadcasting and cable television concern.  Mr. Hall will remain as vice president of marketing services for the Los Angeles Times.  TS Industries Inc. said it filed petitions for reorganization under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  In connection with the filing, the company said it agreed to sell its foam insulation business assets to Bridgestone/Firestone Inc. Terms of the sale, which requires court authorization, weren't disclosed.  Under proposed terms, the company said it would pay in full all its creditors except Credit Suisse and holders of its 8 1/2% subordinated debentures.  Credit Suisse has agreed to extend financing through September 1994.  The company said it will pay debenture holders according to the interest and principal schedule set in the trust indenture governing the debentures.  TS said it plans to focus on its remaining business of selling partitions, sound control, fire control and security systems.  Under Chapter 11, a company is shielded from creditor lawsuits as it devises a debt-payment plan.  HPB Associates Limited Partnership, a New York investment partnership, said it holds a 6.5% stake in Nu-Med Inc. for investment purposes.  HPB said it controls 576,300 Nu-Med common shares, including 215,800 bought between June 28 and Aug. 17 for $6.03 to $8 a share, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  HPB said it bought the stock as an investment but may reconsider its position.  Nu-Med is based in Encino, Calif.  Yoram Dor, its chief financial officer, said "we welcome the investment in the company."  Nu-Med owns and operates acute-care and psychiatric hospitals.  Imagine walking into your congressman's office with irrefutable evidence that the U.S., in the next century, will face a potentially devastating economic and social crisis.  You assure your representative, however, that opportunity exists to take early corrective action to head off this impending disaster.  Your optimism that such action will occur is damped when you tell your congressman what issues are involved.  Social Security?  Forget it.  The senior-citizen organizations won't allow Congress even to discuss the issue.  The federal deficit?  It's a no-win topic.  Private pension policy?  It's boring, a non-vote-getter.  Due to its politically unappealing nature, the most critical economic issue America will face in the 21st century continues to simmer unabated.  This potential crisis involves the nation's trickiest political football, a Social Security system that already spends $600 million per day, one-fifth of the entire federal budget.  It focuses upon the country's largest voting bloc, the 75 million members of the baby-boom generation who will, in the next century, start receiving federal retirement benefits in cumulative amounts of unprecedented scale.  And this crisis will stem largely from the birth dearth that has followed the baby boom.  With more people choosing to stay single, a 50% divorce rate and a fertility rate of 1.9 per woman per lifetime, prospects for a future population boom are quite dim.  Even 750,000 new immigrants annually, an optimistic number, will not alter this scenario.  The pared-down generation will be asked to pay the way for the waves of "baby-boom retirees."  Add to this mix the rising federal deficit, the nation's poor personal-savings rate and the small number of workers currently covered by private pension plans, and you have a clear picture of the convergence of factors that threatens this nation's future economic security.  This is a combination of issues that no politician interested in self-preservation wants to touch.  On the positive side, the U.S. has a healthy economy and a stable Social Security system that provides a window of opportunity to prepare for tomorrow's challenges.  Policy makers, though, need to acknowledge the existence of a potential problem and find the courage to address it.  Here's how they can start:  -- Inject integrity into the policy-making process.  The existence of a bulging Social Security Trust Fund, growing by billions of dollars each year and projected to reach a peak of $12 trillion, presents a dangerous irony.  Its presence could actually result in less support for future retirees.  Even if we accept Social Security Administration projections, which assume continuing economic growth and accompanying high increases in real wages, the government will start tapping into the Trust Fund in the 2020s, when current revenues will no longer be able to meet the substantially increased benefit outgo, and exhaust it shortly thereafter.  That's if there is anything there to tap.  The inclusion of the Trust Fund in the unified Gramm-Rudman-Hollings federal budget enables Congress to present its constituents with the illusion of deficit-reduction progress.  Thus, there is less pressure to reduce spending, the operating budget continues to grow, Social Security's Trust Fund (by law, invested in government securities) is used to finance that deficit, and sufficient resources won't exist when they are desperately needed to finance an aging America.  It's time for Congress to follow a truth-in-spending policy.  At the very least, the public should be given two deficit figures: one with Social Security included, one without.  The result would be increased pressure to make tough budgetary decisions and leave the nation's retirement nest egg alone.  And, as difficult as it may be, legislators must resist the temptation to use the Trust Fund to help education, repair the nation's infrastructure or bail out or expand the Medicare program.  That money already is committed and its integrity must not be compromised.  -- Expand the retirement revenue pool.  Preventing the Social Security system from undergoing even greater stress will require that retirees enhance their incomes with revenue from other sectors.  The program was, after all, designed to provide a floor of retirement protection, not to be the predominant source of income.  Continuing the current level of dependence on Social Security -- almost two-thirds of current retirees rely on the system for more than half of their income -- would require further increases down the road in the Social Security payroll tax, particularly as the work force shrinks.  That's not feasible.  Increased payroll taxes will fuel the likelihood of intergenerational conflict, as well as potential socioeconomic tensions stemming from the disparity between unskilled, low-paid immigrant workers and middle-income Caucasian retirees.  It's clear we must create a larger pool of resources of which Social Security, while maintaining stable benefits, occupies a smaller share.  Start with individual savings.  The Individual Retirement Account was an effective tool that generated $250 billion in new savings during its pre-1986 tax-preferred heyday.  It should be resurrected.  Also, tax incentives should be utilized to spur the financial services industry into creating attractive, innovative vehicles, such as plans that combine health insurance with asset accumulation or reverse-mortgage programs that allow the elderly to take advantage of their home ownership.  Then Congress should move to simplify the complex maze of pension laws and regulations that lead to prohibitive administrative and compliance costs for many employers, particularly the small businesses that create the preponderance of new jobs.  It's become a popular sport of some federal policy makers to chastise the public for doing a poor job of saving.  They should end their berating.  The American worker has had every reason to use his or her money for purposes other than investment into savings vehicles that may not be viable tomorrow.  Betting on government consistency in recent years has been a sucker bet.  The treatment of IRAs is one glaring example of Washington changing the rules mid-game.  If the government won't keep the rules of the savings game clear and consistent, then it should stop blaming the public for choosing not to play.  -- Bring the retirement age into the 1990s.  The idea of retiring at age 65 is increasingly archaic.  If 65 was the proper retirement age in the U.S. in 1940, then today, based on rising life expectancy, it should be 73.  The Economist magazine editorialized last year that the best kind of pension reform is to encourage the old to work longer.  This not only makes sense but, in light of smaller work forces and the need for additional revenue, it becomes an economic necessity.  Both the public and private sectors can make this happen.  Congress should do away with the counterproductive Social Security retirement-earnings test, which penalizes retirement-age people who continue to work.  Private employers should reconsider pension policies that offer early-retirement incentives.  With the enactment of these steps must come a greater public awareness of the vulnerabilities of Social Security and the need for a cohesive retirement-income policy.  A Wirthlin Group survey last November showed 80% of the working public having a positive outlook on retirement.  Given what we know about the future, some might call that blissful ignorance.  I would prefer to call it optimism that won't be betrayed by a federal lack of vision.  We have a massive task ahead of us.  Having seen firsthand, though, the revitalization of a Social Security program to which many had delivered last rites early in the decade, I believe that solutions always accompany the willingness to look for them.  ---  Ms. Hardy was, until July 31, commissioner of Social Security.  Everything is breaking the right way for the U.S. economy.  The Labor Department's report that consumer prices rose only 0.2% in July, largely because of falling energy prices, capped a two-week streak of remarkably positive economic statistics.  Unemployment fell.  Businesses continued to add workers.  Retail sales perked up.  Auto sales rebounded.  Factory output grew a bit.  The trade deficit shrank.  Producer prices actually fell.  Even the past was improved: All the recent revisions of earlier months' data show the economy wasn't as weak as it appeared initially.  The numbers may tell a different story next month.  But for now, the U.S. economy still appears to be growing and displays few signs of accelerating inflation.  Recession fears are vanishing.  "If you were {Federal Reserve Board Chairman} Alan Greenspan, there's not another thing in the whole world you would want," said Nicholas Perna, economist for Shawmut National Corp.'s Connecticut National Bank.  "It's a Fed chairman's delight."  The 0.2% increase in consumer prices in July, equal to a 2.9% annual rate, followed a similar-size increase in June.  Because of more rapid inflation earlier in the year, the consumer price index has risen at a 5.5% annual clip so far this year.  Excluding food and energy prices, which often swing widely from month to month, prices rose 0.4% in July, double June's 0.2% increase.  Economists consider this a guide to the underlying inflation rate.  Despite the July hiccup, this measure rose at an annual rate of 4.4% in May, June and July, only slightly higher than the 4.2% in February, March and April and less than the 4.9% in the three months before that.  The strength of the economy relieves pressure on Fed policy makers, who convene tomorrow to set monetary policy for the next six weeks, to quickly push short-term interest rates down further.  At the same time, the stability of the inflation rate all but rules out any need to reverse course and raise rates.  Federal Reserve Board member Wayne Angell, more optimistic than several of his colleagues, told the Kansas Livestock Association Friday that the inflation rate is trending down.  "I see inflation moving closer to the 3% band, maybe the 2% band," he said.  Financial markets, which had been anticipating lower interest rates, barely budged last week as it became clear that the Fed isn't likely to ease again immediately.  Stock and bond prices ended about where they began it.  The Bush administration welcomed all the good news.  Among other things, the stronger the economy, the smaller the federal budget deficit.  Lower interest rates help on that front, too.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater, commenting on the consumer price report, said, "Lower inflation should take the pressure off interest rates."  Lower interest rates help, too.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater, commenting on the consumer-price report, said, "Lower inflation should take the pressure off interest rates."  Business economists also expressed relief.  But several warned that the worst is yet to come.  Some still expect a recession; they say its arrival has just been delayed a bit.  Walter Joelson of General Electric Co. says an inability to raise prices will squeeze corporate profits in the months ahead even if no recession materializes.  Other economists doubt that the good news about inflation can persist.  "This low inflation rate is real, but it's temporary," said Richard Hoey of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  He calls it "the summer inflation vacation."  Mr. Hoey reasons that the recent declines in interest rates will result in a rebound in the economy later this year.  This will generate higher inflation, he predicts.  The resulting higher interest rates will trigger a recession in 1990, he figures.  A number of economists say labor costs are bound to increase at a quickening pace if unemployment remains at current levels.  "It would be reasonable to assume wages will accelerate slightly," said Sung Won Sohn, economist at Norwest Corp. in Minneapolis.  Labor costs already reflect rapidly rising benefit costs, he said.  The Labor Department said that average weekly earnings of production or non-supervisory workers rose a sharp 1.9% in July to $338.53 after inching up 0.2% in June and falling 1% in May.  Average hourly earnings rose 0.8% in July to $9.70 after climbing 0.2% in June.  After adjusting for inflation, average weekly earnings rose 1.5% in July, the biggest monthly increase since a 2.3% jump in February 1982.  Higher wages, a longer work week and the small increase in prices in July all contributed to the increase.  The Labor Department said the moderate increase in consumer prices in July reflected falling energy and apparel prices and a small increase in food prices.  Prices for housing, entertainment and medical care all rose substantially.  Energy prices fell 0.7% in July, the second monthly drop in a row.  Gasoline prices, which surged 21.5% in the first five months of the year, fell 2.2% in July and 1% in June.  They remain nearly 15% above last year's levels, however.  Food prices, which also rose significantly earlier in the year, were up 0.3% in July and 0.2% in June.  Poultry prices, which climbed 10.2% in the first six months of 1989, dropped 1.4% in July.  Prices for apparel and apparel-related services fell 0.8% in July, the second consecutive decline.  Unusually big end-of-season discounts for women's clothing were largely responsible, the Labor Department said.  Prices of new vehicles also fell in July.  Medical-care prices continue to rise more rapidly than other prices, climbing 0.7% in July.  They have gained 7.5% in the past year.  The overall consumer price index climbed 5% in the same period.  The consumer-price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers -- an index used to adjust Social Security benefits, among other things -- also rose 0.2% in both July and June.  It has risen 5.1% in the past 12 months.  All the figures are adjusted for usual seasonal fluctuations.  Here are the seasonally adjusted changes in the components of the Labor Department's consumer-price index for July.  @ % change from  @ June July  @ 1989 1988  @ All items .............................. 0.2 5.0  @ Minus food & energy .................... 0.4 4.6  @ Food and beverage ...................... 0.3 5.6  @ Housing ................................ 0.6 4.0  @ Apparel ................................ -0.8 2.0  @ Transportation ......................... -0.6 6.0  @ Medical care ........................... 0.7 7.5  @ Entertainment .......................... 0.6 5.3  @ Other .................................. 0.9 7.9  July consumer-price indexes (1982-1984 equals 100), unadjusted for seasonal variation, together with the percentage increases from July 1988 were:  @ All urban consumers .................... 124.4 5.0  @ Urban wage earners & clerical .......... 123.2 5.1  @ Chicago ................................ 126.4 5.5  @ Los Angeles ............................ 129.0 5.7  @ New York ............................... 130.6 5.7  @ Philadelphia ........................... 129.3 5.0  @ San Francisco .......................... 127.4 5.4  @ Baltimore .............................. 124.9 4.2  @ Boston ................................. 130.3 5.3  @ Cleveland .............................. 124.4 5.8  @ Miami .................................. 121.6 4.1  @ St. Louis .............................. 123.1 6.1  @ Washington, D.C. ....................... 127.8 5.9  Prudential-Bache Securities, running against the consolidation trend in London's securities markets, will start making markets in British equities today.  The British affiliate of the U.S. brokerage and securities house, which is a unit of Prudential Insurance Co. of America, Newark, N.J., will begin market-making in eight listed equities on London's Stock Exchange.  The shares are: British Petroleum Co., Reuters Holdings PLC, Glaxo Holdings PLC, Hanson PLC, Blue Arrow PLC, Burton Group PLC and Saatchi & Saatchi PLC.  In addition, Prudential-Bache will make markets in Hong Kong Telecommunications, also listed on the London exchange.  The London equities market has been buffeted by trading doldrums and lackluster profitability this year.  Firms such as Morgan Grenfell Group PLC and Chase Manhattan Corp. have withdrawn from equities market-making, and many other British and U.S. firms have sharply cut their equities efforts.  Amid overcapacity and lackluster trading volume, Prudential-Bache itself withdrew from market-making in British government bonds, or gilts, in February 1988.  Prudential-Bache, in becoming the 31st equities market-maker on the London exchange, understands "there is quite a mass of companies" still making markets in British securities, a spokeswoman said.  But she added, "We feel our trading expertise in this specific group of eight stocks is significant enough that we will be profitable."  She said Prudential-Bache is "starting on a limited basis, to ensure we don't get in over our heads," but might expand its efforts.  Bradley Bilgore, a former Prudential-Bache market-maker in New York, will become its head dealer in London.  Other staff will be drawn largely from existing employees, the spokeswoman said.  Robert Destro, a member of the U.S. Civil Rights Commission, in the spring issue of This World:  When states have mandated the disclosure of information concerning the physical characteristics of normal fetuses in the hope that knowledge of the physical characteristics of the unborn might influence the decision to abort at all, the courts have ruled uniformly that such information interferes with the right to choose abortion because it is designed to prejudice the choice in favor of childbirth (i.e., life).  From this, it follows that the courts have concluded that prenatal physiological characteristics are not relevant to the choice of a woman to have the child unless there is a strong possibility that the child may be disabled.  Then, and only then, do the courts permit the state to require detailed physiological information concerning fetal characteristics to be disclosed.  French industrial production in June climbed 1.5% from May and was up 4.5% from June 1988, according to seasonally adjusted figures published by the National Statistics Institute.  The June rise follows a revised May decline of 1.8%.  Previously, the May drop was reported as 2.2%.  June's rebound in industrial output had been expected by economists as a technical correction of May's result, which was restrained by a high number of public holidays.  Economists had anticipated a rebound of about the same size as May's drop, while the year-to-year rate was forecast close to the 4.5% to 5% that is considered to be the six-month trend.  In May, the year-to-year rise was 4.8%.  French markets generally follow the year-to-year rate more closely than the monthly figures, which are often subject to broad revisions.  Canada's consumer price index rose in July by a seasonally adjusted 0.7% from June, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The July rise followed increases of 0.6% in June and 0.7% in May.  The July rise was attributed to higher costs for food, transportation and housing.  Friday, August 18, 1989 Following is a weekly listing of unaudited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ Adams Express NYSE 19.35 16 - 17.31  @ Baker Fentress NYSE 28.73 23 7/8 - 16.90  @ Blue Chip Value NYSE 8.41 7 1/2 - 10.82  @ Clemente Global Gro NYSE b10.51 8 3/8 - 20.31  @ Gemini II Capital NYSE 20.67 17 1/8 - 17.15  @ Gemini II Income NYSE 9.72 12 7/8 + 32.46  @ General Amer Invest NYSE 22.08 18 1/8 - 17.91  @ Growth Stock Outlook NYSE 10.38 9 3/4 - 6.07  @ Lehman Corp. NYSE 16.81 14 - 16.72  @ Liberty All-Star Eqty NYSE 9.89 8 - 19.11  @ Niagara Share Corp. NYSE 17.76 14 1/2 - 18.36  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.19 9 3/8 - 16.22  @ Quest For Value Cap NYSE 17.40 12 1/2 - 28.16  @ Quest For Value Inco NYSE 11.68 12 5/8 + 8.09  @ Royce Value Trust NYSE 11.25 9 3/4 - 13.33  @ Schafer Value Trust NYSE 12.01 10 5/8 - 11.53  @ Source Capital NYSE 42.77 41 5/8 - 2.68  @ Tri-Continental Corp. NYSE 29.50 24 - 18.64  @ Worldwide Value NYSE 21.69 17 3/4 - 18.17  @ Zweig Fund NYSE 11.57 11 7/8 + 2.64  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 9.01 8 3/8 - 7.05  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.17 10 + 9.05  @ Franklin Universal Tr NYSE b9.50 9 5/8 + 1.32  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.55 10 1/8 + 6.02  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE a8.32 9 1/4 + 11.18  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Seasn OTC 5.78 5 - 13.49  @ America's All S Inco OTC 9.10 9 1/4 + 1.65  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.66 9 5/8 - 0.36  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American Capital Conv NYSE 24.19 21 7/8 - 9.57  @ ASA Ltd NYSE bc57.68 43 - 25.45  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 13.28 12 1/2 - 5.87  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.94 19 1/8 - 12.83  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 62.58 58 1/4 - 6.92  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.71 10 - 14.60  @ Brazil NYSE 19.83 10 5/8 - 46.42  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.50 5 1/4 - 50.00  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.51 11 7/8 + 24.87  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.49 19 1/2 - 13.29  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b5.02 k - 01.64  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.80 10 1/4 - 19.92  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.49 10 1/2 - 15.93  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 11.25 10 1/4 - 8.89  @ Duff & Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.54 8 1/2 - 0.47  @ Ellsw Conv Gr & Inc AMEX 8.98 7 5/8 - 15.09  @ Engex AMEX 13.87 m - 30.16  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 20.93 20 1/4 - 3.25  @ 1st Australia AMEX 10.64 8 3/4 - 17.76  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 11.64 11 - 5.50  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.06 9 1/8 - 9.29  @ France Fund NYSE b12.30 12 - 2.44  @ Gabelli Equity Trust NYSE 14.46 13 3/8 - 7.50  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.55 8 7/8 - 7.07  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE 9.80 7 3/4 - 20.92  @ Hampton Util Tr Cap AMEX b11.63 9 3/4 - 16.17  @ Hampton Util Tr Pref AMEX b49.00 48 - 2.04  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.82 11 1/8 - 13.22  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f13.53 13 5/8 + 0.70  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.46 10 - 12.74  @ Korea Fund NYSE 18.38 35 5/8 + 93.82  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.57 11 1/4 - 2.77  @ Meeschaert G & C MWSE 8.27 8 - 3.26  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b11.83 10 3/8 - 12.30  @ Morgan Grenf Sm Cap NYSE 10.46 9 - 13.96  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.83 10 1/2 + 6.82  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE 29.64 25 1/2 - 13.97  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.28 10 - 11.35  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.74 8 3/4 + 0.11  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.76 8 7/8 - 9.07  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE h14.86 15 1/2 + 04.31  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE 14.68 11 1/8 - 24.22  @ Spain Fund NYSE 13.64 17 + 24.63  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE g39.78 38 3/8 - 3.53  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b9.00 8 1/8 - 9.72  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b12.14 11 3/4 - 3.21  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.69 9 3/8 - 12.30  @ Thai Fund NYSE 15.68 17 + 8.42  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE 12.13 10 3/8 - 14.47  @ Z-Seven OTC 14.49 14 3/4 + 1.79 a-Ex-dividend. b-As of Thursday'sclose. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. e-in Canadian dollars. f-As of Wednesday's close. g-As of Thursday's close; 8/11/89 NAV 39.81, Stk pr 38 1/4, % chg -3.92. h-8/11/89 NAV 14.12, Stk pr 15 5/8, % chg +10.66. k-Stk pr: 4 15/16. m-Stk pr: 9 11/16. z-Not available.  Automatic Data Processing Inc. said fourth-quarter earnings rose 9% and predicted a more than 10% increase in per-share earnings for the new fiscal year.  The computer-services company attributed the earnings growth to strength in its employer-services and dealer-services businesses, and said it expects both those lines to have double-digit growth in the year ending June 30.  In the quarter, net income rose to a record $53 million, or 73 cents a share, from $48.6 million, or 63 cents a share, a year earlier.  In the year, net rose 10% to $187.6 million, or $2.53 a share, from $170.3 million, or $2.20 a share, in fiscal 1988.  Per-share profit rose 15%, as average shares outstanding decreased about five million, to 72.8 million at June 30.  ADP has been buying shares in the open market in the past few years, and is authorized to continue doing so.  Revenue rose 6.3% in the quarter, to $418.1 million from $393.2 million.  The company said it anticipates "a modest increase" in revenue for the new year, despite an 8% expected loss in revenue resulting from the recent sale of some businesses.  Fiscal 1989 revenue 8.2% to $1.68 billion from $1.55 billion.  ADP said it expects its employer-services business, which contributes 50% to sales, to have another good year, along with the automated-business-centers business, which it recently acquired.  It expects a gain from the sale of its banking service, which it says will be completed soon.  The results were "very much in line with our expectations," said Arthur Weinbach, chief financial officer.  In the past two years, ADP consolidated many of its brokerage-service businesses into a new facility in Jersey City, and in 1989 started subletting space resulting from the consolidation.  ADP increased its provision for expected losses from excess space.  The provision, combined with other nonrecurring charges, effectively canceled out a $66 million pretax gain from the sale of its automated-teller and real-estate-service businesses in the fourth quarter.  Steve McClellan, an analyst at Merrill Lynch Research, said the company put the entire pretax gain into reserves against losses on space in the Wall Street area.  The words "I-R-S, you're under arrest]" might have made a greater impact had they been carved in two inch letters on a Louisville Slugger applied to my forehead, but I doubt it.  Three years before I had altered my W-2 forms to receive an undeserved refund.  I was a futures broker in those days, and planned to straighten out my "unofficial loan" in my next big month.  Typical broker rationalization.  Six federal agents, three of them in blue IRS slickers, were involved in my arrest.  I was searched and read my rights, and then handcuffed and shackled.  That night I slept on the floor of the Santa Clara County Jail's bathroom.  The next morning a deputy stamped "released" on my hand and chained me to a pipe to await the arrival of the agents who were to take me to the Federal Court Building in San Francisco.  I shared my holding cell with a drug pilot, a bank robber, two tax attorneys and a heroin addict going through withdrawals.  On one of the concrete benches that protruded from the wall was scratched "W-U-D-D-A, Washed Up Drug Dealers Association, 'WUDDA happened to all that money?'"  Within a few hours, I was alone in the cell.  I waited to be called before the magistrate.  What was I, of all people, doing here, of all places?  How could I face my kids, my family, my friends, my girl?  The phrase "death before dishonor" floated into my mind.  Then I remembered that the dishonor had already occurred.  I have often read about "revolving door justice."  I never saw any.  Had I had the bail money in my back pocket when arrested I would still have spent 10 days in San Francisco County Jail -- in an 18 man cell occupied by 23 other "non-violent federal prisoners."  Throughout, the toughest part was the waiting.  Waiting the days in jail.  Waiting the months before sentencing.  Finally -- on November 18, 1988 -- I appeared in Federal Court.  I entered a guilty plea to two counts of "making false claims against the government."  I anticipated a fine and a sentence of community service hours: I couldn't pay back the money if I couldn't work.  I was wrong.  The judge said that "due to the contemplative nature of the crime, jail time of one year and one day is indicated."  Jail, for contemplation?  Six weeks later I turned myself in ("self-committed") to the Federal Prison Camp in Lompoc, California, the "Club Fed" of the Watergate days, FPC-by-the-Sea, Camp Lollypop.  In residence are 700 inmates, about half drug dealers and half business types, although the drug dealers are certainly businessmen and many of the businessmen were lured into drugs.  There are no fences, no bars, no wire, no guns or guard towers.  We live in barracks-style dormitories surrounded by manicured lawns and flower gardens.  The food is all right and the salad bar adequate.  There is a jogging trail and a tennis court along with a weight pile and gym.  Inmates do everything, but we are watched and watched and watched.  Mark Twain once said, "If you want to see the dregs of humanity, go down to the jail, and watch the changing of the guard."  I was surprised when I came in that no one looked like a criminal, but what does a criminal look like?  Not like me.  Not like my friend the smuggler or the stock manipulator or the methadrine cook or the bank president.  There is a remarkable courtesy among the inmates here.  You hear "please," "thank you," and "excuse me" even more than you do in the South.  A conscious effort seems to be made to maintain the vestiges of polite society.  The hardest part is accepting that there is nothing, nothing you can do about anything on the outside and that life is going on in all your favorite places without you.  Relationships are a major casualty.  It's easy to ask someone to wait and it's easy for her to say that she will.  But ladies impressed by the dash of the pirate often choose not to stand with the criminal.  The rule at Lompoc is that "forever lasts three months."  I have to wonder at the benefit to society by the incarceration of most of us.  For whatever mistakes we've made, we are law abiding enough to accept and respect the punishment the courts have given us: otherwise we wouldn't be in a camp where we could escape simply by walking away.  How many volunteer organizations could use the administrative and physical energies which are stilled and become embittered in jail?  The time is boring, degrading and a monumental waste of time and tax dollars.  Tennis courts and salad bars do not mitigate that simple fact.  ---  Mr. Vernier, prisoner number 83381-011, is serving a one-year sentence for tax fraud at Lompoc Federal Prison Camp in California.  The Justice Department threatened to subpoena telephone records of CBS News to help identify the source of government leaks about a criminal investigation of the congressional office of Rep. William Gray (D., Pa.), people familiar with the situation said.  Attorney General Dick Thornburgh wouldn't confirm or deny whether prosecutors had sought telephone records from any reporters.  But in an interview yesterday on NBC's "Meet the Press," Mr. Thornburgh said that such demands wouldn't violate the First Amendment's protection of free expression and a free press.  If prosecutors tried to force reporters to turn over telephone records, they "would be well within constitutional bounds," Mr. Thornburgh said.  A spokesman for CBS in New York said the Justice Department hadn't subpoenaed any records from the network or its reporters.  The spokesman said he didn't "have any information" on whether prosecutors had threatened to subpoena the records or to try to obtain them from the telephone company in Washington.  The attorney general has said that he will dismiss and criminally prosecute any officials found to have illegally leaked information about the investigation of Rep. Gray's office.  But Thornburgh spokesman David Runkel has said that the department doesn't intend to prosecute reporters for publishing or broadcasting information on the Gray investigation.  The internal Justice Department investigation began about three months ago.  A grand jury has been convened in Washington, and at least one top Thornburgh adviser, Mr. Runkel, has testified under subpoena.  The Federal Bureau of Investigation has interviewed other senior department officials, according to law enforcement officials.  About a month ago, the Justice Department threatened CBS that prosecutors were prepared to subpoena telephone company records of telephone contacts between CBS reporter Rita Braver and department officials, according to a person familiar with the situation.  The Justice Department said its goal was to identify the official or officials who had leaked information to Ms. Braver that led to her reporting in May that Rep. Gray was under criminal investigation, according to the same person.  It isn't known whether prosecutors ever attempted to obtain the records from the Washington telephone company, which is a unit of Bell Atlantic Co. Officials with Bell Atlantic couldn't be reached to comment.  Ms. Braver wouldn't comment yesterday.  It's unlikely that the Justice Department has subpoenaed records from the phone company, because such a move would almost inevitably have come to the attention of CBS's lawyers, who would have objected publicly, lawyers said in interviews.  FBI agents questioned Rep. Gray on May 29 regarding a criminal investigation into congressional hiring practices.  The next day, Ms. Braver, quoting Justice Department sources, reported that Rep. Gray's office was under investigation.  Law enforcement officials subsequently said that the FBI was investigating allegations of a no-show employee on Rep. Gray's payroll.  After numerous press reports on the investigation, the Justice Department said it wasn't investigating Rep. Gray himself and that he had cooperated with FBI inquiries.  Rep. Gray, nevertheless, has charged that the Justice Department's investigation, combined with the apparent leak to CBS, indicated that there was a partisan attempt to hurt his reputation at a time he was seeking election as House whip, the No. 3 position in the House Democratic leadership.  Mr. Gray won the post.  This spring there were also press reports, based on law enforcement sources, of criminal investigations of former House Speaker James Wright of Texas and former Whip Tony Coelho of California.  Reps.  Gray, Wright and Coelho have all denied any wrongdoing.  The Justice Department recently reversed a longstanding policy of not criminally prosecuting government officials who leak information primarily to disseminate it to the public.  The purpose of the former policy was to protect government whistleblowers attempting to publicize official misconduct or waste.  But this month, the Justice Department said the protection won't apply any longer to government employees who leak information obtained from criminal investigations.  When prosecutors were forced to drop the indictments of Robert Freeman, Richard Wigton and Timothy Tabor more than two years ago, Rudy Giuliani promised new indictments in "record time" and asserted that the original charges were just the "tip of an iceberg."  Last week, the iceberg turned out to be an ice cube, and even it melts under close scrutiny.  The single ice cube was a "mail fraud" plea from Mr. Freeman.  All other charges were dropped.  And that plea is best understood as a scrap of paper for prosecutors to wipe the egg off their faces.  They figured they had better get something out of the dirt they were given by admitted inside trader Martin Siegel in exchange for promising him a lighter sentence.  The original indictment alleged a conspiracy in which Siegel told Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor that he was exchanging hot illegal tips with Mr. Freeman.  Based only on Siegel's claims, Mr. Giuliani had Mr. Wigton handcuffed at his desk.  Mr. Tabor was forced to spend a night in the slammer plus two years unemployed.  When prosecutors last week finally decided they had no case against these two, Mr. Giuliani apologized, after a fashion, for his haste.  The single scrap, Mr. Freeman's plea bargain, deserves a close look.  He'd readily admitted the following:  As Goldman Sachs's top arbitrager, he bought Beatrice stock and options betting that Kohlberg Kravis Roberts would complete its leveraged buyout.  On January 7, 1986, he called Henry Kravis, who didn't indicate any problem, but Mr. Freeman says a snag was suggested by Mr. Kravis's "tone" and the fact that he was "very abrupt and appeared anxious to end the conversation."  At midday, a well-known arb sold his shares.  First thing on January 8, Mr. Freeman started dumping Beatrice shares and options.  Then he got a call from Bernard "Bunny" Lasker saying he heard from another arb that the LBO was in trouble.  Mr. Freeman called Siegel, KKR's investment banker, and told him he had heard there was a problem.  Siegel asked for his source and then said, "Your Bunny has a good nose."  He didn't disclose the problem and Mr. Freeman didn't ask.  By the time of the Siegel conversation, Mr. Freeman had already unloaded two-thirds of the securities he sold January 8.  On that day, Beatrice shares plunged from 47 1/4 to 43 1/4, on the news that KKR changed its offer from $43 in cash and $7 in preferred stock to $40 in cash and $10 in preferred.  As it became clear this would not kill the deal, the shares recovered to 47 1/4 by March 4.  In April, as the deal was completed, they traded as high as $50.  Those who bought from Mr. Freeman on January 8 may have lost money or may have turned a profit, depending on when they sold.  The entire case against Mr. Freeman rests on the notion that Siegel's Bunny comment was "inside information."  But if there was any Boesky-style quid-pro-quo insider-trading arrangement, Mr. Freeman would not have been scrambling around trying to interpret tones of voice and cryptic Bunny remarks.  If anyone took seriously the notion that this is a crime, arbs would stop showing up for work.  Their job is to compete for accurate information about the prospects for takeovers succeeding, and bring this information into the market as quickly as possible.  They do this by using the phone.  Arbs play a very valuable role.  They often buy shares from shareholders -- including plenty of institutional investors -- who prefer getting the benefit of the price rise that comes with takeover announcements but who don't want the risk that the deal will fall through.  The only people we know who don't understand this elementary operation of markets are some federal prosecutors and regulators.  In recent years, SEC officials seemed to think that anyone who has any more information than anyone else is a criminal -- which at any point in time could make anyone buying or selling stock a felon.  This plea bargain raises political questions about more than Mr. Giuliani's mayoral ambitions.  The absurd plea forced on Mr. Freeman and the churlish admission of innocence of Mr. Wigton and Mr. Tabor are an indictment of prosecutors who care more about getting headlines than making solid cases.  Does Attorney General Thornburgh think this is good policy?  What does Richard Breeden, nominated to run the SEC, think of the exotic view of markets reflected in such cases?  There is only one way we can imagine to salvage anything from this misuse of prosecutorial power.  Federal Judge Pierre Leval will sentence Mr. Freeman in the fall.  We propose that Judge Leval order this punishment: Mr. Freeman should serve 1,200 hours of community service in the form of lecturing prosecutors on how markets work.  The Pritzker family bought a Hungarian government-controlled trading firm, becoming the first U.S. company to acquire all of an existing business in the Communist nation.  The agreement is the first to be completed under a Hungarian law that began allowing foreign companies as of Jan. 1 to acquire 100% of a business.  Getz Corp., a trading unit of the Pritzker family's closely held Marmon Group of Cos., bought the Hungarian trading firm, Intercooperation Co., for an undisclosed amount.  The move gives Getz, which operates mostly in the Far East, access to markets in Africa, Southeast Asia and Western and Eastern Europe, including the Soviet Union, areas where Intercooperation maintains a strong presence.  The Hungarian company had 1988 sales of $71 million.  "It's perfect for us," said Robert A. Pritzker, president and chief executive officer of Marmon Group, in an interview from Budapest.  "They're in places we are not."  Before the change in the Hungarian investment law, foreign companies were permitted only limited stakes in existing businesses.  As of June, 37 U.S. companies had joint ventures in the Eastern European country, according to Ivan Novak, a commercial representative for Hungary in the U.S.  Of those, 13 firms had a majority interest and three had established new businesses, the only way the old law permitted foreign companies to own all of a business outright.  The Pritzker family has several years of experience in Hungary.  In the early 1980s, Hyatt Corp., a hotel operator headed by Jay A. Pritzker, opened a hotel in Budapest.  Shortly afterwards, Marmon Group began buying Hungarian truck and tractor axles.  Robert Pritzker apparently decided to buy the trading firm after visiting Hungary in June.  A U.S. trade official said the relative speed at which he made the purchase signals that Hungary is anxious for investment from the West.  "Mr.  Pritzker saw that Hungary is turning toward a more market-oriented economy where he can apply the same management, market research and selling strategies that he uses in the U.S.," said Mr. Novak, the Hungarian trade official.  The U.S. government doesn't restrict investment in Hungary as it does to some countries such as the Soviet Union, said the U.S. trade official.  U.S. companies, however, can export high-technology gear to Hungary, a member of the Warsaw Pact of nations, only with a license from the U.S Commerce Department.  Mr. Pritzker, who said he is studying possible investments in Poland, added that he is also interested in acquisitions in other Eastern European countries.  With a rampage of violent crime turning cities into war zones, many prosecutors are elsewhere engaged, devoting thousands of investigative man-hours to whether Chicago commodity traders are giving fair value or Wall Street arbitragers are guilty of "insider trading."  Why this incredible diversion of effort to "crimes" that often are not clearly defined by statute and where identifiable victims are seldom found?  Maybe too many of today's prosecutors were influenced by the prevailing counterculture suspicions of middle-class morality during their law-school days.  But another answer is simpler: It is easier to extract plea bargains from traders, with a mere mention of RICO, than from real felons.  The statistics on violent crime are numbing.  Murder, robbery and rape all were up in 1988, with a total increase of 5.5%.  FBI Director Sessions says "violent crime known to law enforcement reached an unprecedented high in 1988."  The tabloid New York Post one recent day had these subheadlines: "Undercover Cop Shot in Back."  "Four Slain in Mob Rubouts."  "Bullets Fly on Bleecker St."  "Drug Widower: I'll Fight On."  "Dramatic photos on pages 4, 5, 7, 8 and 9."  President Bush and Drug Czar Bennett want to fight the war on drugs in the streets, where the dealers and users are, but maybe they forgot to tell the Justice Department.  Attorney General Thornburgh is proud of coining the moral-equivalency phrase "crime in the suites."  Not long after creating six Securities and Commodities Fraud Task Forces, Mr. Thornburgh decided to disband the long-standing Organized Crime Strike Forces.  In New York, Rudy Giuliani's hand-picked replacement, Benito Romano, sees only a "superficial irony" in moving top aides from the fight against the Mob and drug lords to go after bankers and traders; he says white-collar cases "are the most difficult to bring."  Now, markets do indeed need rules if their effectiveness in allocating capital and goods is not to be sacrificed to public distrust.  All exchanges in the U.S. recognize their own self-interest in rule enforcement.  A few traders have been guilty of what would be crimes even in the absence of exchange rules, such as theft of information.  But some crimes threaten society and some do not.  Is it too much to ask law enforcers to give top priority to wide-scale violence, rather than Giuliani-type cases elevating stock parking to racketeering status?  Most Americans agree on the real crime problem.  A recent National Law Journal/LEXIS survey asked which crime should rank the highest for law enforcement; 47% said drug dealing, 32% said muggings and rapes, 11% said racketeering -- and 3% said white-collar crimes.  The survey asked this hypothetical: An armed robber gets away with $5,000 from a bank.  So does an embezzler.  What sentences would you give?  Streets vs. suites was no contest: Nearly half would have put the armed robber away for more than 10 years, while only 12% thought the white-collar embezzler should serve more than 10 years, with one-third saying he should serve less than two.  The survey, not to mention simple logic, makes it clear where the public would like prosecutors to direct their efforts.  Many of us are dumbfounded by recent examples of misdirection, such as the frivolous antitrust case brought by state attorneys general accusing insurance companies of causing the tort crisis.  No doubt law-enforcement officials find it frustrating to try to nail real felons.  Clearly, they would be aided in doing so if courts restored some recognition of the principle that the goal of trials is to find the truth and punish the guilty.  New York's ultra-liberal court rules could actually bar from evidence admissions by several youths that they attacked and gang-raped the young woman jogger in Central Park earlier this year.  Law-enforcement officials also might ask Congress why they never got the local prosecutors, judges and jailers promised under the huge anti-drug bill.  We are sympathetic toward those prosecutors who feel they have hit a brick wall of procedural protections for drug pushers, youth gangs and other major perpetrators.  But this is not much of an excuse for launching dubious prosecutions at easier targets.  Their efforts should be bent instead on getting tools that will enable them to accomplish their main task: regaining control of the cities from thugs and murderers.  Exxon Corp., in an abrupt about-face, said it will keep a small strike force in Prince William Sound and the Gulf of Alaska throughout the winter to help guard sensitive fish hatcheries against roaming oil, and to monitor the impact of winter weather on heavily oiled beaches.  Alaska officials called the move encouraging but said the 20 or so workers, four 150-foot seagoing vessels and seven aircraft committed to the plan aren't enough.  New York-based Exxon previously said it planned no winter activities in the sound or gulf.  The state, in fact, has asked the Coast Guard to press Exxon for a larger wintertime strike force and to keep at least some of its oil spill clean-up crews at work for as long as six weeks beyond Sept. 15.  Exxon has set that date, the nominal onset of the Alaskan winter, to halt its massive $1.3 billion effort to clean up the huge mess caused by the March 24 grounding of the supertanker Exxon Valdez.  Exxon disclosed its strike force proposal in a "winter plan" submitted to the state and Coast Guard on Friday and said it hadn't budged from its contention that rough winter weather makes any attempt at cleanup too hazardous.  The company also said that new estimates indicate 1,077 miles of beaches had been soiled in some way by the 11 million-gallon spill-up from 730 miles -- but that it already had treated 915 miles of those beaches.  Exxon said it was optimistic that it would be able to treat all remaining beaches before its Sept. 15 pullout.  Of the total soiled beaches, about 347 miles lie within Prince William Sound while the rest are in the Gulf of Alaska.  Besides the strike force, Exxon's plan calls for it to leave another 280 workers in Alaska over the winter, most of whom will be based in Anchorage and will be involved in oil spill claims activities, or in analyzing data on the cleanup.  The plan also commits Exxon to "data collection and analysis" of 26 separate ongoing scientific studies on the spill and, "weather permitting," to inspect Prince William Sound's most heavily oiled beaches every two weeks to determine the impact of winter storms on previous cleanup efforts.  Coast Guard officials hadn't any immediate comment on the plan, saying they wanted "a couple of days" to analyze it.  The federal agency by law has oversight over the cleanup but hasn't any legal authority to compel Exxon to increase its winter efforts.  Nonetheless, the agency earlier played a pivotal role in compelling Exxon to put more resources into the cleanup effort, which now involves more than 10,000 workers, 1,000 vessels and 70 aircraft.  Alaska officials, meanwhile, were unequivocal.  "We think Exxon needs to commit more people and more equipment closer to the resource areas we are concerned about," said Steve Provant, the state's on-scene spill cleanup coordinator.  The state, in a formal letter to the Coast Guard, said that there are at least five salmon hatcheries in Prince William Sound, and several areas in the Gulf of Alaska, that need on-site defenses, such as skimmers and oil-containment booms, if they are to be adequately protected against slicks of oil that continue to roam the massive spill area.  Unisys Corp.'s announcement Friday of a restructuring program seems likely to restore the company to profitability but means it is backing away from its ambitious growth plans.  Chairman W. Michael Blumenthal is known as a shrewd financial manager, so securities analysts expressed confidence that he could succeed with his plan to cut debt, inventories and accounts receivable.  "I think he's playing to his strength at this point," said Steve Cohen, an analyst at SoundView Financial Group Inc.  Still, analysts said the Blue Bell, Pa., company had landed in enough of a mess that progress would be slow.  Jay Stevens, an analyst at Dean Witter, said the company needs to earn $370 million before taxes each year just to cover its common and preferred dividends.  In addition, debt, at $3.7 billion, is high enough that the computer and defense electronics company pays about $400 million of interest before taxes annually.  Yet, in the first half, Unisys had a net loss of $25.1 million, and the charge that Unisys expects to take in the third quarter to cover the restructuring has some analysts predicting Unisys will do little better than break even this year.  "When you look at it that way you realize how far off track the company is," Mr. Stevens said.  Others wondered whether the company has gone far enough, with its plan to cut $400 million of costs by the end of next year and trim the 88,000-person work force by 7% to 8%, or 6,000 to 7,000, through layoffs and attrition.  Even the most optimistic analysts aren't predicting that earnings next year will come close to the $680.6 million, or $3.27 a share fully diluted, that Unisys earned on revenue of $9.9 billion in 1988.  "The $400 million cut in costs will only be sufficient if U.S. demand returns in 1990.  If U.S. demand remains uninspiring, as it has been for everybody for the past three years, then that's not enough," said Ulric Weil, an analyst at Weil & Associates who had been one of the many bulls on the stock.  In any case, the company's new emphasis on profitability and cash flow means it is setting aside its ambitious talk of going from some $10 billion of annual revenue to $20 billion in the early 1990s and becoming a major competitor to International Business Machines Corp.  That would, in any case, have been difficult, with debt high and the stock price closing Friday at $21.375, unchanged, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, nearly 50% below its level of last summer.  If the company can get its act together over the next year and again generate the sort of enthusiasm that existed among investors a year ago, substantial growth would, of course, be possible.  But that has proved to be remarkably hard to do in such a fast-moving industry.  Mr. Blumenthal said in an interview that "growth will take care of itself" if the company can re-establish profitability and strong cash flow.  He also said that he thought acquisitions would become possible again somewhere down the road.  He was generally optimistic, despite acknowledging that the first half was "highly disappointing."  He said the rollout of the 2200 line of mainframes -- whose delay caused some of the recent problems -- "went, if anything, better than we expected."  He said the company was also accelerating its move into the faster-growing parts of the computer business -- such as software, services, workstations and other computers that use the Unix operating system.  Mr. Blumenthal said those areas accounted for 37% of the Unisys computer business last year, but the number will reach 45% next year.  He did acknowledge that the Unisys defense business, which accounts for 25% of its revenue, has been flat and isn't likely to improve soon.  Likewise, he said the company's sizable maintenance business was showing little or no growth, and mainframe growth would settle back into the single digits after the spike caused by the 2200.  Revenue in the U.S. has been below plan across the board, Mr. Blumenthal said, with no upturn in sight.  But he said that the company remains convinced that its product strategy is sound and that slashing costs will solve the problem.  "This sense that things are falling apart is clearly an overreaction," Mr. Blumenthal said.  The developer chosen to lead the next phase of building on New York's Roosevelt Island will have its work cut out for it, literally.  The state of New York, which is leasing the 147-acre island from New York City, has some very definite ideas for the 2,000 apartments to be built.  The state's plans, to be announced next month, require that 50% of the units be set aside for moderate- and low-income families, a substantial increase from the typical 20% in government-sponsored construction projects.  Further, a state-retained architect already has outlined the size and placement of buildings, the types of materials to be used and layouts for public areas.  The state will also mandate waterfront access and central parking facilities for the traffic-free island.  State officials hope the advance planning will be a plus in attracting major developers in New York to a complicated, high-risk project on the East River island.  But developers will have to decide whether the trade-off is worth it.  The developer will be giving up some of its freedom of choice, but it won't be responsible for certain up-front development costs, such as site planning and environmental studies, because those have been covered by the state.  And the plan has been approved by representatives of the local community and is exempt from municipal government review.  "There are a lot of things the developer doesn't have to do," says Rosina K. Abramson, president of Roosevelt Island Operating Corp., a division of the State Division of Housing and Community Renewal that oversees development on Roosevelt Island.  "We've amassed the land, there is no displacement (of current residents), there is minimal demolition required, the infrastructure is planned," Ms. Abramson says.  The greatest amount of planning has gone into guidelines for low-income housing, Ms. Abramson explains.  "The state's goal is to make sure the affordable units get built, " she says.  "We don't want anyone to cheat."  While the developer will be limited in what it can charge for half the units, it can try to get top dollar for the other half.  Planners hope the builder will be able to sell the market-rate, or luxury, units for more than $300 a square foot, although that price is still lower than typical new luxury-housing prices in nearby Manhattan.  The state plans to share in the profit from the sale of those apartments.  The 19-acre development, to be called Southtown, will comprise seven towers, ranging from 18- to 28-stories tall, six smaller apartment buildings, day-care facilities, retail space, parks and esplanades, according to the state's plans.  The westernmost units, with Manhattan views, will comprise most of the market-rate condominiums.  When completed, the community could house about 5,000 people, almost doubling the island's current population of 6,000.  "The plan is quite specific, but it does have some flexibility for developers," says urban planner and architect Raquel Ramati, who created the master plan for the community.  For example, developers will be able to direct the architecture, layout and interior of the market-rate, or luxury apartments, she says.  But it remains to be seen whether the government's land-use plan will make economic sense to builders.  The chosen developer will lease the land from the state's operating corporation, but the lease payments will be made up front in the form of improvements to the area such as parks and streets.  State officials estimate the developer's total cost to be between $350 million and $400 million and expect the construction to take three or four years.  "Our criteria for selecting a developer will be the quality of his design team, experience and financial capability, as well as the amount the developer is proposing to share with the state with respect to the market rate housing," says Stephen H. Shane, special assistant to the state commissioner of housing.  The state's specific plans for Roosevelt Island are a response to the disappearance of state and federal subsidies for affordable housing.  The state had created a master plan for the island in 1969 that envisioned a mixed-income community, just 300 yards east of midtown Manhattan.  In the mid-1970s some 2,000 units of government-subsidized housing were built there.  But 20 years after the original plan was drawn up, many federal and state subsidies vanished.  A long lull in development on Roosevelt Island ended this year with a private developer's completion of a project with just over 1,000 rental units -- 80% of them market-rate apartments and 20% for low-income residents.  Compelled to find new ways to finance the affordable units, the state is relying on a "cross-subsidy," with high-priced apartments supporting lower-priced ones and paying for infrastructural improvements; hence the rare 50/50 mix of housing in the plans for Southtown.  Planners also hope the development will get a boost from the long-awaited completion of a crosstown subway that will serve Roosevelt Island.  Although the island is reachable by car, many residents travel there by tramway.  The crosstown subway, under construction since 1968, has been compared to the Loch Ness monster: it's supposedly under the water but never appears.  The subway is now scheduled to surface in October.  The skyrocketing prices of such syndicated hits as "Wheel of Fortune" and "The Oprah Winfrey Show" have driven television stations owned by NBC into a partnership with Group W-owned stations to create syndicated shows of their own.  The partnership's first effort, tentatively titled "The Open House Show," is scheduled to debut in January.  An hour-long daytime show hosted by Steve Doocy, a feature reporter for NBC's station in Washington, the show was described by an insider as "Pee Wee's Playhouse for adults."  The program will feature a number of regular contributors, including an advice-giver and a man who will perform onerous tasks for viewers, such as asking their boss for a raise.  "Successful syndicators have been raising their prices 20% and 30% a year, and if you don't pay it, they'll take the show to the station across the street," said Dick Lobo, station manager for WTVJ, the NBC-owned station in Miami.  "We're trying to find a way to create our own programming that meets our needs and also stop the spiraling cost of syndicated programs."  NBC, the National Broadcasting Co., is a subsidiary of General Electric Co. and owns seven television stations.  Group W, a subsidiary of Westinghouse Electric Corp.'s Westinghouse Broadcasting Co., owns five stations.  A number of extremely successful programs, notably talk shows, have been developed by a single local station, which then syndicated the show nationally.  "The Oprah Winfrey Show," for example, began on Chicago station WLS.  "Given the realities of economics today, I don't think it's possible for a single station to devote the financial and human resources necessary" to launching a new show, said Derk Zimmerman, president of Group W Productions.  A number of station groups have formed alliances to produce shows together, but this is the first time a network-owned station group is involved.  Also, this show has a network producer, NBC Productions.  The executive producer of the show, Barry Sand, comes from "Late Night With David Letterman."  FCC rules that restrict how much of their own programming networks can produce will expire in 1990.  NBC has been the most aggressive of the three big networks in gearing up production: it will produce two of the five prime-time series it premieres this fall.  The networks are fighting to change rules that forbid them to syndicate their own shows.  In this partnership, Group W will be the syndicator.  Each of the NBC and Group W stations involved in the joint venture can decide whether to carry "Open House," but if they all do, the show will have a big advantage over most new syndicated shows.  Collectively, the 12 stations reach more than 30% of the nation's television sets and are situated in major cities important to advertisers.  Syndicators like to sign up enough stations to reach well over 50% of the nation's viewers before they commit to a show.  But the partners said they have committed to "Open House," for their own stations, whether or not additional stations around the country sign up.  NBC's stations are in New York, Los Angeles, Chicago, Washington, Cleveland, Miami and Denver.  Group W's stations are in Baltimore, Boston, Philadelphia, Pittsburgh and San Francisco.  Riding a relatively strong economy, the East German leadership has been able to resist pressure for political liberalization.  East Germans have more to eat than the Poles, more to buy than the Hungarians or Czechs.  Indeed, by most measures they enjoy a living standard unsurpassed in the Soviet bloc.  But there's one crucial exception.  The thousands of East German citizens who have fled the East in recent months seek the one thing that is in short supply in their Communist-controlled state: civil liberties.  Even those who haven't left still hunger for more freedom.  "Sure, there's bread to eat and goods to buy, but we are starving," said one dissatisfied citizen here, who asks that his name be kept out of print.  Such discontent is striking because it comes from one who, unlike those who have fled East Germany, has no plans to emigrate to the West.  "We want to stay here and change things," he said, "and we know many people who want to do the same thing."  Still, he said, he and his friends doubt the situation in East Germany will ever really change.  An in-depth interview with this East German underscores just how different this nation is from its liberalizing neighbors.  Under state law, he could be jailed for this unauthorized contact with a Western visitor.  The same laws exist in other Soviet-bloc countries, but they are increasingly ignored.  The difference is that the winds of change that are blowing at hurricane force in the Soviet Union, Poland and Hungary haven't reached East Germany.  The Communist Party leadership here is almost as Stalinist as ever, frozen in a Cold War mentality that appears even more icy given the warmth now emanating from its communist neighbors.  For millions of East Germans, this sense of isolation, of being grossly out of step with the rest of the world, has been heightened by Western television.  Most East Germans can watch Western TV, in most cases via a normal antenna.  They heard the reports and saw the grisly scenes broadcast from China several weeks ago.  Yet in its newscasts, East German TV stuck to the official version of events as described by the Chinese government.  "According to my knowledge," said the unhappy Dresdener, "there are only two countries in the world that broadcast (only) what the Chinese government said: Vietnam and East Germany.  That's a highly threatening sign."  The Dresdener was interviewed in his home recently before the latest surge in citizens fleeing to the West.  Over a four-hour period he and his wife talked about their lives in East Germany, amid the bustle of two small children storming about their cramped but comfortable apartment here.  Materially, they are well-off.  They have good jobs, healthy children, close friends.  Although they have never been directly harassed by the state, they are agitating for change, particularly in environmental matters.  They deeply resent the inflexibility and repressive behavior of their government.  Still, the East German said, they despair of successfully pushing for liberalization.  He knows all too well how the system works in his country.  As an environmental activist he has been involved in many grass-roots efforts by local citizens to clean up the Elbe River, which flows through this grimy city that still shows scars from World War II saturation bombings.  A few years ago his group approached local authorities with a complaint about malfunctions at the city's water purification plant, which draws water from the Elbe.  He said officials initially acknowledged the problem.  But all talks were broken off, he said, when details of the complaint were published in a local newspaper.  The paper was censured and the reporter was jailed, he added.  "We were helpless.  What were we supposed to do?" he asked, his voice crackling with anger.  "In California, I read that a citizen sued the state government for environmental pollution.  But in our country there isn't the possibility as a private person to protest against the state.  Even if you could find a lawyer to represent you, no judge would accept it.  Our situation is totally perverse.  It is really intolerable."  He said his group has documented examples of state corruption.  State officials routinely underreport the number of votes cast against the Communist Party in elections, he asserted.  In one recent ballot, according to an analysis done by his group, the negative votes in one community alone were 10% greater than the officially reported total of negative votes for the entire district.  A letter to state officials explaining the discrepancy went unanswered, he said.  The authorities are better at keeping track of people.  For this reason, he and his colleagues have affiliated themselves with the Protestant Church, not out of any religious conviction but for the protection it provides.  But many in the parish, including the pastor, feel the church shouldn't be involved in politics.  This Dresdener contended that the pastor's stance reflects an apathy that is far too prevalent in East German society.  "We could change things if enough people wanted to," he lamented, "but too many people accept things the way they are."  A federal appeals court reinstated a racketeering lawsuit filed by thousands of Phillips Petroleum Co. shareholders against T. Boone Pickens Jr. and his Mesa Partners over alleged "greenmail" in a 1984 bid to take over Phillips.  Reversing a 1988 ruling in Delaware federal court, the Third U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in Philadelphia said the plaintiffs' allegations were substantial enough to be heard by a jury.  The appeals court ruling reinstates a class-action suit that accuses Mr. Pickens, Mesa Partners and several other defendants of violating racketeering and securities laws by releasing "false and misleading" information about the terms of the sale of his Phillips stock.  "What this shows is that in takeover fights, acquirers can't make powerful statements and then feel free to change their positions and get away with it," said David J. Bershad, an attorney for the plaintiffs at the New York law firm of Milberg, Weiss, Bershad, Spechthrie & Lerach.  The shareholders, who acquired Phillips stock between Dec. 5 and Dec. 21, 1984, claim they lost about $150 million when the price of Phillips stock dropped nine points after Mr. Pickens abandoned his $60-a-share Phillips bid.  Under the civil provisions of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law, the damages could be trebled.  A spokesman for Amarillo, Texas-based Mesa, said the defendants "will ask for a rehearing in the appeals court or we'll go to trial, which we are prepared to do."  He also pointed out that the appeals court upheld the federal court's decision to dismiss the plaintiffs' claims that Mr. Pickens and Mesa had also violated state laws.  Mr. Pickens and his group announced their intentions to acquire Phillips on Dec. 4, 1984.  The group issued a news release saying that it would "not sell any Phillips shares owned by it back to Phillips except on an equal basis with all other shareholders."  The group repeated the statement on its disclosure statements to the Securities and Exchange Commission, and Mr. Pickens reiterated the message during an interview on a national television news program, according to the suit.  But on Dec. 23, the group dropped the planned takeover offer when the company agreed to restructure its finances and buy the group's shares at a $10-a-share premium.  The group had a pretax profit of $89 million.  On Monday, Dec. 24, the price of Phillips shares dropped from $54 to $45 each.  In early January 1985, the first shareholders filed suits against Mr. Pickens, Phillips and others.  Phillips agreed to a settlement in March 1986, and the suits against the remaining defendants were consolidated into a class action in 1987.  Last year a Delaware federal court dismissed the shareholders' suit because, among other things, there was no proof that what Mr. Pickens had said in early December 1984 was untrue at the time.  However, the Philadelphia appeals court said that proof of a reckless disregard for the consequences of such a statement was sufficient reason to take the case to a jury.  In the opinion, released Aug. 9, Judge Anthony J. Scirica states that such "unequivocal statements presented an obvious danger of misleading the public" and "a jury could, therefore, reasonably find making the statement to be an extreme departure from the standards of ordinary care."  "Who brings the drugs here?  Blacks don't bring it here.  This is genocide."  So speaks a man living in the Wabash Building, a drug-ridden public housing project on Chicago's South Side.  Desperate conditions breed desperate theories, so it's not surprising that some of the nation's poorest black citizens believe that the ghetto crack wars are part of a white plot to kill them off.  What is surprising is the reaction of Charles Thomas, one of the ABC team of black correspondents and producers that has been working on a documentary entitled "Black in White America," scheduled to air next Tuesday, Aug. 29 (10-11 p.m. EDT).  Instead of balancing this view with contrasting theories or evidence, Mr. Thomas merely echoes it: "Some blacks believe that this is indeed genocide.  They ask why it is that a nation that put a man on the moon cannot solve the problems that plague the inner cities.  The only answer, they contend, is a conspiracy to eliminate them."  Why is this comment so dispiriting?  It's not just the cliche about putting a man on the moon -- although it is tiresome, 20 years after the War on Poverty, to hear the challenges of social policy still being equated with those of space technology.  More dispiriting, however, is the apparent fact that Mr. Thomas, a correspondent with ABC News in St. Louis, would lend any credence to such a paranoid theory.  Doesn't his own success prove it wrong?  Ay, there's the rub.  "Black in White America" isn't just another video safari down black America's mean streets.  It's also a guided tour up black America's Nob Hill where, according to ABC Senior Correspondent Carole Simpson, things are not as perfect as they seem.  In a segment profiling the family of Howard Holley, a district manager for Xerox who lives in a posh white neighborhood in San Diego, Ms. Simpson seeks to demonstrate that, even for black successes, "living in white America means living with racism."  Thus Mr. Holley relates how the company started him out in the mailroom because of his color.  Then he describes how white women "put a karate grip" on their pocketbooks when he passes them on the street.  Then his teen-age daughter tells how her black identity means nothing to her rich white friends.  Finally, we see the family at a meeting of Jack and Jill, a black social club founded in the 1930s, which is currently being revived by "upwardly mobile black families who crave contact with other blacks."  Is "racism" the right word to describe the experiences of this family?  I don't know why Xerox started Mr. Holley in the mailroom; the fact that he is now district manager suggests that the intention was not to keep him there.  If it were, then the racism charge might stick.  As for the pocketbook incidents, it must be insulting for a well-dressed black man with no thought of committing a crime to be avoided by white women on the street.  But don't black women behave almost as warily?  And isn't it equally insulting for a woman to be called a racist simply because she isn't good at sizing up black strangers?  Unlike the Holleys, the majority of wealthy black Americans live in wealthy black neighborhoods -- a fact that is frequently cited as proof of continued racial discrimination in the housing market.  Ms. Simpson chooses not to profile a family in the Gold Coast of Washington, D.C., or Baldwin Hills in Los Angeles, apparently because she feels that rich blacks residing among rich whites offer a better case of "living with racism."  In other words, when it comes to accepting black neighbors, rich whites are damned if they do and damned if they don't.  In its recent report on the state of black America, the National Research Council defines "racism" quite narrowly as "belief and related actions that overtly embrace the notion of genetic or biological differences between human groups."  The film understands this narrow definition when it celebrates the Tuskegee Airmen, the nation's first black fighter pilots, who overcame genuine racism to become heroes in World War II.  But then, when the film insists that today's black airmen are "fighting the same battles," it broadens the term to the point of meaninglessness.  After presenting a mixed bag of data about contemporary racial attitudes, the $2.7 million NRC study (funded by private foundations and the government) lists three possible interpretations: first, a "progressive trend" toward greater white acceptance of black equality; second, "underlying racism" masked by sophisticated white rhetoric; and third, "meaningful patterns of progress and resistance" -- in other words, both good news and bad news.  The NRC endorses the third interpretation, but adds that most whites favor the first, and most blacks the second.  Maybe this is why the blacks at ABC stress the bad news; they're tired of hearing whites stress the good.  Let us return for a moment to the Holley family's motives for joining Jack and Jill.  Ms. Simpson doesn't mention the bad old days when such social clubs existed for a very different purpose.  As described by the black sociologist E. Franklin Frazier, they were founded in the 1920s and 1930s by the "black bourgeoisie" that had no access to any level of white society, and had to struggle for a modicum of social status within the segregated black community.  It's striking to see the clubs revived today as a means of overcoming the isolation of blacks living among wealthy whites.  Here is the real reason why this film harps on "racism" -- it, too, wants to bridge the gulf opening up between rich and poor blacks.  When Mr. Thomas interviews 16-year-old June Dunn, another resident of the Wabash Building, he is visibly stunned when she says that she hopes to raise her two children on $2,000 a year.  Like a white reporter, he appears torn between respect for the aspirations of June's church-going, drug-avoiding family, and dismay at their sweet-natured, sleep-walking passivity.  But he's more involved than a white reporter, and therefore more anxious to assert a bond between himself and the Dunns.  Unfortunately, the bond turns out to be "racism."  By far the most effective segment of "Black in White America" is the first.  Through a hidden camera we watch black children take a test developed by the black psychologist Kenneth Clark in which they are shown pairs of illustrations, either of boys or girls, that are identical except for skin color.  When asked to pick "the pretty girl" or "the smart boy," the children choose the white picture; when asked to pick "the ugly girl" or "the dirty boy," they choose the black.  If the film stopped right there, it would convince us that racism still exists.  But by using the word so carelessly, it puts itself in the position of the boy who cried wolf so often that nobody would listen to him when the wolf actually arrived.  It's one thing to cry wolf when, like the unhappy residents of the Wabash Building, you literally see him at the door.  It's another to do so when the beast you're dealing with is the complexity of race in America.  CONNER PERIPHERALS Inc. said it made a public offering of 6.3 million common shares at $11.375 each.  The San Jose, Calif., computer disk drive maker sold 4.1 million shares, and certain holders sold 2.2 million shares.  Conner plans to use proceeds for expansion of manufacturing capacity and for working capital.  Rite Aid Corp. and its president and chief operating officer, Martin L. Grass, pleaded innocent during a Cleveland court arraignment on charges of paying a $33,000 bribe to a member of the Ohio Board of Pharmacy.  Mr. Grass and the corporation were indicted June 14 by a Cuyahoga County, Ohio, grand jury on charges of bribery and possession of a criminal tool -- the corporate jet in which Grass flew to Cleveland April 27 to meet with the pharmacy board member.  Bribery, a third-degree felony, carries a maximum penalty of two years in prison and a $5,000 fine.  No dates have been set for the trial before Cuyahoga County, Ohio, Common Pleas Court Judge Lillian Greene.  The trial could be delayed by numerous pending motions, including Rite Aid's request for removal of Assistant County Prosecutor William R. Caine for alleged misconduct during grand jury proceedings.  Attorneys for Rite Aid, based in Shiremanstown, Pa., said they were confident that Mr. Grass and the company would be exonerated of the charges, which they said were "absurd" and stemmed from a pharmacy board "vendetta."  The company contends the $33,000 payment was a legitimate buy-out under terms of an existing employment contract with pharmacy board member Melvin T. Wilczynski.  The prosecution alleges that, in a transaction recorded on videotape, Grass handed over the payment in exchange for Wilczynski's signing a resignation letter addressed to Ohio Gov. Richard F. Celeste.  The payment was part of an alleged scheme to control the pharmacy board, which in January fined Rite Aid $50,000 for violations at 69 Ohio pharmacies, the prosecutor said.  A rocket set to lift off Saturday from Cape Canaveral, Fla., will carry the latest hopes for Europe's troubled experiment in direct satellite television.  The private consortium British Satellite Broadcasting Ltd., using a Hughes Aircraft Co. satellite, aims to beam five channels of movies, sports, entertainment and news shows straight into U.K. homes, starting next spring.  But the brave new technology, called "direct-to-home" TV, already is stumbling in Britain and the rest of Europe, a victim of high costs, equipment problems and political wrangling.  Early forecasts that more than nine million European households would have receiving dishes to get satellite television by 1993 now seem wildly optimistic.  The actual number probably will be no more than five million, industry specialists say.  And to reap pie from the sky, Europe's dozen public and private direct satellite broadcasters may have to shell out $5 billion to $10 billion in addition to the $2.5 billion they have spent so far.  Only the richest will survive.  "It will be a long, slow haul to make direct-to-home {broadcasting} a paying business in Europe," says Jill Maslen, research director for CIT Research Ltd., a London market-research firm.  Eventually, she adds, there will be "just a few operators left making a horrible living."  World-wide, the expensive technology has yet to attract legions of consumers despite a decade of development.  Satellite TV enjoys limited success in Japan, where about 789,000 homes receive two channels directly.  But almost all signed up before NHK, the nation's public broadcaster, started charging a fee this month.  In the U.S., satellite broadcasting serves less than two million of the 90 million homes with TV sets.  It was overtaken by the much wider popularity of cable television.  In Europe, a French satellite recently began airing cultural shows over one of its five channels, but dishes are scarce and few people watch.  The West German government launched a broadcast satellite Aug. 8 to replace one abandoned in November 1987 after the solar panels failed to open.  But the new satellite may not lure many viewers until high-definition television arrives in 1994.  Scandinavia's Tele-X satellite went up in April, three years behind schedule.  The venture, once awaited with great anticipation but now widely dismissed as a $264 million white elephant, also won't begin broadcasting soon because of political squabbles over introducing commercial and pay television.  Britain has witnessed the biggest skirmishes and missteps in Europe's sky war over satellite TV.  Both Rupert Murdoch's Sky Television, a unit of Australia's News Corp., and British Satellite, backed by several Murdoch rivals, are bleeding badly.  They stabbed themselves and each other through confusing promotions of their different technologies and the committal of nearly $1 billion in a bidding contest for Hollywood film rights.  Mr. Murdoch, who began beaming TV signals to homes in Britain and Ireland in February, expects to spend #500 million ($780 million) before he breaks even in three to five years.  British Satellite, after raising #423.5 million, needs to find another #300 million to #400 million early next year.  Both risky ventures may fizzle by "never getting to a big enough critical mass to make money," warns Nick Lovegrove, a London-based senior manager for U.S. consultants McKinsey & Co.  So far, only 227,000 households receive Sky TV's four channels, either directly or through cable TV systems -- despite its initial projections of reaching 2.5 million homes by year end.  Mr. Murdoch is employing desperate tactics to prop up his unprofitable operation.  Among them: running commercials on the pay-TV movie channel, postponing the addition of a fifth channel and distributing thousands of receiving dishes free or at a discount through Murdoch tabloid newspapers.  Next week, Sky TV will begin offering a cut-rate rental package as part of its latest #10 million marketing campaign.  The venture is expected to buy 300,000 dishes, which retail for #199 each, and charge viewers #4.45 a week for dish installation, rental and the descrambling equipment and fees for its pay-television channel.  By simplifying things for consumers, the rental package "could have a tremendous effect" on boosting the appeal of Sky TV, says John Clemens, managing director of Kennington Research, London market researchers.  The new Sky TV drive undoubtedly will exacerbate British Satellite's difficulties.  The consortium suffered an embarrassing and costly setback in May when a technical hitch in developing descrambling equipment forced a six-month postponement of its September debut.  It had to temporarily shelve a #20 million advertising campaign, after spending #2.5 million urging British viewers to buy their dishes this fall.  The consortium then trumpeted -- but since has quietly dropped -- plans for an interim "showcase service" of one free channel in U.K. pubs and clubs.  "Our problem is getting this very, very advanced technology to actually work," says Anthony Simonds-Gooding, British Satellite's chief executive officer.  "Our credibility is close to zero until" then.  Some analysts take a harsher view.  "There is a serious question mark over BSB management," says Mark Astaire, a media analyst at U.K. brokers Hoare Govett Ltd.  "So far, everything has gone wrong."  Making matters worse are the misfortunes of British Satellite's biggest investor, Australian entrepreneur Alan Bond.  Broadcast regulators in his native country have declared him unfit to operate television and radio stations there after finding that he misled regulators and made an improper payment to a politician in connection with a defamation case against one of his stations.  With his global corporate empire facing a cash squeeze, Mr. Bond has yet to pay the latest #27 million portion of his #153 million commitment to British Satellite.  The consortium's nine other investors paid their installments in June.  Bond Corp. Holdings would like to pull out of the venture, analysts believe, perhaps by selling its nearly 36% stake to Hollywood studios.  Unfortunately, "this (holding) isn't a particularly sellable asset at the moment," observes a Bond Corp. executive based in London.  Other British Satellite shareholders are growing nervous about Mr. Bond's uncertain role and the venture's possible need for several hundred million pounds more after next year's round of financing.  Among the consortium's backers: international publishing giants Pearson PLC and Reed International PLC, as well as Granada Group PLC, a consumer-electronics rental and retail concern.  Some British Satellite investors would would prefer that the consortium end Britain's costly satellite-TV battle through a partial merger with Sky TV.  "If the two companies could work out a way of doing that, it would be of great advantage," one backer says.  The rivals could use Sky TV's satellite system and share pay-TV channels, suggests James Lee, a Boston Consulting Group consultant in London.  "I am almost certain that the time will come when they are going to have to bury the hatchet and try to resolve their differences," Mr. Lee says.  But such a marriage doesn't appear imminent.  Either the two rivals merge now, says Mr. Simonds-Gooding, British Satellite's chief executive, "or they slug it out in the market and one goes bust later.  I think it's going to be a fight out in the marketplace."  A truce in the trans-Atlantic takeover fight for Gateway Corp. paves the way for the planned breakup of Britain's third-biggest food retailer.  But the accord reached Friday between rival suitors also raises questions about the role played by Wasserstein Perella & Co. in the deal, its first major move into Europe.  Under the settlement, a buy-out group led by the U.S. investment firm and Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co. agreed to exchange their 40% interest in Gateway for about the same size stake in Isosceles PLC, a British investor group.  Wasserstein Perella and A&P will split the new stake evenly, making them the two biggest minority shareholders in Isosceles.  Last month, Isosceles won control of Gateway by amassing a 55% stake.  The U.S. bidding group, formally called Newgateway PLC, then lifted its holding further to 40%.  The presence of the antagonistic minority shareholders hindered Isosceles from restructuring Gateway or paying off debt on its highly leveraged buy-out, Europe's biggest ever.  The stalemate prompted several weeks of negotiations.  The accord will give Newgateway two of the five outside-director seats on the board of Isosceles.  It "was clearly a way to accomplish something very quickly and efficiently," Jeffrey A. Rosen, a managing director of Wasserstein Perella, said in a phone interview Friday.  The British investor group wants to split up Gateway by selling its non-food interests and its larger stores.  The group already has a firm agreement to sell 62 of the larger stores to Asda Group PLC, another United Kingdom retailer, for #702 million ($1.10 billion).  Analysts speculated that Wasserstein Perella might want to acquire Herman's Sporting Goods Inc., a U.S. Gateway unit.  "We will have something to say about Herman's," Mr. Rosen said.  But "that's a decision for a year or two from now."  Some London analysts said A&P, a big U.S. food retailer that is 52.5% owned by Tengelmann Group of West Germany, also may seek to buy Herman's.  But whether A&P seeks other pieces wasn't immediately clear.  In a statement, A&P Chairman James Wood said: "The partnership with Isosceles allows us to acquire an important equity investment in a major British food retailer."  David Smith, Isosceles chief executive, said it doesn't intend to sell any Gateway operations either to Wasserstein Perella or A&P.  "We aren't trying to dispose of certain of the assets to certain shareholders," he said in a phone interview.  "That's certainly not the case {now}, or in the future."  He emphasized that through its disposals, Isosceles intends to focus on retailing in Britain.  Britain's Takeover Panel accepted the settlement but rebuked Newgateway for a statement last month that it had no intention of "accepting Isosceles's offer regardless of its outcome."  The Isosceles offer valued Gateway at #2.05 billion to #2.23 billion or between 230 pence ($3.59) and 250 pence a share.  In late trading Friday on London's Stock Exchange, Gateway shares were up 4.5 pence at 241 pence.  The Takeover Panel, in a five-page ruling, noted that it had warned Newgateway about the importance of not making statements "during offers which are not subsequently adhered to."  The U.S. bidding group's July statement may have "raised fears of a stalemate in the minds of shareholders in Gateway" and discouraged them from accepting Isosceles's offer, the ruling went on.  The panel said it nevertheless decided to clear the settlement because the impasse could cause a "disservice to the present shareholders in Isosceles and the remaining public shareholders in Gateway."  By effectively reversing its earlier pledge not to accept the Isosceles offer, Wasserstein Perella looks "very foolish, don't you think?" one uninvolved British banker suggested.  "You would never have a British company get into the kind of position Newgateway has."  Mr. Rosen disagreed, saying the truce "is entirely consistent with that {July} statement."  But Isosceles's Mr. Smith predicted Wasserstein Perella "will proceed more cautiously" in future U.K. deals.  The Mexican government is seeking to regain U.S. duty-free status for its beer exports.  But Mexico is going to have a long wait, until next April, before it learns whether the White House may remove the regular 1.6 cent-a-liter U.S. tariff rate for beer imports from that country.  In the meantime, Mexico and its brewing industry appear to be doing a pretty good business in exporting beer to the U.S., where Mexican brands have been popular in some markets and often command premium prices.  Mexico's beer exports to the U.S., even with the regular U.S. import duty, totaled about $196 million in 1987, $175 million in 1988 and about $54 million in the first five months of this year, according to the office of U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills.  The U.S. cut off the duty-free treatment for beer from Mexico in 1982 after concluding that these imports no longer met the "competitive needs" test under the U.S. generalized system of preferences for imports from developing countries.  At that time, U.S. brewers also were complaining about the competitive imports from Mexico.  Under the GSP program, which is subject to annual review, the U.S. decides each year whether to take various products off the duty-free list or to add items that the governments of developing countries or private business interests in the U.S. or abroad hope to get classified for U.S. duty-free treatment.  The Mexican government and two brewers in that country, Cerveceria Cuahtemoc and Cerveceria Moctezuma, have submitted petitions to the office of the U.S. trade representative requesting a waiver of the general restrictions in the GSP program that deny duty-free treatment for beer imports from Mexico.  The governments of Mexico and several other developing countries eligible for the special U.S. tariff concessions also are seeking U.S. duty-free treatment on many other products they would like to export in increasing volume.  They include fruits and vegetables, chemicals, plastics, gloves and mittens, toilet paper, kitchenware, slide fasteners and numerous other consumer goods, as well as automatic data processing equipment, electronic products and automotive parts.  Petitions have been accepted from the governments of Peru, Colombia, Brazil, Venezuela, Mexico, the Philippines, Malaysia and other countries.  In addition, General Motors Corp. is seeking duty-free treatment for Mexican-manufactured electrical ignition or starting equipment for use on cars and trucks, while the Mexican affiliate of International Business Machines Corp. is supporting that country's efforts to gain duty-free status for digital automatic data processing machines.  However, not all of the petitions received from U.S. industries seek to broaden the tariff preferences for imports from developing countries.  U.S. trade-policy officials also will consider, for example, several petitions from U.S. steel wire rope and cable producers who want to take these imports off the list of eligible duty-free import items.  The U.S. battery trade council, another industry group, says 12 volt batteries also should be removed from the GSP list, while Hercules Inc., of Wilmington, Del., has asked that the current duty-free treatment for imports of cellulose nitrates be ended.  Between now and early next year, U.S. officials will be reviewing all of these petitions.  As part of this review, the U.S. International Trade Commission will hold public hearings in Washington in late September, where anyone who is interested, including representatives of the foreign governments, can argue for or against the changes in the GSP program that have been suggested by various petitioners.  The ITC role, as in previous reviews, will be to conduct fact-finding hearings.  It will advise the White House later about the "probable economic effect" on U.S. industries, and on U.S. consumers, if, for example, waivers were to be granted to broaden the U.S. duty-free list for imports from developing countries, including Mexico.  U.S. trade officials noted that the Mexican beer petition may attract attention, but this isn't the most important single product category involved in the review.  For example, it was noted that the Mexican government also is seeking U.S. duty-free treatment for various types of railroad freight cars to be produced by constructors Nacional de Carros de Ferrocarril for sale to U.S. railroads.  The developing countries and various industry groups in these nations and the U.S. won't learn the final results of the annual GSP review exercise until next spring.  Technically, U.S. trade law requires President Bush to sign off by next April 1 on what changes should be made in the program, effective July 1, 1990.  The U.S. program of special tariff concessions for imports from more than 100 developing countries covers several thousand different products, including both manufactured goods and agricultural items.  The GSP program started back in 1976 and is slated to continue, under existing law, until July 4, 1993, with annual revisions in line with various technical criteria set by Congress.  Mexico and Brazil currently are two of the major beneficiaries of the GSP program.  During the administration of President Reagan, it was decided that such newly industralized countries as Taiwan, South Korea and Hong Kong, once the main beneficiaries of the GSP program, should be "graduated" out of it.  U.S. imports from these major Asian exporters now are subject to the same tariffs that apply to imports of the same types of goods from industrial nations.  During the current review, U.S. officials will be considering other GSP-related issues, aside from adding products to the duty-free list or taking them off next July 1.  They will consider, for example, alleged violations of workers' rights in such countries as Indonesia, Thailand, Nepal, the Dominican Republic, Benin, Haiti, Liberia and Syria.  They also will continue to study whether the U.S. should deny duty-free treatment for imports from Peru, Uruguay, Costa Rica or Venezuela.  These countries have been named in petitions filed by various U.S. groups and companies as having expropriated private U.S. property without compensation.  One of these cases was filed by Occidental Petroleum Co. against the government of Venezuela in 1988, but thus far there has been no decision by U.S. government officials that GSP treatment for imports from from that country should be denied.  At first blush, Robert McNulty's task would seem pretty hopeless.  The 43-year-old California entrepreneur is trying to raise about $100 million for two ventures that so far have no revenue.  Not making matters any easier, investors in another of his ventures -- SportsClub Inc. -- took a $35 million bath on the company, which entered Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law proceedings 18 months ago and in March was ordered to liquidate its assets.  But Mr. McNulty has already managed to raise $26 million for one of the startups -- HQ Office Supplies Warehouse Inc., a Long Beach, Calif., chain of discount office products.  The other venture is A.G. Automotive Warehouses Inc., a chain of warehouse stores selling automotive parts.  Although many venture capitalists are cool to him these days, Mr. McNulty is successfully tapping another source of money -- the general public.  His case shows how an entrepreneur who has had a run of bad luck can still make a comeback.  One thing in his favor is that his new ventures are in hot areas of retailing.  Another plus is that he once hit the jackpot as an entrepreneur.  His chain of home-improvement warehouses, called HomeClub, quadrupled investors's money by the time Mr. McNulty sold out to Zayre Corp. for $151 million in 1986.  In the process, he himself made $10 million, he says.  Among those still willing to back him is D.H. Blair & Co., a Wall Street firm that specializes in selling stock in start-ups, mostly to individual investors.  Through Blair, Mr. McNulty hopes to raise the capital for his new ventures.  Blair has developed a system that effectively raises large sums of money for start-ups, says Kevin Kimberlin, a Blair managing director.  By first selling investment units -- a mix of common stock and warrants -- at low prices and then selling more stock as a company begins operations, Blair creates a steady stream of financing for small companies, he says.  But why would investors be interested in HQ, which is years away from being profitable and a latecomer in a crowded industry?  "Because it's a great concept," answers Richard Weisler, a Raleigh, N.C., physician who owns HQ stock.  "It's a gamble but I am willing to do it.  If the company works, I win big."  Not everyone is as optimistic about Mr. McNulty's strategy.  Critics charge that the brash entrepreneur merely is cashing in on the craze surrounding discount office supplies.  They fear the crowded market could be headed for a shakeout.  "Even though this is going to be a big industry, there's already too many players and too much money here," says Chicago venture capitalist Lloyd Ruth, a specialist in retailing-industry investments.  Others note that HQ, which reported a loss of $1.7 million for its first full quarter of business, has a lofty market value of $90 million.  By contrast, Office Depot Inc., the industry leader, had sales of more than $50 million when it went public at a market value of $110 million.  Mr. McNulty shrugs off such criticism.  "I am already ahead of my business plan at HQ," he says.  A high school dropout, Mr. McNulty worked at a variety of jobs selling home-building products -- as an executive at W.R. Grace Home Centers, a division of W.R. Grace & Co., and at Western Home Improvement Center, a company he launched in 1976.  In 1983 he founded HomeClub, based in Fullerton, Calif.  But the HomeClub experience wasn't always a good one for the entrepreneur, who says he quarreled with venture capitalists on his board over strategy.  An aggressive growth plan soon exhausted the company's capital, and when Mr. McNulty went to his financial backers for more, they provided the funding but forced him and other HomeClub managers to reduce their stake.  When a venture like HomeClub is a runaway success, entrepreneurs usually can turn to their grateful investors for financing for a subsequent venture.  But nearly all of Mr. McNulty's HomeClub investors balked at his next idea, a HomeClub-type chain for sporting goods.  "SportsClub wasn't an idea that lent itself to discounted retailing," says Mr. Ruth, the venture capitalist, himself a HomeClub investor.  Mr. Ruth says he didn't invest in SportsClub because he wasn't impressed by the managers Mr. McNulty assembled.  Besides, the company was valued too high, he says.  Nonetheless, Mr. McNulty raised over $35 million from a new group of investors, including Oak Investment Management, Westport, Conn., and HLM Partners, Boston.  After quickly launching eight California warehouse stores, SportsClub soon ran into trouble.  Many of the major retailers such as Nike and Reebok that Mr. McNulty hoped to attract refused to sell to him.  "They didn't like the idea of someone selling their shoes at such deep discounts.  They also seemed uncomfortable selling their stuff in warehouses," says one SportsClub investor.  Mr. McNulty blames SportsClub's problems on the managers he entrusted the business to.  "The guys who were running the business didn't understand it.  Instead of working out the problems with one or two stores, they expanded too fast," he explains.  By the time he himself took over managing the business it was too late.  After the SportsClub fiasco, Mr. McNulty decided to seek new avenues for financing.  He says he likes D.H. Blair's system because it creates a steady flow of capital at share prices that already have been established.  "You don't have to haggle with an investor every time you need money," he says.  It also gives him more control over his ventures.  "There aren't any investors on the board to tell you what to do and what not to do," he says.  Some investors are skeptical Mr. McNulty can handle several ventures at once.  But Mr. McNulty remains undaunted.  "Good concepts and good managers will always find investors, he says."  The Romantic poet Lord Byron was born with a crippled foot and a great genius.  Perhaps compensating for both, he led a multifarious sex life that resulted in repeated bouts with venereal disease.  In 1816 his publisher, John Murray, recognizing that Lord Byron had become almost as famous for his sexual exploits as for his poetry, thought of a way to capitalize further on his celebrity author.  Mr. Murray hired John Polidori, a young doctor, to tend to the poet's ailments during his travels -- and to take notes for purposes of a kiss-and-tell biography.  Polidori did not end up ghosting the 19th-century equivalent of "The Andy Warhol Diaries."  His sister cut out the naughty parts.  Now, however, the novelist and scholar Paul West, imagining what must have been deleted (and possibly more), has come up with the diary that would have put Polidori on the best-seller list of his day.  Writing as though he were Polidori (the way Polidori wished he could write), Mr. West has turned in a slyly learned and bawdily obsessive account of one man's fatal attraction for another: "Lord Byron's Doctor" (Doubleday, 277 pages, $19.95).  Though Polidori had his own talents -- at 20 he was the youngest medical graduate of the University of Edinburgh -- he was a Byronic wannabe.  He wanted to be lusted after by women and men, to be passionate yet coolly sophisticated and, above all, to be a Famous Writer palling around with other famous writers.  Mr. West has a remarkable gift for mimickry; in a previous novel, "The Place in Flowers Where Pollen Rests," he convincingly assumed the voices of Hopi Indians.  Here he's switched to something altogether different.  His Polidori speaks with the voice of an entirely believable educated Scotsman living in the early 19th century.  Not that his Polidori would feel out of place in the late 20th century.  This young striver would have been thrilled to see his face on the cover of People, had it existed in 1816.  He's infected with a desire to be somebody else -- anything but a doctor in an age when the leech, not aspirin, was the common remedy of choice.  Lord Byron's talent eventually becomes an irritant to Mr. West's Polidori, who is disgusted that so valuable a gift was distributed to a vulgarian, a man whose way of "priming" a chambermaid for sex was to smack her hard in the belly.  The mewling Polidori is certain that he feels Byronic rages and sorrows, but he is mute and frustrated.  "I stood there, getting exercised, all for naught," writes West's Polidori.  "Milord would have spewed forth a poem about it had he been there.  Out they always came, like a snake's questing tongue.  Each poem seemed ready-made, and I suspected that he had within him poems stored like baker's loaves. . . ."   Mr. West, who has written 11 novels and nine works of nonfiction -- including a study of Byron -- plays his scholarly interest in the Romantic writers and their Gothic literature against his extravagantly mischievous imagination.  So his Polidori can write just as vividly and acutely about the makings of a Gothic story or the absurdities of 19th-century medicine as he does about Lord Byron's genitalia -- which are a source of endless fascination for the young doctor, who claims to be repulsed by the subject even as he dwells on it with giddy erudition.  Ever-complaining and always jealous, Polidori describes himself as a "serf," as "a moon to {Byron's} planet," and trails the poet across Europe to the Villa Diodati, the mansion Byron rented outside Geneva.  Mr. West clearly is fascinated by the now-legendary time Byron spent at the Villa Diodati with Percy Shelley and his mistress, Mary Godwin, and her half-sister, Claire Clairmont, another Byron groupie (who became pregnant by him).  Almost half the book is spent there, amid the literary and sexual hijinks that many people have speculated inspired Mary Shelley to write "Frankenstein" the following year. (Mr.  West isn't the first to be lured by the goings-on at the Villa Diodati.  Ken Russell's lurid 1984 film "Gothic" was inspired by Villa Diodati and its colorful assortment of hypersexed guests.)  Polidori circles around Byron's clique wearing the sneer of the outcast.  He refers to Shelley as "the Shelley person."  He has sex with the pregnant Claire after it's become plain that Byron has wearied of them both.  One starts to sympathize with Byron.  Even amusing snivelers like Polidori soon wear out their welcome.  Mr. West's maneuvering of Polidori's jealousy brings to mind playwright Peter Shaffer's portrait of the Hapsburg court composer Salieri in "Amadeus."  Mr. Shaffer portrayed Salieri as a competent musician who composed by the book only to be upstaged by a foul-mouthed, "unworthy" prankster named Mozart.  But unlike Mr. Shaffer, Mr. West doesn't show the slightest bit of sympathy for Polidori's ludicrous envy.  He simply allows Polidori to debunk the idea that great artists are necessarily great men or women.  His Byron is a hypochondriac, a sadomasochist, a cold-hearted manipulator who infuriates the tremulous Polidori but gives Mr. West the pleasure of playing with great material -- a pleasure he generously passes along in this always original and entertaining novel.  Maxus Energy Corp. said Darrell L. Black, senior vice president, international, was named to the new position of vice chairman and chief administrative officer of the oil and gas concern.  David R. Henderson, vice president, international exploration, was named to succeed Mr. Black, and Harvey R. Klingensmith, vice president, North American exploration, was named to succeed Mr. Henderson.  Earl Ritchie, exploration manager, Gulf Coast division, will succeed Mr. Klingensmith.  In addition, the company said Donald C. Mielke, senior vice president, finance and administration, was named senior vice president and to the new position of chief financial officer.  He also will assume the treasurer's position.  Glen R. Brown, formerly vice president and treasurer, was named vice president, controller, succeeding Peter McCook, who is retiring from the company.  Maxus also said Andy Gupta, general manager, international operations, was named to the new position of vice president, international operations.  The Federal Reserve will decide today whether to disqualify four big Japanese securities firms as major players in the U.S. Treasury bond market.  The betting on this politically explosive issue is that the Fed will permit the four -- U.S. units of Nomura Securities Co., Daiwa Securities Co., Nikko Securities Co. and Yamaichi Securities Co. -- to remain primary dealers in Treasury bonds, but will urge Japan to open its securities markets further to foreign firms.  Primary dealers are an elite group of 42 firms that deal directly with the Federal Reserve Bank of New York when it buys and sells Treasury securities as part of its open-market operations.  Thirteen are controlled by foreign institutions: seven Japanese, three British, and one each from Canada, Hong Kong and Australia.  A provision in the 1988 trade law requires the New York Fed and the Federal Reserve Board in Washington to deny primary-dealer status to foreign financial institutions based in countries that deny similar competitive opportunities to U.S. firms.  The provision in the law, passed in August 1988, gave countries one year to make sure those opportunities were accorded.  Fed staff members have studied government securities markets in Britain, West Germany, Japan and Switzerland.  But the provision in the trade law is primarily aimed at Japan.  Three Japanese commercial banks, Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd., Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan Ltd. and Sanwa Bank Ltd., each controls a U.S. primary dealer, but are unaffected by the legislation.  While the primary-dealer issue isn't directly related to the friction between the U.S. and Japan over trade issues, it is important to U.S. firms, because the Japanese government bond market is the second-largest in the world, after the market for U.S. government securities.  Moreover, Japanese funds play too important a role in financing U.S. budgetary needs to warrant kicking the four Japanese securities firms out, according to executives at U.S. and Japanese houses, as well as people familiar with the Fed's thinking.  In recent years, foreign cash -- particularly Japanese -- has played an increasingly bigger role in financing the U.S. budget deficit.  At times, Japanese investors have accounted for 20% to 30% of the purchases of Treasury bonds at a single auction.  Though not all of these funds flow through Japanese securities firms, "There's no question that the Big Four (Nomura, Daiwa, Nikko and Yamaichi) have added clients that the Treasury otherwise might not have seen," says Robin S. Koskinen, a former executive vice president at Nomura's U.S. unit who built that firm's primary dealership.  To the Japanese, primary-dealer status offers prestige and access to new business.  Many big U.S. institutional investors will do business only with primary dealers.  In addition, several Japanese banks are known to be interested in developing or acquiring primary dealers once the political air is cleared.  Investment bankers specifically mention Mitsui Bank Ltd. and Bank of Tokyo Ltd.  It is also widely believed that Fuji Bank Ltd. will seek to acquire control of Kleinwort Benson Government Securities Inc., in which it has a 24.9% stake; the remainder is held by the parent, Kleinwort Benson Group PLC, London.  Not everyone is expected to be pleased with a decision that permits the Japanese firms to keep their primary-dealer status.  Fed watchers say that Fed Governors Martha Seger and Wayne Angell are considered relative hard-liners on the issue of foreign access to the Tokyo market.  Nonetheless, Rep. Charles E. Schumer (D., N.Y.), one of the architects of the primary-dealer amendment, said, "Giving the Japanese some time is the right approach, considering the progress they've made."  But he warned: "If American firms aren't on an equal competitive footing by next year, then the law will have to be invoked."  Japan in the past several years has taken significant steps, under prodding from the U.S. and other countries, to increase foreign participation in its government debt markets.  For example, the Japanese government last April began selling 40% of each issue of 10-year bonds -- the instrument through which Japan does the overwhelming share of its funding -- through an auction system.  The remaining 60%, pricing of which is based on the auction, is distributed to an underwriting syndicate with fixed allocations for each firm.  Before April, 20% of the monthly issue of 10-year bonds was sold under a much more restrictive form of tender.  In earlier periods, all of the 10-year bonds were sold through a syndicate tightly controlled by Japanese financial institutions.  In addition, foreign underwriters' fixed share of the syndicated portion of each bond offering was increased to nearly 8% from 2.3%, effective last October.  Foreign firms also were allowed to become "comanagers" in the syndicate.  "A negative finding (by the Fed) would be explosive and would do serious damage to the informal process" of prodding Japan to liberalize its markets further, says a banker familiar with the Fed's thinking.  Noting that both West Germany and Switzerland use underwriting syndicates to issue their bonds, a senior executive at one of the Big Four said, "If they point the finger at the Japanese, they'd have to point to the Germans and Swiss, too."  Criticism of either country could affect Deutsche Bank AG and Union Bank of Switzerland, both of which are seeking to become primary dealers.  Britain already uses an auction to issue government bonds, or gilts.  Ideally, U.S. firms would like Japan and other countries to issue all of their government securities through a full auction system, such as that in the U.S.  In fact, Nomura, Daiwa and Yamaichi have advocated the same.  But this is something the U.S. can't deliver.  "Who are we to tell any country that they should run their securities operation like we run ours?" a U.S. official says.  Nonetheless, the Fed is expected to ask Japan and other countries to make some specific technical adjustments in their government bond markets.  Bankers say Japan's Ministry of Finance is reluctant to abandon the syndicate, because it sees itself as a protector of smaller Japanese securities firms and banks that most probably would be crowded out in a fully competitive auction.  And while some U.S. executives remain skeptical of Tokyo's willingness to open its market fully to outside competitors, most concede that Japan is moving in the right direction.  "Grudgingly, I do believe that that system has evolved in a way that's reasonable, although it has further to go," said Jon S. Corzine, partner in charge of government securities trading at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Several major advertising agencies, their clients jittery from recession and takeover fears, say ad spending is falling below their expectations in this year's second half.  And agency executives say they don't expect any relief until next year -- at the earliest.  "The entire market seems to have softened in the last six months," says Terry Bannister, chief operating officer of Saatchi & Saatchi Co., which owns Saatchi & Saatchi Advertising as well as Backer Spielvogel Bates Worldwide.  At Interpublic Group of Cos., another big ad agency holding group, Philip H. Geier Jr., chairman and chief executive, says second-half revenue will be "slightly less than what was anticipated," though it will rise from 1988.  The unusually soft market reported by these agencies seems to have come as a surprise, and several are scrambling to combat it.  At Backer Spielvogel, Chairman Carl Spielvogel says he had expected revenue in this year's second half to rise 6% to 7% from a year earlier; instead, he says, clients "across the board" are clamping down on increases, and revenue will be flat.  The agency hasn't won any major new business lately, and he says the agency stopped hiring about a week ago, though it isn't laying off employees.  "Both the U.K. and the U.S. spending patterns have flattened out.  There isn't any expansion in the billings budgets we're looking at," Mr. Spielvogel says.  Ever the optimist, however, he adds, "I think, come January, there will be a little more confidence, and I look for an upturn then."  Mr. Spielvogel's observations about the unexpected sluggishness are echoed throughout the Saatchi empire.  Five months ago, Saatchi stunned investors by abruptly announcing that 1989 pretax profit would drop from 1988's disappointing level.  At the time, company officials attributed the trouble partly to "deferred" spending by some advertisers; that pent-up spending, they said, would kick in during the second half of Saatchi's fiscal year, which ends Sept. 30.  Now, however, Saatchi's Mr. Bannister says that while some "deferred" spending is indeed showing up, "the market in which that takes place is softer than it appeared to be" in March.  What's more, he says, the deferred spending now kicking in isn't as high as expected in some cases.  "The market as a whole is weakening," he says.  "We're in a post-merger situation in a soft market, so it slightly compounds the difficulty."  Saatchi, though, does get some small solace: At the time of its March announcement, other agencies were quick to pounce, saying that they didn't see any sluggishness in spending.  "And now what's happening is, they're all saying it isn't quite as brilliant as it was going to be," Mr. Bannister says.  At Interpublic, meanwhile, Mr. Geier says McCann-Erickson is on target to reach its revenue projection for the second half, though a spokeswoman adds that "15 to 20" people will be laid off because of last month's loss of the account for RJR Nabisco's Winston and Camel brands.  Interpublic's Lintas unit, however, is falling short of revenue projections, Mr. Geier says.  The agency's major problem is the Eastern Airlines account, which went from between $80 million and $90 million in expected billings at the beginning of the year to less than a third of that now, owing to the carrier's Chapter 11 reorganization filing.  Lintas's other major difficulty is the RJR Nabisco confection business, which slashed its ad budget after RJR was purchased by Kohlberg, Kravis & Roberts last year.  Unilever also has deferred some spending, industry executives say.  Last week, Lintas laid off about 40 people and said it wouldn't fill an additional 35 jobs.  Mr. Geier adds, however, that both Interpublic agencies will meet their financial projections for the full year.  Like Mr. Spielvogel, he is optimistic about 1990.  Clients "are starting to talk about next year, and they're forecasting better numbers than they normally would," he says.  Certainly, not all agencies report lower spending than they initially expected.  WPP Group PLC's chief executive, Martin Sorrell, says revenue at the company's J. Walter Thompson and Ogilvy & Mather units is in line with expectations.  At Ogilvy, which recently lost the Kraft General Foods Maxwell House coffee account, "there are a few clients whom I would characterize as cautious, and there is some slight erosion with some clients, but there are several other clients who are increasing their budgets quite sharply," says Kenneth Roman, chairman and chief executive.  Top executives at Omnicom units BBDO and DDB Needham and at privately held D'Arcy Masius Benton & Bowles, also say they haven't seen any unusual weakness.  Some executives suggest that agencies surprised by lower than expected spending may have been overly optimistic earlier in the year.  But some industry experts believe that a spending slowdown appears fairly widespread.  "We've been in an economic expansion that's cooling off.  The indications are that there's going to be a little more unemployment in the U.S., and pockets of the country that might be pretty tough -- even recession-like," says Robert Coen, McCann-Erickson's widely followed advertising forecaster.  In June, Mr. Coen raised his 1989 ad-spending prediction to a 6.9% increase from an initial prediction of a 6.1% gain.  "Maybe I was right the first time," he says now.  "I'm wondering whether I was a little too quick in revising it upward."  ---  Foote Cone Loses Account  First Chicago Corp. put its $5 million to $7 million account up for review Friday, ending a relationship with Foote, Cone & Belding Communications that dates to 1931.  A spokesman for First Chicago said the two had mutually agreed to part ways because of an "emerging conflict of interest situation resulting from Foote, Cone & Belding's expanding work for Citicorp."  As reported, Citicorp is reviewing its Citicorp Illinois Savings account currently at N W Ayer and is most likely to award it to Foote Cone, industry executives say.  People familiar with the banking giant's plans say Chicago-based Foote Cone is also the leading contender for another piece of Citicorp business, its branch banking franchise.  Included in that assignment is advertising for banking communities in 10 states.  Billings on either assignment haven't been disclosed.  Ayer will continue to handle Citicorp's banking advertising in New York and also its national corporate image work.  Foote Cone services Citicorp advertising in more than 10 countries.  ---  Sears Campaign Is Cleared  Sears Roebuck's ad campaign touting price cuts "on over 50,000 items" was given the green light from the Better Business Bureau after a review.  The campaign, which promotes Sears's "Every Single Day Pricing" program introduced March 1, was reviewed by the bureau's National Advertising Division after a request by Montgomery Ward in April.  Montgomery Ward asked the division to study a number of Sears's claims, including the 50,000-item claim, which Montgomery Ward said it believed counted each size and color variation of certain store items as separate units.  It said a price-matching pledge was illusory and questioned the use of some in-store signs.  The review panel, however, substantiated all of the claims in the campaign.  A Sears spokesman declined to comment, but Montgomery Ward issued a three-page news release detailing its dissatisfaction.  The panel's case report "falls far short of resolving {Sears's price-matching policy} and other questionable and confusing advertising claims made by Sears which risk jeopardizing the reputation of the retail industry," the statement said.  Ad Notes....  NEW ACCOUNTS: Allied-Lyons PLC's Baskin-Robbins Inc., Glendale, Calif., awarded its estimated $10 million account to Asher/Gould, Los Angeles.  The account had been handled by WPP Group's J. Walter Thompson, Los Angeles. . . .  Super 8 Motels Inc., Aberdeen, S.D., awarded its $3 million to $4 million account to Cramer Krasselt, Chicago.  The account had been handled in-house.  The Navy chose General Electric Co. to be the sole supplier of engines for its F/A-18 jet fighters through 1996.  GE said the decision could mean sales of more than $2 billion if the Navy exercises all of its purchase options.  Beginning in 1982, the Navy purchased F404 turbo-fan engines for the planes from both GE and United Technology Corp.'s Pratt & Whitney unit, although GE garnered 90% of the business.  GE said the Navy's decision to make it the sole supplier of the engines is expected to keep its Lynn, Mass., engine plant producing the engines at the current rate of nearly two dozen each month.  Under the purchasing plan approved by the Navy, GE could sell 40 to 400 of the engines annually, according to the company.  GE also received a $22 million Army contract for tactical command and control systems.  Separately, Boeing Co. received a $185.1 million Air Force contract for 50 KC-135 engine modification kits.  New Bedford Panoramex Corp. received a $22.7 million Navy contract for electronics components.  Robert E. Derecktor of Rhode Island Inc. received a $14.5 million Navy contract for two tugboats.  Space Data Corp. received a $12.1 million Air Force contract for sounding rockets.  The Food and Drug Administration, broadening its efforts against corruption in the generic-drug industry, plans to scrutinize the work of independent drug-testing laboratories.  Special inspections of about 15 laboratories that perform pre-market testing for generic-drug companies will be part of the agency's surveillance strategy for ensuring the safety of generic products and countering corporate fraud in the troubled industry.  The FDA has approved hundreds of generic drugs for marketing on the strength of test data from these laboratories, and now the agency intends to double-check the validity of the data for many generic products.  The new initiative was disclosed Friday as Health and Human Services Secretary Louis Sullivan announced a plan to bolster the FDA's enforcement powers and hire additional inspectors and other personnel for the agency's reorganized generic-drug division.  The plan would increase the generic-drug staff to 300 from 80 and would require an $18 million budget increase.  At the same time, Dr. Sullivan sought to reassure consumers about the safety of generic drugs in the face of disclosures about falsified data being filed with the agency and the guilty pleas of three former FDA officials who took payoffs from company officials.  A loss in public confidence in so-called generics -- low-cost copies of brandname prescription drugs whose patents have expired -- would undercut the government's efforts to hold down health costs.  "We have no evidence that the safety or effectiveness of generic drugs has been compromised," Dr. Sullivan said in a statement.  The department's plan, added FDA Commissioner Frank Young, "will enable us to fully confirm that generic drugs now on the market are indeed safe and effective."  Dr. Sullivan said that the department also will seek legislation clarifying and strengthening the FDA's authority to remove a generic drug from the market if fraud was involved in its approval.  The agency, among other things, wants the power to debar drug makers convicted of fraudulent practices, including paying bribes to FDA officials who review drug-approval applications.  Drug makers compete fiercely for early approval because the first company to market a generic copy of a brand-name drug can capture -- and hold -- a big part of the sales.  The plan also calls for the appointment of an ombudsman within the FDA to hear complaints from drug makers, consumers and agency whistle-blowers, and to ensure fairness in drug approvals.  The agency has been under growing pressure from Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.) and other lawmakers to tighten regulation of the generics industry.  Sen. Orrin Hatch (R., Utah), ranking minority member on the Senate Labor and Human Resources Committee, welcomed the plan.  "It is my strong belief that sufficient evidence has been uncovered to warrant these changes," he said in a statement.  As reported, the FDA has begun testing various versions of the 30 top-selling generics on the market, ranging from such antibiotics as amoxycillin and penicillin to the pain reliever ibuprofen.  In addition, the agency has been scrutinizing the manufacturing practices of 11 generic drug makers.  Under the new plan, FDA inspectors will be sent to the independent drug-testing laboratories to collect samples of pre-market batches of generics they tested.  The aim is to verify the test data that drug makers originally submitted to prove that their products are the "bio-equivalents" of the brand-name drugs they mimic.  Dr. Sullivan proposed charging drug makers so-called user fees to review their drug applications.  The revenues would be used to pay for the proposed increase in regulatory manpower.  Congress has rejected the idea of user fees three times in the past four years, preferring instead to increase FDA appropriations.  Tadeusz Mazowiecki stands on a balcony in the Sunday sunlight before a cheering crowd in a church courtyard.  By his side is Lech Walesa.  "Together we will build Poland," the prime minister-designate tells the Solidarity supporters.  Mr. Mazowiecki is interrupted by strong chanting from the back of the crowd.  "We want bread," the hecklers shout, "not a prime minister."  Finishing what he has to do before interruption is the greatest task facing the man set to be Poland's first non-Communist prime minister since World War II. Only four months ago, the trade union Solidarity became legal here.  In a breath-taking change last week, Solidarity's political arm managed to pull a large chunk of power away from the Communists and president Wojciech Jaruzelski and is in the process of forming a Solidarity-led government.  That's fast work.  But it may not be fast enough in a nation where Latin American-style inflation and a foreign debt of some $40 billion are devastating the life of the populace.  Indeed, measures the new government will have to take to push the nation toward recovery could worsen things over the short term.  The test facing the new 62-year-old leader is of historic proportions.  "Reform" is a tarnished word in Eastern Europe, where for decades Communist regimes have wasted their people's good will as well as Western funds in the name of change that has failed to improve the standard of living or bring full political freedom.  For Solidarity and its partners to succeed where Communists have failed, they will have to complete an internal revolution as daunting as their ascent to power: They must convert a trade union to a force for the free market.  To attend a Mass for Solidarity followers in Gdansk's red brick St. Brygida Church is to witness the national will to meet that challenge.  "Poland lives," sing pensioners, veterans in red and white armbands, and children sporting red Solidarity pins.  The priest, draped in white silk, begins the ceremony with an announcement that brings unchurchly applause: "Poland's first Catholic prime minister takes part in this Mass."  The sermon is about Saint Jeremy, who like Mr. Mazowiecki was in prison and "needed to be rescued."  Seated by the altar along with other Solidarity leaders is the gray-browed Mr. Mazowiecki.  When he and Mr. Walesa receive Communion the entire church kneels with them and prays.  That is appropriate.  For something like a miracle is what the career journalist and dissident will need to turn around the Polish economy.  Officially, the inflation rate is 150%; unofficially, it is far greater.  Today, 7,000 zlotys buy one dollar on the black market, compared with 2,000 just last year and 600 in 1987.  Politically, the new government may be taking over at an opportune moment but economically things couldn't be worse.  Just two weeks ago the government freed food prices as part of its reform program, doing away with the meat-rationing system that's been around since the time of martial law.  The result has been a run on meat that means the lines and discontent are even greater than before.  Similar shortages exist in products such as sugar, shampoo and matches.  The government Solidarity is building to meet such challenges represents radically new territories for a clan of unionists.  Intellectuals and economists have played an important supporting role in the resistance movement during the long years it had been banned under martial law.  Mr. Mazowiecki himself is an example.  He served in Parliament from 1961 to 1971 and published an important dissident weekly in the early Solidarity era.  His work for the group landed him in prison for a while.  Now for the first time such background figures as he become some of Solidarity's leading faces.  Mr. Walesa, Solidarity's hero, is refraining from taking office himself.  Mr. Mazowiecki this week is expected to fill other Solidarity-controlled ministry spots with people like himself.  For now at least, the sentiment in the churchyard indicates, the new government will have the workers' support.  To resolve the economic crisis, though, Solidarity will have to take measures that result in yet greater shortages and higher prices -- at least over the short haul.  They will have to refuse workers' demands that wage increases be indexed to the racing inflation.  They will also have to restructure and cut back the industries that are the main source of Poland's malaise, meaning layoffs.  Such measures will hit hardest the union's own constituents, the workers who rallied around the outcast union and brought it to power in the first place.  Western aid may help but will not be a panacea.  American Barbara Piasecka Johnson, for instance, may succeed in rescuing the historic Lenin shipyard here in Gdansk with a $100 million purchase of a majority share of the yard.  But such massive philanthropy won't be available for most of Poland's rusty heavy industry.  If the fledgling democracy is to fly, Poles may be asked for some paradoxical sacrifices, such as forsaking what until now has been their principal political weapon: the strike.  Here among the Gdansk cranes Solidarity was born nine years ago out of walk-outs that involved reinstating a handful of workers and getting a 2,000-zloty pay raise.  When President Bush called on Warsaw this summer, Solidarity leaders asked for $10 billion of the Polish debt to be forgiven.  The Bush administration has offered outright aid of about 1% of that, $119 million.  The Common Market is matching that with a like amount of food aid.  But the extraordinary political change taking place here now may move President Bush or Congress to open America's pocketbook.  In giving Solidarity and its partners the economic portfolio, the Communists are dumping on them the most thankless task.  President Jaruzelski and the Communist Party retain control of foreign affairs and the interior ministry, in other words, the military and the police.  They therefore remain a threat to their non-Communist partners.  At the moment though, it is the Communists who are struggling with a confidence crisis; their leaders spent all weekend meeting in emergency plenum over how to handle the new situation.  If the Communists disintegrate, some fear, chaos may ensue, triggering military intervention from within Poland or from outside.  "Poles are anarchists," said an official who works in foreign affairs.  "And the hope is that this time will be the exception and they will overcome their anarchy."  It is a tradition that goes back to the 18th century when Polish nobles proudly refused to fund a provisionary army, telling the royalty that they were pleased to be "unruly."  The result was a nation partitioned by more powerful and decisive forces from Russia, Prussia and Austria.  It would be tragic if such a mentality were to trigger a clampdown.  The extent of the fiercely anti-Communist mood is indicated in an exchange between Solidarity supporters and hecklers at the Gdansk churchyard as the adversaries shout "Reds" at one another.  The nearly universal hope in Poland, however, is that Communism has gasped its last breath.  The refrain from the Mass in Gdansk held for the future prime minister rings throughout the land: "Poland must live, Poland must grow."  ---  Ms. Shlaes is editorial-features editor of The Wall Street Journal/Europe.  The Nuclear Regulatory Commission, in a report on a testing mishap June 22 at the Seabrook, N.H., nuclear plant, confirmed Seabrook officials' explanation of the incident.  But in a letter to Public Service Co. of New Hampshire, Seabrook's 35.6%-owner, commission officials said they "remain concerned" about Seabrook plant managers' faulty handling of the mishap.  The NRC said officials of New Hampshire Yankee, which operates Seabrook for its utility owners, committed "potential violations of NRC requirements" during the test.  The commission said it will decide on "enforcement action" concerning the incident, after meeting with Seabrook officials on Sept. 7.  The NRC also scheduled a public meeting on the incident for Sept. 6 in Durham, N.H.  The incident threatens to delay Seabrook's long-delayed commercial start-up.  The plant was shut down June 22 during a low-power test because of a malfunctioning steam valve.  In their report on the incident, NRC officials stated that the plant's safety wasn't threatened during the test.  But they noted that New Hampshire Yankee's plant operators and supervisors failed to stop the test for several minutes after the steam valve malfunctioned, even though NRC observers present at the time told the Seabrook managers that test procedures required the reactor to be shut down.  After being told by an NRC observer that the reactor was in a mode requiring shutdown, one Seabrook manager "continued to watch the in-progress test, appeared to take no action, and gave no oral response," according to the NRC report.  The NRC report also criticized plant managers for "apparent willingness" to proceed with further Seabrook tests before a thorough review of the mishap was conducted.  Following the plant shutdown, New Hampshire Yankee realigned senior management at the plant and instituted new operating and reporting procedures.  In its report, the NRC stated that New Hampshire Yankee's Seabrook operators and managers "now recognize that testing {of the nuclear plant} can proceed only if done so in accordance with test procedure requirements."  Edward A. Brown, New Hampshire Yankee's president, said the NRC's report on the incident is "generally consistent" with New Hampshire Yankee's earlier report on it.  A spokesman for New Hampshire Yankee said it will "review the NRC report to see if further actions are needed.  But we don't foresee a delay in full-power licensing" needed for Seabrook's commercial start-up.  New Hampshire Yankee previously said it expects to receive the license by the end of this year.  Geo.  A. Hormel & Co., citing the continuing benefits of its long-term shift to higher-margin, branded food products, said net income jumped 24% in the third quarter ended July 29 on a 3.1% sales increase.  The meat and food-processing concern reported net of $14.3 million, or 37 cents a share, up from $11.6 million, or 30 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose to $564 million from $546.9 million.  The earnings improvement came despite continued "significant expenditures invested in support of major new product introductions," Hormel said.  After 18 months of adding new regional markets, the company has nearly completed the introduction of its Top-Shelf microwavable entrees, designed to remain fresh on grocery-store shelves without freezing.  Its newer Chicken by George line is just getting under way.  The heavy advertising and other product-development costs associated with the new lines served as a drain on earnings and will continue in the current quarter, Hormel said.  The company noted that its traditional consumer products "continue to perform well."  For years, said a spokesman, the company has been moving away from commodity-oriented meats; "the margins are much better in value-added, consumer-branded products," he said.  "We're now known as primarily a food company, rather than a meat packer."  In the first nine months, net climbed 20% to $37.8 million, or 98 cents a share, from $31.4 million, or 82 cents a share, a year earlier.  The higher earnings came on sales that stayed essentially flat at $1.64 billion.  This rural outpost, 400 miles northeast of Helena, has one stoplight and five ostriches.  Other inhabitants include mountain lions, Nubian ibexes, African sheep, Asian goats, and llamas.  There are 2,500 people here, too, a number of whom -- 10 maybe -- have turned to exotic-animal husbandry as a way around drought and persistent rural recession.  To make money, in other words.  Nobody knows why people are taking up this sideline -- here particularly -- but they are.  At least, says Steven Howard, county attorney and ostrich rancher: "It's more interesting than cattle or sheep."  So when breakfast conversation down at Randy's Cafe turns to the subject of eggs, it might just be a local banker and Mr. Howard discussing ostrich fertility rates -- and counting their $3,000 chicks before they are hatched.  Sometimes, the talk concerns elk velvet -- another Plentywood export.  The fuzz-covered immature antlers that sprout each year from elk heads are, in powdered form, a popular aphrodisiac in Korea and elsewhere in Asia.  People here figure the rising price of antlers has to do with the 1986 nuclear-reactor disaster in Chernobyl.  Radioactive fallout from the plant contaminated the reindeer feeding grounds in northern Scandinavia.  Hence, Koreans, who also have a lot of discretionary income these days, are shopping for elk antlers in Montana.  Local grain-store operator Harry "Tubby" Hilyard, meanwhile, has only to display his huge red welts to prove he is telling the truth about the time one of his 150-pound mountain lions bit through his arm.  "If you act afraid, they won't let go," he says, speaking from experience, adding that he had to talk reassuringly to the big cat for several seconds before it let him loose and went back to its customary dinner of beef tartare.  Mr. Hilyard bought his first mountain lion, Hobo, from a zoo in southern Montana and tried keeping it as a pet.  But "he didn't take to my wife, and cost me a couple of drapes," he says.  Now Hobo guards the feed store.  Not everyone here is an exotic-animal enthusiast, far from it.  Robert Kane, a local veterinarian for 24 years, says there is little established demand, except from other breeders, for many of the animals people here are raising.  He expects the prices some exotic animals and their byproducts fetch will go down as more producers jump in.  "This looks a lot to me like what we had with chinchillas 20 years ago," he says.  "We had at least three breeders here who lost all their investment."  But exotic-animal entrepreneurs don't look back just to be dissuaded by history.  Mr. Hilyard's scheme is to build a hunters' paradise.  He plans to fence in about 100 acres of his ranch five miles north of town and hold lion hunts in the hills and gullies.  Customers will pay (he hopes) up to $10,000 to stalk and shoot a male lion.  An additional few thousand acres of land he owns eventually could be used for bighorn sheep shoots, at a fee something more like $1,000 a head.  But for the moment, the food bill is mounting for his pride of lions.  "They go through a cow a week," says the portly 50-year-old, who has helped clean out many a local deep freezer.  People give him pastits -- prime meat they are throwing out, also their sick cattle.  Meanwhile, back at the Big Sky Ostrich Ranch, Mr. Howard, the county attorney, and Jerry Wiedebush, the president of Security State Bank, are eagerly awaiting the birth of their first ostrich chick.  Eggs the size of grapefruit, weighing four pounds each and gleaming like porcelain, rotate once an hour in their small wooden incubator.  Mr. Wiedebush got the idea to raise ostriches after reading a magazine article last year about the money to be made in breeding the big birds.  He brought Mr. Howard in on the plan.  Their two ostrich hens, Sally and Lonnie, have laid more than 50 infertile eggs, much to the consternation of Plentywood's after-hours ostrich ranchers.  Of course, even unhatched eggs aren't a total loss: Some people are willing to pay $35 for one they can paint and resell as art.  The real potential payoff is in chicks, which can fetch $3,000 at the age of 10 weeks.  The ranchers hope eventually to build a troop of 20 to 24 birds, some of which they might sell as leather and feathers.  Mr. Howard, dodging an attempt by Lonnie to peck the glasses off his face, is among those who have noticed that the current market for chicks is almost exclusively other breeders.  Ostriches normally go for the warmer climates of Africa and the Near East.  Plentywood is just 18 miles south of the Canadian border.  Nevertheless, the eight-foot-tall birds didn't appear to suffer during their first Montana winter last year, when outdoor temperatures dropped to 30 below zero.  "We didn't even turn the heat on in the barn," he says.  The ostrich ranchers lost one bird, however, after it swallowed a piece of ice and bled to death from the throat.  Plentywood got its start in animal exotica partly because of Walt Arion.  The lean, weather-beaten rancher took up exotic game ranching eight years ago, raising small numbers of Nubian ibexes, fallow deer, yaks, bezoar goats, mouflons, buffaloes and elk.  His ranch is named Elk Haven, but he recently sold 15 of his 26 elk to Canadian buyers as breeding stock.  He made the sale to pay off some of what he had borrowed from banker Wiedebush, the latter-day ostrich breeder.  His success at finding buyers for his most exotic breeds has been mixed.  "Everybody thinks I'm making a mint," Mr. Arion says.  "But you don't move this stuff in a minute."  One of the area's largest offbeat animal outfits is south of town, where Robert Spokley and his son-in-law, Bill Nyby, tend a herd of about 100 elk.  In the past several weeks, they have been tranquilizing their two-year-old bulls.  The elk then are blindfolded and their velvet-covered antlers, which will sprout again next year, are sawed off. (Ranchers must take care to cut above the pedicel, the growth bud at the base of each antler; otherwise, next year's output could be seriously deformed.)  Buyers from Korea swing through this time of year to buy the 10- to 14-pound antlers, which ranchers keep fresh in their freezers.  Buyers pay $70 to $75 a pound.  Although in Asia the antlers are ground up and used as aphrodisiacs, Mr. Spokley says, "Let's not forget they use them for medicinal purposes, too."  He doesn't know of any in particular, but he is sure there are some.  Mr. Spokley said that certain elk raisers also have hunts on their property.  He isn't interested, but not for humane reasons.  "There's no point," he says, "in shooting an animal that will produce $700 to $1,000 a year for 20 years."  Here's something different in bedtime stories.  In hotels around New York City, housekeepers are training for the race of their lives.  They still vacuum and scrub bathrooms, but a select few -- the swiftest of the swift -- are mostly pounding pillows and making beds -- lots of them.  The housekeepers, one each from the Waldorf-Astoria, the Pierre, and about 60 other ritzy hotels, will square off Thursday at the first annual "Fastest Hands in the East" contest -- a beat-the-clock competition sponsored by the Hotel Association of New York City to determine who is the Big Apple's fastest bed-maker.  Publicity, of course, could be the reason for the contest, but the association says it's intended to boost the morale of hotel employees.  Contestants will vie for the "Brass Bed," a 15-inch trophy featuring a brass bed and real linens.  That may never rival Oscar, but the winner also walks away with a four-day trip to Miami for two.  When the starting gong sounds, contestants will scurry to make their cot-sized beds in the traditional hotel style -- and that means no short sheeting.  Bed-makers must be fleet with the sheets, of course, but they are also required to tuck in everything, using hospital corners and folding the top sheet over the blanket.  The competition should be tough.  Rosa Gonzalez, a housekeeper from the Doral Park, and Soledad Garrido of the New York Penta, each say they have developed a sure-fire plan to shave their time.  They make up one side of the bed completely, then rush to the other side to finish the job.  Both women say they can now make a bed in two minutes flat.  But faster still is Josephine Ahenkora, a housekeeper at the Drake, who recently beat nine other of the hotel's housekeepers with a time of 72 seconds.  What's more, Drake housekeepers had to make beds using not only the usual two sheets under the blanket but, to make the elimination event tougher than Thursday's, a third sheet on top.  Gary Kettering, a Drake employee who timed the race, says: "It was a riot."  Like the Olympics, he adds, with cheers of "Get the corner tighter" and "Smooth out those wrinkles."  Like many top athletes, Mrs. Ahenkora saves herself for the arena.  "I never make my bed before work," she says.  Raven Industries Inc. President and Chief Executive Officer David A. Christensen said the company will increase its quarterly cash dividend 25% and report that net income for the second quarter ended July 31 rose 24% to a record $1.2 million, or 38 cents a share.  He said that today Raven will announce a dividend rise to 7 1/2 cents a share from six cents a share, payable Oct. 13 to stock of record Sept. 20.  A year earlier, the manufacturing concern had net of $991,000, or 31 cents a share.  Per-share figures are adjusted to reflect a 2-for-1 stock split paid July 14.  Mr. Christensen said Raven also expects to report today that sales rose 12% to $21.8 million from $19.4 million.  The sales increase was led by a 28% jump at the applied technology division, which makes cold-weather military uniforms, plastic sheeting and high-altitude balloons.  Operating profit more than doubled at the unit.  Mr. Christensen attributed the company's improved earnings in part to a decline in the cost of resin, a raw product used for making plastic films, polyethylene tanks and glass fiber products.  In the sportswear division, including ski wear, western outer wear and Gore-Tex military and hunting clothes, operating profit rose 9% on a 10% sales rise.  Sales and operating profit in the electronics division, which makes products such as agricultural sprayer controls, rose 7%.  The plastics division, which makes glass fiber tops for pickup trucks and glass fiber bodies for utility trucks, had a 36% increase in operating profit, despite a 2% decline in sales.  Mr. Christensen said Raven is renewing a search to make acquisitions in the plastics or electronics industries but isn't involved in any talks.  For the year ending Jan. 31, Mr. Christensen said he expects to report "record" sales and profit, but declined to elaborate; last year, the company had net of $2.9 million on sales of $77.6 million.  Mr. Christensen said Raven will resume tests this winter on a device that applies the technology in the agricultural sprayer control system to trucks that spread gravel and salt on icy and snowy roads.  The company won't begin full-scale marketing of the control product until 1990, he added.  Mr. Christensen said Raven, which manufactures ski wear and outdoor clothing in competition with Chinese producers, expects to benefit from the disruption of textile production in China in the wake of student demonstrations this summer.  He also said the U.S. Air Force earlier this month awarded Raven a three-year contract valued at as much as $6 million to produce an electronic temperature control device for C-130 cargo transport plane engines.  The agreement includes a firm order for $2 million in parts and options to purchase an additional $4 million, Mr. Christensen said.  In the second quarter, government contracts made up about 25% of Raven's sales, the company said.  President Bush said last week that he didn't expect a quick resolution of the hostage crisis.  That means the U.S. needs a long-term strategy to deal with the problem, and part of that effort should involve coordinating international pressure against Syria.  As Mr. Bush noted, Iran has the most influence over the Shiite Moslem groups that are holding eight U.S. hostages somewhere in southern Lebanon.  The White House is using a number of intermediaries, including Pakistan, Turkey and the Soviet Union, to communicate with Tehran's new, supposedly more pragmatic regime.  But Syria also has significant influence in Lebanon.  It deploys about 40,000 soldiers there and maintains a tight system of security checkpoints that provide significant information about the activities of the various groups operating there.  Damascus airport is a transit point for many Iranian officials and much of the material bound for Lebanon.  If Syria were to cooperate with the West, it could make matters difficult for those holding hostages.  The U.S. has been asking Damascus for help, but the results have been disappointing.  "We're just a little bit exasperated," says a senior U.S. official.  "They aren't doing all they could do."  Syria claims that the U.S. overestimates its influence in Lebanon and that it can do little amid the chaos that has engulfed that land.  But U.S. officials reject that excuse.  They note that when U.S. journalist Charles Glass was kidnapped briefly in Lebanon in 1987, Syria provided the U.S. with useful information from its checkpoints on almost a daily basis.  This would be an ideal time to squeeze Syrian President Hafez al Assad's regime.  His economy is weak, he is bogged down in heavy fighting against Christian forces in Lebanon, and his relations with his major patron, the Soviet Union, have become tentative now that Moscow has expressed interest in playing a more positive role in Mideast affairs.  To be sure, Washington's ties with Syria are so limited that the U.S. doesn't have much direct leverage over Mr. Assad.  And the Syrian president isn't likely to cross his close ally, Iran.  But Paul Jureidini, a Mideast expert at Abbott Associates, a consulting firm, says other nations "certainly could use pressure to make sure that Syria doesn't play the role of spoiler in the region."  Adding to Syria's possible susceptibility at the moment, one of its main sources of outside aid, a $500 million annual payment from Saudi Arabia, ran out last year.  The Saudis had pledged at a 1978 Baghdad summit to make the payments for 10 years; they announced last year that the aid package wouldn't be renewed.  Moreover, a prolonged drought is forcing Syria to import wheat this year, increasing pressure on its foreign exchange reserves.  In Lebanon, Gen. Michel Aoun, the Maronite commander of the Lebanese army, is waging war to force Syria to leave Lebanon.  Gen. Aoun is backed by Iraq, Syria's bitter enemy.  Mr. Assad's current brutal effort to crush the Maronite Christians has aroused protests from the U.S., France, Arab nations and the pope.  The situation illustrates how vulnerable Mr. Assad has become in his effort to protect his influence in Lebanon.  Moscow also is no longer the dependable ally it once was.  Two years ago, Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev shocked Mr. Assad during a Kremlin toast when he said that it was abnormal for the Soviet Union to have no diplomatic relations with Israel.  The Soviets also strongly back Palestine Liberation Organization leader Yasser Arafat, a foe of Mr. Assad.  In November, Mr. Assad celebrates the 19th anniversary of his assumption of power.  Although he appears to be firmly in control, he is politically vulnerable.  He rules Syria largely with members of his Alawite sect, which is a small minority there.  He suffered a serious heart attack five years ago.  Also, Iraq, having ended its long war with Iran, now is in a position to make trouble and repay him for his support of Iran.  Despite these weaknesses, Mr. Assad is a skilled and ruthless leader who has overcome major challenges before.  He isn't likely to crumble under pressure.  But he also wants international respectability and a positive relationship with the U.S.  As the hostage crisis recedes from the front pages, it is important for the U.S. to maintain a long-term strategy for bringing it to an end.  And part of that effort must involve dealing with Mr. Assad's Syria.  American Stores Co. said the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit will issue a mandate today that could clear the way for its merger with Lucky Stores Inc.  In San Francisco, the appeals court confirmed the one-sentence order without further comment.  Technically, the order would make official the appeals court's decision March 31 to reverse an injunction that had blocked the merger.  Its mandate will order a lower court to remove that injunction permanently.  The move, barring a last-minute intervention from the nation's high court, could enable the supermarket chains to combine operations.  American Stores acquired Dublin, Calif.-based Lucky last year for $2.51 billion.  However, American Stores said California Attorney General John Van de Kamp has petitioned the U.S. Supreme Court for a continuation of the injunction.  He has opposed the move on antitrust grounds, arguing the merger could end up costing California consumers as much as $400 million by reducing competition and raising prices.  A spokesman for the California attorney general confirmed that he appealed the merger to the high court but had no further comment.  A spokesman for American Stores said he was "very pleased" by the appeals court ruling but, because of continuing appeals, declined to speculate about any timetable for the merger.  Waxman Industries Inc. expects to post a 16% increase in fiscal fourth-quarter net income, to $2.2 million, or 24 cents a share.  It expects sales to more than double, to about $94.5 million, Armond Waxman, president and co-chief executive officer, said.  In the year-earlier period, ended June 30, the wholesaler of plumbing, electrical and hardware products for the do-it-yourself home-repair and replacement market earned $1.9 million, or 21 cents a share, on sales of $40.9 million.  On a pre-tax basis, earnings rose about 40% to $3.3 million from $2.4 million.  Mr. Waxman noted the latest quarter's tax rate was 34%, compared with 19% a year earlier.  In fiscal 1989, Waxman earned about $7.4 million, or 80 cents a share, up from the $6.6 million, or 71 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 58% to $241 million from $152.4 million.  Mr. Waxman attributed the sales and earnings gains to healthy operating performance in its existing division, as well as the strong contribution of newly acquired Ideal Group of Cos.  He said the Canadian firm, whose financial results have been included for only two months, has already contributed to profit and sales, in spite of the added $10 million in interest costs related to the purchase.  "We can expect our growth to continue," he said.  Sales in the current fiscal year should double to nearly $500 million and earnings per share should increase by about 25%, Mr. Waxman said.  Waxman, which has grown through an aggressive acquisition strategy, doesn't anticipate any additional purchases in the near future.  "I feel we have a lot right now and want to maximize what we have," he said, adding that the company would always consider a unique acquisition opportunity.  As a result, the company doesn't expect the need for any additional financing.  Waxman issued $100 million in senior subordinated debt to help finance the Ideal transaction and retire existing bank debt.  Mr. Waxman said that while leverage remains high, he's "comfortable" with the current situation, given the increased earnings.  Mr. Waxman said the company will grow internally by adding warehouses and expanding retail accounts.  In the past six months, Mr. Waxman said the company has concentrated on two relatively new product lines -- audio video accessories, such as cables and connectors, and Spray Sensation, a line of shower and bath accessories.  It also began a new marketing campaign using full-color, rotating point-of-purchase displays to better explain how to use plumbing and other household supplies.  Called Project Helpers, the programs are designed to assist both the customer and retailer.  Mr. Waxman said he doesn't expect the company to suffer if the economy softens.  Indeed, the do-it-yourself market is traditionally strong in a downturn as consumers have less money to spend on new homes.  C.R. Bard Inc. said it halted shipping its New Probe angioplasty catheter at the request of the Food and Drug Administration.  Bard's shares declined after the announcement, while shares of SciMed Life Systems Inc., a competitor that also makes catheters, shot up.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Bard shares closed at $20, down $1.50.  SciMed shares jumped $12.125, closing at $48.125, in national over-the-counter trading.  About two million Bard shares and 1.1 million SciMed shares changed hands.  Bard's catheter ran into trouble earlier this year when the devices' tips began to break off during operations on patients, an FDA spokesman said.  Bard modified the device and resumed marketing.  Some analysts speculate that complaints from competitors led the FDA to conclude the modified probe is really a new device that requires the agency's review and approval.  Bard said it has been preparing a submission and expects to send it to the FDA by the end of August.  It estimates that the New Probe catheter could be introduced again by early next year.  Before the new device gets to market, though, some analysts believe Bard's stock will continue to drop.  "The decline in C.R. Bard stock does not reflect the seriousness of the problem," said Edward Mutsch, a senior health care analyst with Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood in Minneapolis, where SciMed is based.  "The stock will go lower."  Bard estimated that earnings for 1989 would be reduced by 25 cents a share because of the action.  Mr. Mutsch said SciMed could earn as much as $2 a share because of the announcement.  For the second quarter, Bard earned $21.8 million, or 39 cents a share, on sales of $201 million.  Pacific Telesis Group and the Communications Workers of America signed a tentative agreement on a new contract, ending a 15-day strike.  Negotiators for the company and the union shook hands on the three-year pact at 1:15 a.m. PDT yesterday after a marathon bargaining session.  The new contract, which must be ratified by CWA members, calls for an average wage increase of 3.1% the first year, 3.7% in the second year and 2.6% in the final year.  The agreement also would increase Pacific Telesis's lump-sum annual incentive award as well as expand family care benefits.  To settle the contentious health care issue, the company and union negotiators agreed to set up a preferred provider network of hospitals and doctors.  Pacific Telesis, one of four regional Bell companies struck by the CWA, is the first to get its workers back on the job.  Pacific Telesis, based in San Francisco, has about 42,000 employees represented by the CWA in California and Nevada.  Bell Atlantic Corp., which reached a tentative agreement Thursday with CWA officials on major issues such as wages and benefits, still must resolve so-called local issues with each of its telephone companies.  Over the weekend, the company said it reached tentative agreement with the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers in Pennsylvania.  But within Bell Atlantic's territory, IBEW members remain on strike in New Jersey.  The IBEW represents 2,000 workers at Bell Atlantic's Bell of Pennsylvania unit and 9,000 at New Jersey Bell.  If agreement is reached soon in New Jersey and local issues such as job titles and work rules are resolved with the CWA before a deadline tomorrow, Bell Atlantic union employees could be back to work by Wednesday.  The IBEW strike in New Jersey raises some uncertainty, however, because CWA officials have said the union won't cross IBEW picket lines.  The IBEW's New Jersey unit could conceivably place picketeers at key offices throughout Bell Atlantic territory.  Bell Atlantic, based in Philadelphia, has phone companies in Delaware, Washington, D.C., Maryland, New Jersey, Pennslyvania, Virginia and West Virginia.  No progress was reported at Nynex Corp., based in New York, or at Chicago-based Ameritech Corp.  Both sides in those strikes haven't met since the walkouts began.  Nynex workers went on strike Aug. 6.  Ameritech was struck on Aug. 13.  Leaders of Solidarity, the trade union that suddenly finds itself the Polish government, came home to Gdansk from Warsaw yesterday to do what they have always done during nine years of struggle.  They prayed.  In Solidarity's home church, St. Brygida, a packed Sunday Mass applauded through tears as parish priest Henryk Jankowski introduced Solidarity leader Lech Walesa and Poland's prime minister-designate, Tadeusz Mazowiecki.  "Gdansk will pray for you, Poland will pray for you," intoned Father Jankowski to a congregation of workers from the Lenin Shipyards, Solidarity's birthplace, and other Poles from all over.  "Gdansk won't let you down.  Poland won't let you down," the priest continued.  Solidarity will need all those prayers and all that support.  Having achieved the highly unlikely, being asked to form the East bloc's first non-Communist government in more than four decades, Solidarity must now attempt the nearly impossible.  The nine-year-old labor union, outlawed until just four months ago, has to quickly clean up an economic basket case of a country without being able to control the police, the army or the huge bureaucracy, all of which remain with the politically discredited but still powerful Communist Party, according to the deal that brought Solidarity to power.  The entire East bloc, and in particular the Soviet Union, is watching anxiously to see if Poland can make the painful shift to a market-dominated economy without setting off massive unrest.  Successful reforms in Poland will do wonders for Moscow's resolve to attempt the same, while a disaster in Warsaw could set the Soviet's back years.  The avoidance of a popular uprising in Poland will put the Soviets at ease politically as well, reinforcing Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev's promise in July not to intervene in the affairs of East European countries as long as they remain nominally socialist and in the Warsaw Pact.  But Solidarity's task is daunting indeed.  To cure Poland's 100% annual inflation rate, deal with its mammoth $39 billion foreign debt, and above all try to get more food in the shops fast, Solidarity will probably have to resort to the kind of economic belt-tightening programs that labor unions -- including Solidarity -- traditionally oppose.  Food prices will rise yet again -- bread and meat prices go up today -- in an effort to persuade farmers to produce more.  Solidarity will tell its people to pay and wait until bountiful production brings down prices.  "Our policy cannot be soft," says Warsaw Solidarity chief Zbigniew Bujak.  Solidarity knows it won't get much time, even from its own supporters.  And all the while they must keep an eye on the Soviet Union to the east, insuring stability at home to ward off a possible Russian intervention, while cajoling Western banks and governments to aid their fledgling democracy.  The enormity of it all led Solidarity to resist until last week joining a coalition government, changing its mind only when allowed to name the prime minister and dole out most of the other cabinet portfolios.  But even now a sizable minority within the union thinks taking over is a mistake.  By staying in opposition, this group thinks, Solidarity could have walked away with the next legislative elections in four years and would have been in a much stronger position to sweep away the Communist Party apparatus.  But Mr. Walesa, who declined the premiership, preferring to remain Solidarity's guiding light outside the government, decided that Solidarity would lose more political face by turning its back on a nation in crisis.  His call for a broad coalition, his offer of the defense and interior ministries to the Communists, and his carefully stressed statements that Poland would remain in the Warsaw Pact, led to a swift and peaceful transfer of power with nary a tank revving up in Warsaw or Moscow.  The speed of the change has left most Poles gasping in disbelief.  "I was in tears when I saw Walesa and Mazowiecki," sobs a young blond mother named Janina, shepherding four young blond daughters in the St. Brygida churchyard.  "We have our prime minister now.  It's amazing."  When asked if things will get better, she says, "I hope so, because they are so bad."  Not so, replies Leszek Bednarscuk, who is standing nearby.  "Things are wonderful.  We have our prime minister.  The people will support him."  But not all of them.  Yesterday, in the churchyard, Mr. Walesa had to silence a gang of young hecklers who shouted, "We want bread, not a prime minister," a reference to chronic food shortages.  "If you know how to make bread, come forward," an emotional Mr. Walesa told them.  "Poland must be built.  Bread must be baked.  Change requires effort."  Poland's whole post-war history is stacked against it.  Every crisis of mass discontent over the past 40 years has been ignited by an increase in food prices.  Solidarity was born in the aftermath of food-price rises in 1980, and it rode the food-price rises of early 1988 back into prominence over 18 months of strikes and desperate negotiations to avoid strikes.  The country's enormous overspending on food subsidies forced the departing government on Aug. 1 into increases in the price of food that outstripped those that went before.  While the increases were agreed upon in talks between Solidarity and the authorities and are supposedly cushioned by increased wages, they couldn't pose a greater challenge as Solidarity comes into government.  The big question now for Solidarity is where to start.  Among other problems, Solidarity itself is divided between free-market economic liberals and those who favor hefty protection for workers.  Mr. Walesa himself retreats into generalities and faith when asked how he'll cure the economy.  "We will lead the society, but the society itself must solve the problems," he says.  "It won't be easy," says Walesa lieutenant Bronislaw Geremek.  "We need a good economic plan," he says during a break in yesterday's all-day Solidarity meeting in Gdansk.  Do you have one? he is asked.  He laughs, walks away, comes back and says: "That's a question that can't be answered today."  Solidarity will have many more meetings here before it can assemble a government and cobble together a program.  The union, which has drawn in academics and journalists but has no experienced government members, was clearly more comfortable opposing than proposing.  In recent days, Solidarity economists have produced assorted economic plans, ranging from Thatcherist liberalism to Mitterrandian social democracy.  One plan, proposed by Solidarity journalist and economist Aleksander Paszynski, calls for the immediate cutting of subsidies to state industries, a renegotiation of Poland's economic deals with Comecon -- the Soviet bloc's version of Western Europe's common market -- a moratorium on $10 billion of Poland's foreign debt, and an immediate devaluation of the zloty.  While Mr. Paszynski recognizes the pain this all would cause, he insists that "the impatience of the people can only be met by getting started."  Solidarity's immediate problems include a government rife with corruption and inertia among the million or so Communist Party loyalists who run most factories and ministries.  Recent moves to spur private industry have shown results but haven't made a dent in food shortages.  Until wages are no longer indexed to price increases, inflation will continue to gallop.  Some Solidarity members favor slashing military spending and firing half the party hacks.  Others worry that this will lead to violence that Poland can't afford.  Another problem is just how readily the Communist Party will adapt to its sharply reduced role.  Saturday evening, at a turbulent session of the party hierarchy, president Wojciech Jaruzelski finally told his apparatchiks that they must give up their long-held monopoly on power.  The party's weakness had become all too clear.  Its candidates lost heavily in elections that were slanted in their favor, and it lost control of the lower house of Parliament despite being the biggest party.  Gen. Jaruzelski himself was elected president in July by just one vote.  His hand-picked choice for prime minister, former Interior Minister Czeslaw Kiszcak, tried and failed to form a government when two small parties in Parliament, the Peasant Party and the Democrats, revolted after 40 years of submission.  It is the support of these two small parties that gives Solidarity the votes it needs in Parliament to form the new government.  The Polish Communist Party's reaction to its new status up to now doesn't bode well.  Its new leader, Mieczyslaw Rakowski, has furiously condemned the formation of a Solidarity government as a "counterrevolutionary coup d'etat" and declared the beginning of a new "struggle for power."  Reuters news agency reported yesterday that the party's Central Committee is already demanding a larger role in the new government.  "The Communist Party's representation in the new government must correspond to its political and state potential," Reuters quoted a Central Committee resolution as saying.  "Otherwise, we will not be able to assume co-responsibility for the course of developments."  The resolution also criticized the two smaller parties that joined forces with Solidarity last week, Reuters reported.  While all this may be political posturing in part, Solidarity will surely face stubborn resistance if it attempts to dismantle the "nomenklatura" system, or bureaucracy, throughout Polish society.  As long as the nomenklatura persists, the implementation of economic reform will continue to be painful and ineffective.  Combined with the strong possibility of strikes for higher pay, the result could be a debilitating conflict.  Just 16 months ago, Poland's riot police smashed the strikes that launched Solidarity's return to prominence.  As they prepare today to run the government, one question must weigh on Solidarity's leaders: If civil strife breaks out in a Poland under non-Communist rule, what will the Communist-controlled riot police do then?  Another uncertainty is how the new Solidarity government will get along with Gen. Jaruzelski, who as president has the right to veto legislation, dissolve Parliament and call elections.  He will remain commander-in-chief of the armed forces, with the power to declare martial law.  This makes him still Poland's uncontested political boss.  Solidarity's choice of nominee for prime minister, Mr. Mazowiecki, is itself a sign of the union's reticence to take control.  He is a Roman Catholic intellectual, an editor who has preferred to stay out of the spotlight.  He has spent much of the past 30 years in and out of jail opposing the establishment, and more recently, whispering in the background while Mr. Walesa fired up a crowd.  The 62-year-old Mr. Mazowiecki (whose full name is pronounced TAH-day-OOSH mah-zoh-VYET-skee) gave his first television interview sitting in the leafy garden of a nunnery that houses blind children.  Tieless, his jacket thrown over his shoulders, he explained that the peacefulness of the nunnery and the quiet determination of the blind children give him inspiration.  However Solidarity decides to start, it is banking on a long-enough political honeymoon to enable it to suck in foreign aid while it reforms the moribund economy.  So far, the West has promised only $240 million in aid, including $119 from the U.S., in a program being coordinated by the European Community.  But the West wants to see genuine reform of the economic system and the establishment of a market economy, before it delivers even that.  Can Solidarity deliver enough, fast enough, to keep Poland together?  The two outside countries most interested are both reacting cautiously.  The Bush administration has called the developments here encouraging, but isn't rushing to pump in more cash just yet, and is warning the Soviet union not to butt in.  Sen. Alan Cranston of California, who is in Poland with three other Democratic senators, says he doesn't think the Russians will interfere.  What is the difference between 1989 and 1981, when Gen. Jaruzelski declared martial law under Soviet pressure?  Sen. Cranston answers in one word: "Gorbachev."  Officially, the Russians called Solidarity's reaffirmation of Poland's membership in the Warsaw Pact "sensible" and said Poland's political problems are her own to settle.  So far, most Poles and most Western analysts believe them, figuring the Russians have enough of their own problems.  Many Poles, in fact, think Mr. Gorbachev wants Solidarity to succeed in order to strike fear into his own moribund party rank and file.  Others, who remember 1981, fear that if Polish pluralism infects the neighboring Baltic republics of the Soviet Union too quickly, the Russians could well intervene.  But such concerns are far from the minds of the joyous crowds greeting their returning heroes in Gdansk.  "Our prime minister," they chant over and over, as if convincing themselves it is true.  Mr. Mazowiecki, addressing the multitudes from Father Jankowski's front porch after Mass, asks himself and the crowds, "How can I make everyone happy?"  His answer, "We must all do it together.  I just have to believe that we can do it."  Patrick E. Malloy III, a Sag Harbor, N.Y., investor, said he holds a 6.31% stake in New York Bancorp and may seek a greater role in the bank holding company.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Malloy said he holds 208,000 New York Bancorp common shares, including 48,000 bought from July 6 to last Wednesday for $9 to $11.125 a share.  Mr. Malloy said he considers the stock to be undervalued and continues to monitor developments relating to his investment.  "Mr.  Malloy may seek to influence the company to implement investment strategies designed to maximize stockholder values," the filing said.  He might also consult with other interested stockholders, the filing added.  New York Bancorp is based in North Hills, N.Y.  Recently unsealed court documents disclose that Occidental Petroleum Corp. over the past decade has paid millions of dollars for art projects closely identified with Armand Hammer, its longtime chairman and chief executive officer.  The documents, filed in Delaware Chancery Court, also show that the company began planning and excavation work for a new museum bearing Dr. Hammer's name well before a special committee of Occidental's board approved donations totaling $86 million for the project.  The information was compiled for litigation relating to shareholder suits challenging Occidental's support of the museum.  It was unsealed last week at the request of this newspaper and the Los Angeles Times.  There has been no suggestion that Occidental's donations were illegal.  The company says its outlays for the projects have benefited Occidental and its shareholders with favorable publicity and good will.  But ties between the company's money and Dr. Hammer's art often have been obscured.  For instance, Occidental agreed in 1980 to an outlay of more than $5 million to buy a notebook of drawings and scientific writings by Leonardo da Vinci.  The money was channeled through the Armand Hammer Foundation, which apparently made the purchase.  The da Vinci works had been known for centuries as the "Codex Leicester," after the British noble family that owned it.  But although they were purchased with Occidental's funds, Dr. Hammer and Occidental have insisted since the purchase that the works be called the "Codex Hammer."  Also, Dr. Hammer repeatedly has made statements that suggested that he bought the work with his own money.  Only months before the purchase, Occidental paid a $1.7 million obligation of the Armand Hammer Foundation to finance improvements at the Frances and Armand Hammer Wing of the Los Angeles County Museum of Art.  Not only did the company pick up the tab for the initial improvements, but it provided another $350,000 for an escalator that Dr. Hammer thought would be convenient for museum visitors.  In a deposition this June, the 91-year-old Dr. Hammer at first insisted that he personally donated the nearly $2 million to the Los Angeles art museum.  He reluctantly reversed that position when he was read a resolution by Occidental's executive committee authorizing the donation.  Dr. Hammer long has portrayed himself as a foremost art collector, valuing what he suggests is his personal collection at about $400 million -- an appraisal questioned by some outsiders.  Although he had promised repeatedly to donate the bulk of his collection to the Los Angeles County Museum, Dr. Hammer astounded the art world last year by reneging on that promise, announcing instead that a new museum bearing his name would be built to house the collection.  The new "Armand Hammer Museum and Cultural Center" is being built adjacent to Occidental's headquarters and the company is paying $50 million for its construction.  The museum will operate rent-free for 30 years on Occidental property in the upscale Los Angeles suburb of Westwood, and the company has agreed to buy a $36 million annuity to provide for the museum's future funding.  Court documents show that the company launched this project well before a special committee of outside directors approved it earlier this year.  Excavation at the site began months before the directors' February approval of the project.  Dr. Hammer hired New York architect Edward Larrabee Barnes late in 1987 to design the museum and began other planning late that year.  So intertwined were Dr. Hammer's art projects with company business that Occidental's chairman couldn't remember in his recent deposition whether he, his foundation, or the company had paid Mr. Barne's bills for early architectural work on the museum.  Not until Jan. 19, 1988 -- two days before the museum was announced in a press conference that had been scheduled previously by Dr. Hammer -- did Occidental's executive committee approve initial planning but not construction on the project.  In February, the special committee mulled the project's merits.  A gaping hole had already appeared next to Occidental headquarters for underground parking and the museum's foundation.  After a little over two hours of discussion, the directors formally approved the museum and company donations, subject to certain tax rulings, which since have been granted.  Recognition Equipment Inc. said its $3.9 million loss for the third quarter ended July 31 put it in violation of certain terms of its debt agreements with its main U.S. bank lenders.  However, the maker of data processing equipment said it has received waivers of the covenants while it negotiates amendments.  The company said it expects to complete the negotiations before its fiscal year ends Oct. 31.  Recognition said the waivers also applied to a credit agreement with its employee stock ownership plan.  In June, Recognition amended its credit agreements and eliminated a major portion of its bank lines.  At the time, it said it owed $18.5 million, including $7.1 million that was lent to the ESOP by Chemical Bank.  Recognition said it also has small credit lines from a bank group led by NCNB Texas National Bank, a unit of NCNB Corp.  The company said the loss in the latest quarter resulted from a revenue decline and continued litigation costs.  Recognition and two former executives are scheduled to go to trial Sept. 27 on criminal charges of fraud and conspiracy related to an effort to win $400 million in U.S. Postal Service contracts.  Revenue fell 11% to $59.5 million from $66.8 million last year.  In the year-earlier third quarter, Recognition had net income of $1,000.  For the nine months, Recognition posted a loss of $4.4 million, wider than $3.8 million a year ago; that loss included a $3.6 million charge from a change in accounting for spare parts and a $168,000 operating loss.  Revenue fell 5% to $188 million from $198 million.  The Resolution Trust Corp. said it will pay insured depositors in a failed Iowa savings-and-loan association and will transfer the assets of three other failed S&Ls to banks.  The RTC is a new federally-chartered government agency established to sell or merge the nation's ailing S&Ls.  The RTC said Friday it would make payments to insured depositors in Sioux Valley Savings & Loan Association in Cherokee, Iowa.  Sioux Valley Savings & Loan was closed Friday, and the RTC was named receiver.  Deposits in the S&L totaled about $90.4 million.  Almost all of the deposits are believed to be within the federal-insurance limit of $100,000 per depositor, the RTC said.  The payments to insured depositors will begin within a few days, the agency said.  Separately, the RTC said it would transfer about $86 million in insured deposits from First Federal Savings & Loan Association of Coffeyville, Kan., to Bank 4 Coffeyville, National Association.  The RTC also said it would transfer about $79 million in insured deposits from Evangeline Federal Savings & Loan Association in Lafayette, La., to Hibernia National Bank in New Orleans.  The RTC also said it would transfer about $85 million in insured deposits from Century Savings & Loan Association in Baytown, Texas, to NCNB Texas National Bank in Dallas.  First Federal, Evangeline Federal and Century all were closed Friday.  UAL Corp., groping for a response to a $6.19 billion takeover bid by Marvin Davis, appears likely to respond favorably to any overtures by British Airways PLC.  British Air, working with Morgan Stanley & Co.'s leveraged buy-out fund, expressed interest in bidding for United Airlines' parent last week as the UAL board reviewed its options with its adviser, CS First Boston Group.  "There's a warm relationship, a great respect and trust" between UAL's chairman, Stephen M. Wolf, and Sir Colin Marshall, British Air's chief executive officer, according to a person familiar with both sides.  That relationship was cemented last year when UAL's directors, at Mr. Wolf's suggestion, held a board meeting in London and met later with Sir Colin and British Air Chairman Lord King of Wartnaby at a private reception and dinner.  Both airlines already have nearly two years of experience working together under a joint marketing agreement.  The harmony of that relationship was recently underscored when United announced plans to fly to Europe for the first time.  Although the carriers will be competing directly on some routes, the companies quickly pointed out they intend to continue their cooperative arrangement in many markets.  British Air, for instance, still sees ample opportunities to transfer its passengers to United's U.S. and Mexican flights.  Likewise, United passengers still can use British Air for flights to many parts of Europe, Africa and the Middle East.  British Air and UAL both wouldn't comment on the takeover situation.  As a foreign carrier, British Air couldn't legally own more than 25% of any U.S. airline, nor could British Air exercise any semblance of control, under U.S. Transportation Department rules.  However, the British carrier could inject hundreds of millions of dollars in equity into any bid, as long as other U.S. interests retain 75% or more in voting control.  That would still leave plenty of room for United's unions and Mr. Wolf to participate in the bid.  Morgan Stanley's LBO fund could be used to provide any additional equity needed to reach the 75% level.  "The winning bid is the pilots, the machinists, management and British Airways," one investment banker predicted.  Each of those four has something valuable to contribute to any transaction, although bringing the unions together may prove difficult, the banker said.  Morgan Stanley is already familiar with UAL because it was the airline company's longtime investment banker before being replaced by First Boston in 1987.  The switch took place during a siege against what was then Allegis Corp. that prompted a sell-off of the company's hotel and rental-car interests.  British Air clearly has other options.  For instance, it can team up with other interested U.S. bidders, or wait and join forces later with the ultimate winner in any auction process.  Whatever course it chooses, British Air has reason to believe its involvement in any bid won't run into regulatory trouble.  Although as recently as Friday, Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner said he remains "very concerned" about foreign ownership stakes in U.S. airlines, the department hasn't objected yet to a single one.  Last month, two foreign companies, KLM Royal Dutch Airlines and Elders IXL Ltd. of Australia contributed $480 million out of $700 million in equity financing in the recent sale of NWA Inc., the parent of Northwest Airlines.  However, the two companies' combined voting interest is under 20% because $400 million of the two firms' stake is in preferred stock.  KLM and the group led by Alfred Checchi that bought NWA had only a vague-sounding "understanding" to cooperate in certain areas, including synchronization of schedules, customer services, and joint marketing and sales.  However, the accord says that neither side "will enter into other arrangements which are contrary to the purpose or spirit of the cooperative arrangements."  Although it doesn't legally amount to control, the pact certainly provides KLM with the opportunity to exercise influence over NWA.  Mr. Skinner warned, however, that he intends to ensure "any transaction is not constructed in such a way" that it skirts current law.  He said the Transportation Department can monitor transactions, such as the KLM-NWA deal, on a continuing basis.  In addition to the Morgan Stanley-British Air team, Texas investor Robert Bass expressed interest last week in bidding for UAL. Mr. Bass is already familiar with UAL assets; he teamed up in 1987 with Aoki Corp., a Japanese hotel and construction company, to buy UAL's Westin Hotels unit for $1.53 billion.  Since then, the partners sold off two of the hotels for $735 million.  Mr. Bass's use of Merrill Lynch & Co. as his financial adviser could handicap him initially in dealing with UAL's unions.  An official of the United machinists union complained that a Bass proposal "starts out with baggage" because Merrill Lynch helped arrange the sale of Eastern Airlines in 1986 to Texas Air Corp., which is led by Frank Lorenzo, considered an enemy by airline unions.  A pilots union official voiced a similar sentiment, but said it wouldn't necessarily be a barrier to talks.  The pilots union, meanwhile, is continuing its effort to strike a deal with United management that would include an ownership stake for employees in a management-led buy-out.  However, the company has rejected all of the union's proposals thus far.  The pilots union has said it would prefer to work with UAL's current management, but the union has said it will seek out other partners if it can't reach an agreement with Mr. Wolf.  Meanwhile, Mr. Davis, whose bid touched off the current scramble for UAL, is expected to announce his bank financing sometime in the next week.  Such a move would counter the idea that Mr. Davis isn't a serious suitor, but only wanted to trigger a bidding war to drive up UAL stock.  Mr. Davis has previously been reported to own a 3.5% UAL stake, but his current holding isn't known.  If Mr. Davis comes up with a financial structure that includes equity and bank debt without any high-yield, high-risk junk bonds, he would be better able to ward off criticism from UAL unions and government officials.  Transportation Secretary Skinner said he will take a hard look at any leveraged buy-out.  The pilots union warned its membership last week that in a leveraged buyout, an outside bidder would be likely to strip assets and curtail the airline's growth plans.  The wrestling match over the assets of oil man W. Herbert Hunt has heated up again.  Last week, Mr. Hunt amended his original reorganization plan, reducing his own share of any settlement.  Meanwhile, a different plan was filed by Minpeco S.A., a Peruvian minerals concern that won a $132 million judgment against Mr. Hunt, his brother Nelson Bunker Hunt and others last year in a case stemming from their alleged attempts to corner the silver market in 1979-80.  The proposals come on the heels of a plan filed jointly by the Internal Revenue Service, which claims the brothers owe $1 billion in back taxes, and Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co., which is seeking repayment of a $36.5 million loan.  Federal judge Harold C. Abramson opened the doors to additional reorganization plans in July after ruling that Mr. Hunt had failed to make sufficient progress during the 10 months that he had the exclusive right to negotiate with creditors.  Apparently, sufficient progress toward a negotiated settlement of Nelson Bunker Hunt's personal bankruptcy case had been made; Judge Abramson extended his exclusive negotiating rights through Aug. 31.  In Herbert Hunt's case, the various reorganization plans agree that the former billionaire's remaining assets should be disposed of through a liquidating trust.  But they offer conflicting proposals over precisely which creditors should be paid off first and the amount of Mr. Hunt's assets that each creditor should recover.  In addition, despite months of negotiations, Mr. Hunt and the IRS are still at loggerheads over how much he will still owe the government after the sale of his remaining assets, which are estimated to be worth between $89 million and $150 million.  In his amended plan, Mr. Hunt has abandoned an earlier proposal that he keep 10% of the proceeds of the liquidating trust while giving 60% to the IRS and 30% to other creditors.  Mr. Hunt now is offering to give the IRS 63% and other creditors 37%, while he would keep personal effects such as his home and car.  In the amended plan, he also agreed to a $60 million nondischargable debt to the IRS to be paid from future earnings, gifts and inheritances.  In the plan it filed jointly with Manufacturers Hanover, the IRS asks for a $90 million nondischargable debt and 70% of the liquidating trust, with the rest of the proceeds divided up among other creditors.  The IRS and Manufacturers Hanover also have asked the court to give their claims priority over that of Minpeco.  Minpeco contends that penalties, interest and legal fees have swollen the value of its $132 million judgment against the Hunts to $250 million, but the IRS and Manufacturers Hanover argue that Minpeco has already collected roughly $80 million from other defendants in the silver conspiracy matter and that other creditors in the bankruptcy case should be paid before Minpeco gets any more.  Minpeco has threatened legal action if the IRS and Manufacturers Hanover attempt to force such a plan through the court.  Under Minpeco's proposal, proceeds from the liquidating trust would be divided along roughly the same lines proposed by the IRS and Manufacturers Hanover, but Mr. Hunt would receive 3% of the proceeds.  That money would in turn be used to pay a $15 million debt claimed by Minpeco.  Friday, August 18, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.775% 30 to 41 days; 8.50% 42 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.25% one month; 8.15% two months; 8.10% three months; 8% six months; 7.92% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.82% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.57% 90 days; 8.50% 120 days; 8.42% 150 days; 8.35% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 13/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 14, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.01% 13 weeks; 7.83% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.15%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.14%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.15%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.22%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Researchers said they are developing a biological diagnostic test for Alzheimer's disease and a new method to determine whether various chemicals might be useful in treating the disease.  Both developments involve research on a strange protein, called beta-amyloid, that accumulates in the brains of persons with Alzheimer's disease.  The protein's role in the disease isn't known but the number of amyloid-containing lesions in the brain seem to correlate with the disease's severity.  Two collaborating research teams -- at the University of Rochester (N.Y.) Medical Center and Massachusetts General Hospital in Boston -- have now developed a monoclonal antibody that they hope will detect the beta-amyloid protein in Alzheimer's patients, said Sayeeda Zain, who heads the University of Rochester team.  She spoke Friday at a symposium in Rochester on molecular approaches to human disease.  The two research groups are in negotiations with an unidentified company to develop the antibody as a diagnostic test for Alzheimer's disease, said Charles A. Marotta, the Harvard Medical School biologist who heads the research effort at McLean Hospital, the psychiatric facility for Massachusetts General Hospital.  "At present there is no biological assay for Alzheimer's disease," Mr. Marotta explained.  The disease, premature loss of memory, senility and dementia, is diagnosed primarily by psychological and neurological tests that measure changes in brain and mental functioning.  "We developed the monoclonal antibody for research purposes" but it also could be used for a diagnostic test, Mr. Marotta said.  Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced versions of the antibodies the body makes to fight off invasions of viruses, bacteria and other "foreign" matter.  The antibodies latch on to proteins on the surfaces of the viruses and bacteria.  Each line of the laboratory-made monoclonal antibodies is designed to seek out and latch on to a specific protein such as, in this case, the beta-amyloid protein.  The hope, Mr. Marotta said, is to attach radioactive tracer molecules to the amyloid antibody.  The antibodies, upon being injected into a patient, would seek out beta-amyloid protein.  A radiation-detecting camera could then tell whether the patient is producing abnormal amounts of beta-amyloid protein, a distinctive feature of Alzheimer's disease.  It isn't known whether the antibodies would be able to get from the blood into the brain and the amyloid-rich brain lesions.  However, Mr. Marotta said, in Alzheimer's patients the beta-amyloid also accumulates in the blood vessels, where it would be readily accessible to the monoclonal antibodies.  Clinical trials of the antibody diagnostic test would be done by the federal National Institute on Aging, which is funding the research, the scientist said.  Mr. Marotta and Ms. Zain also have cloned the amyloid protein gene and have transplanted it into cells grown in a test tube.  This line of cells is now producing excessive quantities of beta-amyloid protein, also known as A4 peptide.  As a result, the cells "become a very interesting model" for studying the over-production of the protein in Alzheimer's disease, Mr. Marotta said.  The amyloid-producing cells also can be used to design and screen chemicals to find those that might interrupt the outpouring of the protein, the scientist said.  If found, such drugs wouldn't cure the disease but "they may help keep it from getting worse" since the accumulation of the protein and the destruction of brain cells seem to go hand-in-hand, he explained.  "There's a lot of interest from commercial companies" in using the amyloid-producing cells for such drug screening and "negotiations are on-going," Mr. Marotta said.  Ms. Zain said efforts now are under way to transplant the human amyloid gene into mice, producing a strain of so-called transgenic mice that could be used for developing and testing treatments for Alzheimer's disease.  ALLENVEST GROUP Ltd. is a Toronto brokerage firm.  It was incorrectly described in a previous edition.  (See: "Business Brief -- Steinberg Inc.: Board Is Asked to Issue Special Rights to Holders" -- WSJ Aug. 18, 1989)  Environmental fervor has grown to the point where top corporate management must consider the environment as a major, unavoidable factor in bottom-line costs.  Americans tell pollsters that they want to clean up the environment regardless of cost, and President Bush says he has put cleaning the environment at the top of his agenda.  Even the Oil and Gas Journal has suggested oil companies elect environmentalists to their boards.  In the wake of Exxon's Valdez disaster, many companies feel themselves hostage to environmental concerns and some may find it tempting to pay conscience money to environmentalists who view business as the enemy.  While such environmentalists' conceivably destructive influence on company policy may be dismissed as marginal at the moment, that may change as environmental issues play an ever greater role in your company's strategic planning.  But managers can successfully integrate environmental concerns into their companies' financial and developmental policies.  Executives from Burlington Northern Inc. and Burlington Resources are particularly aware of this issue.  Burlington Resources has major holdings in natural gas, oil, minerals, and agricultural, forest and urban land.  The top management at Burlington's operations is highly sensitive to public evaluations of the company's environmental stewardship.  "Firms that destroy the integrity of an ecological system are viewed in the same way as individuals who make cash withdrawals from a 7-Eleven with a shotgun," says Burlington Resources CEO Tom O'Leary.  Burlington Northern and Burlington Resources have had to learn their environmental lessons the hard way.  Many once perfectly normal activities -- for example, treating railroad ties with preservatives, spills at fuel stops on the railroad, and the use of solvents for normal maintenanceare now unconscionable.  Chris Bayley, chairman of Burlington Environmental Inc. (a subsidiary of Burlington Resources specializing in waste management), says that a niche will develop for firms that audit companies' environmental liabilities as is now done for financial exposures.  For example, a large firm preparing to dispose of real estate should know if it is buying or selling a potential Superfund site that may carry massive liabilities.  This problem is likely to become more acute given amendments to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act.  Under this act, parties responsible for the pollution of a site may be required to implement remedial actions judged necessary by the Environmental Protection Agency to protect human health or the environment.  This would also pertain to high-tech industries that use PCBs and other toxic chemicals in their production process.  But to whom can businesses turn for help?  Not to the European-style "green" ecologists, who believe that the market is inherently dangerous to the environment.  Fortunately, leaders of several major environmental groups are coming to recognize market incentives and property rights as tools for ecological stewardship.  The Environmental Defense Fund and the Wilderness Society both employ professional economists.  Many companies find it profitable and productive to design programs in cooperation with the economic policy staffs of these groups.  The Audubon Society works with Mobil and other energy companies to develop wells on its 28,000 acre Rainey Preserve in Louisiana.  Exxon and other major companies have had similar success in Audubon's Corkscrew Swamp Sanctuary and the Big Cypress Preserve in Florida.  Florida Power & Light Co. won the Florida Audubon Society's award for its innovation in wildlife management.  It employs thermal "pollution" to warm the waters around its Turkey Point plant, making it one of the three areas in the U.S. to have breeding populations of crocodiles.  The endangered manatees also seek out these warm waters in the winter months, and the power company once kept its Fort Myers plant operating for 11 extra days to protect the 100 manatees gathered there.  Although the crocodile program alone cost several million dollars, Florida Power & Light believes it was a good investment -- if only to repel litigation.  In Maine, Champion International Corp., a forest-products company, initiated a plan to provide improved habitat for the wood duck, a beautiful species that is recovering from near extinction.  In Washington state, Champion is working with sportsmen to manage vigorous and healthy populations of deer to profitably control destruction of new seedlings.  Beyond joint ventures with environmental groups, managers must begin to develop their own expertise.  Unfortunately, no executive business or MBA program effectively prepares management to make discriminating choices on environmental matters.  Perhaps a "Business and Environment Program" could be offered to executives or developed as an option for MBA programs.  Sample courses could include:  -- A history of environmental and natural resource policy, describing the evolution of environmentalism and the legislation that followed America's environmental awakening;  -- Environmental and natural resource economics, in which students would learn how economic theory applies to problems such as pollution control;  -- Environmental ethics and philosophy, which would trace the evolutionary path of contemporary environmental philosophies;  -- Political economy of environmental policy, which would examine government management of valuable resources and the problems of special interests and of diffused and hidden economic and environmental costs.  The primary goal would be to explore the potential for policy reforms that reconcile increasing demands for environmental integrity with economic and managerial efficiency.  The costs of pollution to society are well-enough known.  But the costs to the business community of remaining unprepared to integrate environmental costs into their business plans -- thus leaving these increasingly critical decisions in the hands of outsiders -- are unacceptably high.  It is time to bring business and the environment together.  ---  Mr. Baden heads the Foundation for Research on Economics and the Environment, in Bozeman, Mont., and Seattle.  Lance Wilson, a former top federal housing official, notified a House subcommittee that he won't testify or provide documents sought by the panel in its investigation of the unfolding Department of Housing and Urban Development scandal.  Mr. Wilson, now a first vice president at PaineWebber Group Inc., became the third former senior HUD official to invoke the Fifth Amendment privilege against self-incrimination.  Like the others, Deborah Gore Dean and R. Hunter Cushing, Mr. Wilson is considered a central figure in the scandal by congressional investigators.  Both Mr. Wilson and, later, Ms. Dean served as executive assistants to former HUD Secretary Samuel Pierce.  Through his Washington attorney, Raymond Banoun, Mr. Wilson notified the House Government Operations panel's employment and housing subcommittee that he was invoking his constitutional right to not testify.  He failed to appear before the panel on July 28, and lawmakers issued subpoenas requiring him to produce documents by last Friday and to testify on Sept. 27.  In a letter to the panel's chairman, Rep. Tom Lantos (D., Calif.), Mr. Banoun said that Mr. Wilson wouldn't cooperate because some panel members, including Mr. Lantos, had "adversely prejudged" him and were intent on publicly vilifying him.  According to the letter, Mr. Wilson had planned to testify July 28 but sought a postponement when Mr. Banoun was hospitalized.  Lawmakers rejected Mr. Wilson's request and instead approved the subpoenas.  The Brezhnev Doctrine is dead.  Long live the Gorbachev non-doctrine.  Rather than sending tanks into the streets of Warsaw to defend socialism, as it would have done only a few years ago, Moscow has so far reacted calmly to the nomination of a Solidarity activist as Poland's new prime minister.  Its non-interference seems to confirm what Soviet officials have been telling the skeptical West for months: that Soviet allies are sovereign states and free to choose their own social systems.  But officials here say privately that the end of the Communist Party's 45-year monopoly on power in Poland is also fraught with risks for Mr. Mikhail Gorbachev and his own political reform plans.  They believe it will increase the growing divisions in the East bloc, ending once and for all the cherished pretense of unity.  And it is likely to be used as powerful ammunition by Communist Party stalwarts in the Soviet Union who are already declaring in public that the Gorbachev reforms have gone too far.  Only last month, at a meeting of Soviet leaders to discuss the crises confronting the Communist Party, Yegor Ligachev, the Politburo member who is a figurehead for Soviet conservatives, asked: "Why is all this happening?  Where are we heading?"  Some of the behind-the-scenes nervousness about events in Poland was reflected in a hard-hitting commentary in the Communist Party daily Pravda last week that accused the once-banned Solidarity of increasing political tension in Poland.  But official and media reaction here has generally been low-key, cautious and surprisingly bland.  Soviet TV reported briefly and factually on the nomination of Tadeusz Mazowiecki as new Polish prime minister in the middle of its main news program Saturday evening, making it sound as if the event were no more significant than a change of government anywhere in the West.  Western analysts in Moscow speculate Mr. Gorbachev may believe that a Solidarity-led government in Poland, however hard to stomach, is better than the economic and political collapse of the country under the Communists.  For its part, Solidarity has made some efforts to soothe the nerves of the Soviet leadership.  A leading Solidarity official, Adam Michnik, held talks in Moscow last month, paving the way for a probable visit later this year by Lech Walesa, the trade union's leader.  And Solidarity has pledged that Poland will remain a part of the Warsaw Pact and offered the crucial defense and interior portfolios in the new government to the Communist Party.  Whatever Mr. Gorbachev's thinking, the Soviet reaction represents a significant break with the past.  Moscow's fear of an erosion of Communist rule in its satellite states brought about the 1956 suppression of the Hungarian uprising, the Warsaw Pact invasion of Czechoslovakia in 1968 and, most recently, the 1981 imposition of martial law in Poland.  Shortly after the invasion of Czechoslovakia, Soviet leader Leonid Brezhnev laid down what has become known as the Brezhnev Doctrine -- ironically, in a speech to a congress of the Polish Communist Party.  "When external and internal forces hostile to socialism try to turn the development of a socialist country in the direction of the restoration of the capitalist system, when a threat arises to the cause of socialism in that country, this is no longer merely a problem for that country's people but a common problem, the concern of all socialist countries," he said.  Mr. Gorbachev has often emphasized that under his "new political thinking," people in both East and West have a sovereign right to choose their own government.  Both he and senior Soviet officials have abruptly dismissed challenges by the West to repudiate the Brezhnev Doctrine, asserting that it doesn't exist.  But until this weekend, their words weren't put to the test.  Any type of military or political intervention in Poland now would cause irreparable damage to Mr. Gorbachev's credibility.  But doing nothing could speed calls for change elsewhere.  Hungary, now set on the establishment of a multiparty system, could be the next ally to end Communist rule.  And in the Soviet Union itself, the Communist Party is under severe attack and likely to be trounced in local elections that take place this fall.  Mr. Ligachev is not the only one wondering where the reforms are heading.  The specter of the death of Communism is also haunting the remaining hard-liners among Moscow's allies.  Romania, Czechoslovakia and East Germany, itself battling to halt an exodus of its citizens, haven't hidden their dismay.  With Hungary and Poland both now looking to the West and seeking to introduce more market-oriented economies, the cracks in Eastern Europe's political and economic alliance may become impossible to paper over.  While many airline-stock investors dream of soaring buyout bids, America West Airlines' admirers are fantasizing about paint jobs and tuneups.  Shares of America West, traded on the Nasdaq over-the-counter market, have been given a lift lately by the rosy outlook for the carrier's aircraft-maintenance business.  The takeover speculation boosting all airline issues in recent sessions has been a factor in America West's 25% rise this month.  But the stock got a bigger push from Shearson Lehman Hutton analyst Helane Becker, who this month raised her short-term rating on the stock to "outperform," or buy, from "neutral," or hold, and proclaimed that the company's maintenance center is "one of the major reasons" to own America West.  On Friday, the stock closed unchanged at 12.  As Ms. Becker sees it, the route to profit for the Phoenix, Ariz., airline company is lined at least partly with mechanics and paint sprayers.  She says revenue at the company's 15-month-old facility for painting planes, checking engines and training pilots will rise handsomely through 1990.  She predicts that America West's revenue from such non-passenger contract businesses will be about $50.7 million, or 5% of its total revenue, this year and $81 million, or nearly 7% of the total, in 1990.  Ms. Becker estimates that the facility alone is worth "at least $100 million, or $5.43 a share."  She expects America West to earn $1.15 a share this year and $1.33 a share in 1990.  Despite such positives, the uncertain economic outlook in the intensely competitive industry makes some analysts wary of airline stocks.  Others see clouds on America West's horizon as it attempts to expand beyond its Las Vegas, Nev., and Phoenix hubs.  Mark Daugherty, a Dean Witter analyst who is negative on the group, is advising clients to "sell their airline stocks and use the funds elsewhere."  Mr. Daugherty says, "The economy is slowing, and air traffic and pricing could come under downward pressure over the next year or two."  Simultaneously, he says, the airlines will have to finance the rapid expansion they've recently embarked upon through aircraft purchases.  "That will strain their financial performance," he says.  Neil Eigen, a portfolio manager at Integrated Resources' Asset Management unit, says regional airline stocks, among which he numbers America West, are the most attractive sector of the industry now.  He also likes the prospects for America West's maintenance services business.  But he hasn't bought any shares yet, contending that the company's earnings are still "erratic" and that America West officials haven't shown that they can manage the company's growth.  America West's facility can serve 150 planes.  The company is hiring more mechanics, which should help it do more contract work, Ms. Becker says -- and the shortage of trained mechanics facing the industry makes the strategy doubly wise, she says.  "Airline companies have expanded rapidly, and the shortage of maintenance facilities has become a world-wide industry problem," Ms. Becker says.  "The carriers with facilities for doing contract maintenance will do the best in the long term."  In addition, America West's aircraft painting operations make it something of a takeover play, Ms. Becker reasons: The tide of airline mergers and acquisitions over the past three years, and the resulting need for changing planes' names, will provide plenty of work for America West's artisans.  A number of big carriers have already approached the company about repainting their fleets, she says.  But as for the possibility of a takeover of America West itself: Insiders and employees own nearly 80% of the shares outstanding, and the company says workers are scheduled to receive payments amounting to 100% of their salaries if there's a hostile takeover.  This makes it a less-than-attractive target, analysts say.  A group including investor Martin Sosnoff owns an 8.5% stake but has said it's only for investment purposes.  Though many analysts believe America West is turning around after posting a $45.7 million loss for 1987, the company still faces challenges, they say.  Last year, it had an operating loss of $12.2 million before a debenture repurchase that resulted in net income of $9.4 million, or 51 cents a share.  Ms. Becker and others are skeptical of the carrier's ability to generate enough revenue to cover the costs of the four Boeing 747s it is buying from KLM Royal Dutch Air over the next year.  The company plans to use the planes for the flights to Honolulu it is due to begin in November.  But Ms. Becker and others say that Honolulu is a popular but unprofitable market.  The Shearson analyst calls it "an expensive experiment" that could hurt profit in the fourth quarter.  Ray Nakano, America West's controller, says service to Hawaii will enhance the company's operating results.  "Over the next decade, we feel traffic growth will occur in the Pacific Rim, and we'd like to be a player in that market," Mr. Nakano says.  "Honolulu is the origination point for many flights" to that region.  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index jumped 1.14 to 461.97 on 134.5 million shares.  For the week, the composite lost 0.1%.  The Nasdaq 100 Index rose 1.14 to 433.44, and the Nasdaq Financials gained 1.39 to 460.94.  Sci-Med Life Systems surged 12 1/8, or 34%, to 48 1/8 on a million shares, almost nine times its daily average volume.  Traders told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report the medical products maker got a big boost from problems disclosed by a competitor, C.R. Bard, which makes a catheter used in heart angioplasty.  Bard, whose shares are listed on the New York Stock Exchange, said it has stopped shipping its new probe catheter at the request of the Food and Drug Administration.  Apple Computer rose 1 1/4 to 42 1/4.  The company said its board approved the purchase of as many as 2.5 million of its common shares in the open market from time to time.  The company said shares will be purchased mainly to offset the dilution caused by various employee stock ownership programs.  Sun Microsystems was up 1/2 to 14 7/8.  The company posted a $20.3 million loss for its fourth quarter, ended June 30.  Amway Corp. said it has ended all animal tests, replacing them with in-vitro testing methods.  The closely held consumer product company's move follows by about a month announcements by Revlon Inc. and Avon Products Inc. that they would stop using animals in tests of products.  In a joint statement with People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals, an animal advocacy group, Amway said its decision "follows a rigorous campaign by the {group} to have all companies involved in animal testing end the practice."  Amway said it won't perform animal tests itself, nor will it have animal tests done for it by others.  The company said it recently decided not to introduce a new pesticide because it would have had to submit animal tests to the Environmental Protection Agency to get approval for the pesticide.  Oxdon Investments Inc. offered to raise its bid for Montreal food retailing and real estate concern Steinberg Inc. to 1.48 billion Canadian dollars (US$1.25 billion) from C$1.33 billion.  Oxdon also said it is prepared to offer incentives for Socanav Inc. and its financial backer, Caisse de Depot et Placement, to drop their rival tender offer for Steinberg of C$75 (US$63) a common share and C$51 a Class A share, or C$1.33 billion.  Oxdon said it proposed to Steinberg a plan to buy all the company's common shares for C$80 each and all Class A shares for C$60 each.  Oxdon has a tender offer outstanding to acquire each share for C$75 and C$53, respectively.  The revised bid takes the shape of a merger proposal, which would require approval of two-thirds of both classes of Steinberg shareholders at a special meeting.  Steinberg said its board will meet this afternoon to consider Oxdon's proposal.  After a trading halt Friday, Steinberg Class A stock jumped to C$54.875 in Toronto Stock Exchange trading before dropping to C$52.50 at the close, up C$3.  Oxdon is owned equally by Kingsbridge Capital Corp., a merchant bank affiliate of Unicorp Canada Corp.; Oxford Development Group Inc., a closely held real estate developer; and Gordon Investment Corp.  All three concerns are based in Toronto.  Oxdon valued its new plan at about C$185 million more than Socanav's offer, which expires tomorrow at 4:30 p.m. local time.  Oxdon said it is prepared to negotiate "issues and proposals relating to the joint ownership of Steinberg's assets" with Socanav, a Montreal shipping concern, and Caisse de Depot.  Oxdon also is prepared to offer them an option to acquire Steinberg's non-retail food operations in Quebec and an opportunity to buy 50% of Oxdon, provided Oxdon's current shareholders retain management and operating control.  In addition, Oxdon said it would give Caisse de Depot, the Quebec government's pension fund agency, right of first refusal on any Steinberg real estate assets that might be for sale in the next two years.  Eric Evans, vice president of Unicorp Canada, said Oxdon partners agreed to raise their bid because "there's much more value there than first appeared to be."  Oxdon said an independent valuation of Steinberg's real estate assets valuing them at C$1.1 billion is "conservative."  Oxdon has proposed to sell Steinberg's food retail operations to Loblaw Cos., a retailing unit of George Weston Ltd.  But it's unclear if Steinberg holders will get a chance to vote on Oxdon's merger proposal.  Oxdon said it asked Steinberg's board to ask Socanav to extend its bid's expiration date and not to take and pay for any shares tendered to its offer until after holders can vote on the merger proposal.  "We'll just say no," if Steinberg's board makes such a request, Socanav Chairman Michel Gaucher said.  He said Socanav is proceeding with its tender offer, and the Oxdon proposal "hasn't changed anything."  He said Socanav and Caisse de Depot aren't interested in negotiating with Oxdon over sharing an interest in Steinberg or dividing up its assets, calling Oxdon's offer to do so "absurd."  He said Oxdon hasn't approached Socanav.  Socanav is assured of acquiring voting control of Steinberg if it proceeds with its bid because of an exclusive option agreement with a Steinberg family group.  Under that agreement, Socanav can acquire a 52% block of Steinberg common.  Separately, Steinberg's board said they won't issue special rights to Class A holders as a way of forcing a true auction for Steinberg stock, as Allenvest Group Ltd. requested Thursday.  The Toronto institutional broker represents holders of about 25% of Steinberg's Class A stock.  Does the analogy no longer hold?  Over the years, the economy has behaved much like a supertanker.  Several nautical miles can slip by between the time the captain orders a new course and speed and the ship responds, and a similar sluggishness usually has marked the economy's response to changes sought by Washington's policy makers.  But recently a notion somehow has developed that the economy now will alter course or speed with alacrity, more in the manner of our small outboard motorboat than any supertanker.  It's this belief in efficacious policy making, in fact, that underlies the widespread hope that the economy will slow in orderly fashion -- land softly, in the popular phrase -- and that the year ahead will witness a finely tuned return to peppier growth.  Perhaps so.  But for the nonce, we will stick with the supertanker analogy.  The economy's progress largely depends, of course, on the sort of monetary and fiscal policies pursued in Washington.  On the monetary front, for instance, Federal Reserve moves to pump up the money supply and lower interest rates normally will serve to quicken the economic tempo.  And on the fiscal front, decisions by Congress and the White House to cut taxes and raise federal spending -- measures that typically produce budgetary red ink -- also will tend to spur the economy.  But how many nautical miles may pass before such maneuvers show an impact?  A considerable number, the record suggests.  Consider, for example, the economy's sluggish, uncertain response to Fed and fiscal policy shifts when overall business activity last began to slide into a recession.  A recession began in July 1981 and persisted until November 1982.  The 16-month slump was one of the longest and most severe since the Great Depression.  It was the first downturn since World War II in which more than 10% of the labor force was unemployed.  The widely followed real M2 version of the money supply, which comprises cash and most savings and checking accounts and is adjusted for price change, had been dropping steadily since the early spring of 1981.  In July of that year, as the recession set in, the monetary measure was at its lowest level in more than a year.  The M2 indicator rose modestly in August and fell again in September.  But in October it began an accelerating climb that continued with little interruption through the rest of the recession, as well as through the early years of the subsequent economic upswing, which still seems in progress.  Thus, the recession kept deepening for more than a year -- until November 1982 -- even though the M2 gauge was rising.  The economy's response to the Fed's dropping of interest rates was similarly sluggish.  The Fed began reducing the discount rate that it charges banks in November 1981.  The rate was then cut repeatedly -- in December 1981 and in July, August, October and November of 1982.  By the recession's end, the rate had been slashed to 9% from 14%.  And, not surprisingly, other interest rates also fell.  Some, in fact, began dropping even before the first discount rate cut and declined even more steeply.  The average prime rate charged by banks began falling in September 1981 and over the recession's course plunged to 11% from nearly 21%.  And, all the while, the recession continued to deepen.  The economy's reaction to fiscal moves in 1981-82 also was exceedingly sluggish.  Tax rates were cut in both years -- starting, in fact, in July 1981, the very month the recession began.  In addition, various business tax benefits were expanded and, as typically happens in a recession, federal spending rose sharply.  In the process, the federal budget deficit ballooned.  The level of red ink, which had been dropping, was at an annual rate of about $50 billion as the recession set in.  By the start of 1982, with the slump still deepening, the red ink exceeded $100 billion.  And by late that year, when the economy at last began to recover, the level topped $200 billion.  If the economy's reaction to policy shifts has been so sluggish in the past -- and the 1981-82 experience is by no means unique -- why is there such confidence now that henceforth policy moves in Washington will deftly induce the precise economic results that are desired?  There is no simple, single answer.  In part, the attitude is a natural byproduct of nearly seven years of uninterrupted economic expansion, buoyed by massive investment inflows from abroad.  A similar confidence -- the ancient Greeks might have called it hubris -- developed during the record-long, 106-month expansion of the 1960s, shortly before the 1969-70 recession developed.  There is also a sense, as James Grant, the incisive editor of Grant's Interest Rate Observer, notes skeptically, that "the economy is more or less self-adjusting nowadays {and} in a system of deregulated interest rates, nationwide recessions can be choked off before they begin."  But there were repeated slumps, often severe and long, early in the century, when the economy was far freer of regulation than today.  Wherever the truth resides, it seems more than a little premature to consider scrapping that supertanker for an outboard. 